"text"
"Since early 2018, the US-China 'trade war' has increased tariffs on a wide range of Chinese products, including solar panels. The tension between the US and China in solar sector, if left unchecked, will not only harm the bilateral relationship between the two trade powers but also impede climate change mitigation as higher costs will slow down the deployment of solar products.The article begins by tracing the rapid development of the solar energy sector in China, before reviewing US trade measures to counteract the increased imports and protect its domestic industry. The article then proceeds to examine the WTO rules, finding that China is likely to prevail in the dispute on claims made under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade and the Agreement on Safeguards. However, while WTO litigation may be a necessary step it is not sufficient. China must also take the opportunity to solve deeply-rooted problems in its solar industry, namely solar overcapacity and heavy reliance on export markets in a limited number of countries that render Chinese solar manufacturing susceptible to trade restrictions imposed by other countries. Addressing these issues will not only remove a major irritant to the US and other trading partners but would also solidify the position of the industry within the country.The article recommends two options for China: first, explore domestic market potential for solar energy so as to absorb manufacturing capacity. The key here lies in progressively scaling up domestic solar consumption, which is essential in promoting China's solar development in a healthy and sustainable manner. Second, strengthen ties with countries along the Belt and Road Initiative (BRI) in solar trade and investment. Exporting Chinese solar technologies and building solar power infrastructure in BRI countries not only alleviates China's over-dependence on a limited number of advanced economies' markets but also contributes to 'greening' the BRI and global climate change mitigation."
"Since early 2018, the US–China 'trade war' has increased tariffs on a wide range of Chinese products, including solar panels. The tension between the US and China in solar sector, if left unchecked, will not only harm the bilateral relationship between the two trade powers but also impede climate change mitigation as higher costs will slow down the deployment of solar products. The article begins by tracing the rapid development of the solar energy sector in China, before reviewing US trade measures to counteract the increased imports and protect its domestic industry. The article then proceeds to examine the WTO rules, finding that China is likely to prevail in the dispute on claims made under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade and the Agreement on Safeguards. However, while WTO litigation may be a necessary step it is not sufficient. China must also take the opportunity to solve deeply-rooted problems in its solar industry, namely solar overcapacity and heavy reliance on export markets in a limited number of countries that render Chinese solar manufacturing susceptible to trade restrictions imposed by other countries. Addressing these issues will not only remove a major irritant to the US and other trading partners but would also solidify the position of the industry within the country. The article recommends two options for China: first, explore domestic market potential for solar energy so as to absorb manufacturing capacity. The key here lies in progressively scaling up domestic solar consumption, which is essential in promoting China's solar development in a healthy and sustainable manner. Second, strengthen ties with countries along the Belt and Road Initiative (BRI) in solar trade and investment. Exporting Chinese solar technologies and building solar power infrastructure in BRI countries not only alleviates China's over-dependence on a limited number of advanced economies' markets but also contributes to 'greening' the BRI and global climate change mitigation. "
"The photovoltaic (PV) sector has undergone both major expansion and evolution over the last decades, and currently, the technologies already marketed or still in the laboratory/research phase are numerous and very different. Likewise, in order to assess the energy and environmental impacts of these devices, life cycle assessment (LCA) studies related to these systems are always increasing. The objective of this paper is to summarize and update the current literature of LCA applied to different types of grid-connected PV, as well as to critically analyze the results related to energy and environmental impacts generated during the life cycle of PV technologies, from 1st generation (traditional silicon based) up to the third generation (innovative non-silicon based). Most of the results regarded energy indices like energy payback time, cumulative energy demand, and primary energy demand, while environmental indices were variable based on different scopes and impact assessment methods. Moreover, the review work allowed to highlight and compare key parameters (PV type and system, geographical location, efficiency), methodological insights (functional unit, system boundaries, etc.), and energy/environmental hotspots of 39 LCA studies relating to different PV systems, in order to underline the importance of these aspects, and to provide information and a basis of comparison for future analyses."
"Motivated by a widely practiced strategy to combine the growth of the solar energy sector with poverty mitigation, we propose stylized models of households selling extra solar energy back to the grid, which generates a steady stream of income to overcome adoption barriers for solar panels, that is, high adoption cost and generation variability. By considering households' strategic consumption shifting behavior in response to varying intertemporal market electricity prices, we have presented the equilibrium adoption number and households' equilibrium profit. We have also demonstrated the government's optimal subsidy to reach a socially optimal adoption level. Furthermore, we investigate the popular Public Private Partnership (PPP) model in developing countries to promote the investment of solar panels. Under the PPP program, the private firms share both upfront cost and electricity revenue with households, while the government may provide subsidy to further encourage adoption. Despite the popularity of the PPP scheme, our model documents an unexpected negative implication by inducing a lower overall adoption level than the traditional scheme: As the PPP scheme relieves budgetary burden of households in adopting solar panels (infrastructure cost), anticipating the long-term revenue loss, they are less likely to participate in the first place. However, combined with the government intervention via adoption subsidy, the PPP scheme can lead to a win-win solution for all.In this paper, we investigate the synergy between the growth of the solar energy sector with poverty mitigation in underdeveloped regions, motivated by a national strategy initiated by the Chinese governments. We propose a stylized model, wherein households sell extra solar energy back to the grid to generate a steady stream of income. A salient feature of our model is that we are able to evaluate the impact of a long-term contractual relationship on the short-term household behaviors under intertemporal market variability, by breaking down the daily energy tidal curve into the “buying periods” and the “selling periods” without isolating and labeling every period."
"By examining the interaction of the two time scales under endogenous market entry, we find that the households benefit from the variability of electricity market through strategic consumption shifting behavior. We demonstrate how such behavior should be carefully considered in the government's intervention. Under the PPP scheme, we find that the government has to provide a higher subsidy level in equilibrium, without which the PPP scheme might not be able to achieve better adoption and social welfare as expected. As the PPP scheme relieves budgetary burden of households in adopting solar panels (infrastructure cost), anticipating the long-term revenue loss, they are less likely to participate in the first place. This research is the first step in understanding the economic value of combining solar sector expansion and poverty mitigation in developing economies."
"There are several avenues for future research. First, we assume that households' rooftop solar panels would exert homogenous productivity. However, if we consider a sufficiently large area, then households' different geographical locations would generate different productivity of solar panels even if they choose the same capacity. Taking account of heterogeneity in households' locations would make our model analytically intractable. This is because the participating households would make different profits, which makes it very challenging to analyze the equilibrium adoption number, let alone the comparison between the two schemes. However, we believe that the consideration of households' heterogeneity in energy productivity under a different model setup would generate more insightful results. Second, we only compare the traditional scheme and the PPP scheme. There are other business models to promote the adoption of solar panels such as rent-to-own. Even though we are able to make some informal discussions on the comparison, the formal comparison requires substantial modification of our model setup. Future research can formally incorporate the analysis of other business models, which would offer more policy implications."
""
"Solar panel manufacturing, while comprising a small role in the energy sector, illustrates the government's ability to foster growth in nascent industries as well as its limits in protecting these industries from interna- tional competition. Environmental concerns over cli- mate change have forced governments worldwide to establish targets and provide incentives for generating electricity from renewable energy sources. While lead- ing to the rapid development of a global market for solar panels, these policies induced volatility by pro- moting a surge in production and international com- petition. Consequently, the domestic solar panel manufacturing industry has experienced a tremendous boom and bust over the past dec "
"ational Trade Despite improvements in technology and government incentives, international trade has been the primary reason behind the U.S. decline in the highly globalized solar panel manufacturing industry. In the early part of the past decade, exports generated the majority of industry revenue as developed nations dominated global production and demand. However, this trend reversed in the later part of the past decade. In particular, backed by government subsidies that • enabled them to sell solar panels below the cost of production, Chinese manufacturers rapidly ramped up output, as shown in Figure 3, and flooded the global market with lower priced solar panels. As a result, relatively more expensive U.S. manufacturers found themselves priced out of the global market. Therefore, over the five years to 2014, the value of U.S. solar panel exports declined at an annualized 29.3 percent to $210.0 million. With the loss of international custo- mers, exports share of industry revenue plunged from more than 90.0 percent in 2005 to just over 20.0 percent in 2015 [IBISWorld 2014], Manufacturers in emerging economies, particu- larly in China, priced out U.S. manufacturers from not only the international market, but also the domestic one. Although domestic solar power generation surged over the past five years, an increasing share of this demand was satisfied by imports. Consequently, imports have fairly consistently satisfied the majority of domestic demand, with the total value of imports increasing at an annualized 21.7 percent to $4.3 billion over the five years to 2014 [U.S. International Trade Commission 2015]. Figure 6 demonstrates the comparative performance of exports and imports over the past decade. Import growth has faltered in recent years as the federal government intervened. Following an antidump- ing (AD) investigation, the U.S. Department of Com- merce determined that Chinese manufactured crystalline silicon solar cells, a key component of the most common type of solar panel, had dumping margins ranging from The U.S. solar panel manufacturing industry has faced significant challenges to its development over the past five years, despite strong government incentives pro- moting growth in solar energy. Although technological advancements are expected to reduce manufacturing costs and protective trade duties are expected to restrict imports from China and Taiwan, intense competition from low-cost producers and other energy sources will continue to threaten the industry. According to the EIA' s Annual Energy Outlook 2014, the levelized cost of electricity (LCOE), which represents the per mega- watt-hour (MWh) cost of building and operating a power plant, is forecast to remain higher for photo- voltaic technologies than fossil fuels in the near-term. More specifically, the EIA projects the average LCOE for plants entering service in 2019 to be $118.6/MWh for photovoltaic technologies, compared with $66.3/ MWh for natural gas-fired conventional combined cycle plants and $95.6/MWh for conventional coal plants [2014]. For this reason, IBISWorld projects revenue from domestic solar panel manufacturing will continue to decline, albeit at a slower annualized rate of 11.0 percent, to $521.3 million over the five years to 2020 [2014], as shown in Figure 7. However, by 2040, the EIA forecasts the average LCOE for photovoltaic power plants to fall to $101.3/MWh as technological advancements boost energy conversion efficiency while reducing production cost [2014]. In comparison, the EIA projects the average LCOE for conventional coal plants to modestly decline to $87.0/MWh, while the average LCOE for natural gas-fired conventional combined cycle plants is forecast to significantly increase to $81.2/MWh [2014]. As the price of solar power converges with the price of fossil fuels, photo- voltaic technologies will continue to become more cost competitive, which will support solar panel manufac- turers in the long term. However, whether U.S. produ- cers will be able to benefit remains to be seen. "
"General Trends of US–China Adjudication in the WTO and the Cases Selected for the Comparative Analysis"
"To make the central claim more compelling by showing its empirical validity, a brief overview of the track record of US–China trade disputes is necessary. As of 1 July 2018, the United States and China have engaged in 34 trade disputes with each other. China was a claimant in 12 cases and a respondent in 22 cases. As Table 1 illustrates, legal issues in the US–China disputes include anti-dumping (AD), countervailing duties (CVD), safeguard measures, sanitary and phytosanitary (SPS), national treatment (NT), most-favored nation treatment (MFN), and trade-related intellectual property rights (TRIPs). Like disputes among other WTO members, the lion's share of these were about a government's protective or retaliatory measures that potentially conflict with WTO rules."
"Concurrence of China's Industrial Overcapacity and Successful Maneuvering in the WTO"
"Structural Causes of Overcapacity and the Dilemma of the Central Authority"
"Preexisting literature tends to consider China's export competitiveness – which has a significant impact on China's trade surplus with the United States – as the outcome of the state's well-coordinated market intervention. These studies emphasize that China's state capitalism looks similar to a coordinated market, “where correctly calibrated, complementary institutions across states, provinces, and municipalities reinforce one another and determine market efficiencies.”40 Thus, the international trade literature positively evaluates the Chinese state's capacity and competence in outmaneuvering WTO rules and manipulating industrial policy. In contrast, the comparative political economy literature asserts that the Chinese central government's industrial policies are bound to fail due to fragmented institutional factors.41 China has become the world largest producer and exporter in many sectors, especially in those the central government has selected to promote: the “pillar industries” in the 1990s, and the “strategic emerging industries” in the 2000s. This rapid ascendancy, however, has been achieved without fulfilling the central government's industrial policy goals, such as realizing economies of scale and promoting “indigenous innovation” (zizhu chuangxin). Rather, it was possible because various firms, supported by local governments, invested heavily in the industries selected by the central government."
"The rapid growth of industrial capacity, which occurred alongside the failure of achieving the central government's industrial policy goals, led to widespread overcapacity, sectoral fragmentation, and heated price wars and bankruptcies in some sectors. Scholars studying Chinese domestic political economy have analyzed the phenomenon from the viewpoint of “rent seeking” or “rent misallocation.”42 On the other hand, scholars in international trade have focused on how the Chinese state has fostered industries through various “subsidies.”43 In March 2012, in response to the US accusation that China was not complying with WTO rules by using prohibited subsidies, Chen Deming, then minister of the Ministry of Commerce, offered this refutation:"
"The constant accusations of the United States against the Chinese government often include the phrase “you are not obeying the rules.” As for which specific aspects and areas are not in compliance with the rules, they are rarely mentioned. I hope that we can have a dialogue on subsidies with those countries that blame us, and we can communicate on the understanding of the existence of subsidies. I can tell reporters very clearly that China's central government has no prohibitive subsidies. Our country is large and geographically wide. If there are some subsidies in some places, we are willing to discuss it.44"
""
"If the central government does not provide any prohibitive subsidies, not including actionable subsidies, then where did the accusation come from? Regardless of whether support is called rents or subsidies, local governments do continue to provide various types of support, such as “access to financing, channeling bank loans and other forms of funding to local firms,” to nurture specific industries in their jurisdiction.45 To understand the contradictory claims of both the United States and China regarding the subsidy issue, it is necessary to understand how the Chinese central government's mid- and long-term industrial policies and plans operate in the context of China's central-local relations."
"Chinese central-local relations can be depicted as a “loosely coupled system,” in which “the elements of the system affect each other suddenly rather than continuously, occasionally rather than constantly, negligibly rather than significantly, indirectly rather than directly and eventually rather than immediately.”46 The central government drafts mid- and long-term industrial plans, but local governments are responsible for implementing policies. Because incentive mismatches between central and local governments are pervasive, implementation gaps have been the norm rather than the exception across the board, from environmental regulations to labor regulations and industrial policy.47 Within this loosely coupled system, filled with huge implementation gaps, local leaders must maximize revenues and minimize political risks to advance their careers.48 The 1994 tax sharing reform replaced the previous fiscal contract system, and the financial pressures caused by the reform transformed local governments' primary goal into increasing local financial revenues through the strategy of “inviting business and attracting investments” (zhaoshang yinzi). Zhao Shukai, director general of the information center of the Development Research Center of the State Council, called this new type of local state the “corporate state,” 49 in contrast to Jean Oi's “local state corporatism.”50 Zhao identified three essential characteristics of the local corporate state: (i) a corporatized incentive structure; (ii) a fragmented authority structure; and (iii) a movement-type behavioral model. As a corporation, a local government's primary goal was to maximize fiscal revenue, so investment promotion became the most important task of the government. Local leaders frequently advertised their locales' “low land prices,” “special taxes,” “low-interest loans,” and even “guaranteed acquisition of operation permits” (zhunshengzheng).51"
"For local governments, nurturing sectors that the central government has proclaimed would be promoted is the safest way to maximize fiscal revenue and minimize political risks. The central government's policy support for certain sectors has given local governments a strong incentive to provide various preferential policies in order to promote the development of targeted industries. Therefore, the central government's policy support means not only that it is easier to obtain policy subsidies from the central government, but that it is easier to obtain support from local governments in the form of cheap land, tax incentives, financial subsidies, and easier access to local financing. In a new industry, once technical barriers are broken, a large number of new entrants will flood into the industry in response to local government investment incentives, and investment in the industry will proliferate. Under this system, when the market demand expands in a certain new industry, most enterprises in the entire industry will overreact to the expansion of demand, resulting in production capacity far greater than the expansion of the market demand.52"
"The 2008 subprime financial crisis led to a drastic decline in demand from China's major export markets. In response, the Chinese central government launched aggressive stimulus programs to enhance domestic demand and, at the same time, initiated industrial restructuring to address overcapacity. A document released in September 2009 by the State Council lists industries that were severely overproducing.53 The list included both traditional industries, such as steel, cement, plate glass, and coal chemical, and emerging industries, such as wind power equipment and polysilicon, which is the main material of solar PV products. The document diagnoses each sector's current situation as follows:"
"In the renewable energy industries, the rapid increase in production capacity, fueled by local governments' supports, resulted in excessive reliance on exports in the PV sector, and led to trade disputes in the the wind turbine sector due to the protection of domestic firms through regulations on the domestic contents ratio. As shown in Table 4, the domestic consumption of solar PV cells is meager compared to the exports. The export ratio peaked at 96 percent in 2009, and has since declined gradually. The production of solar PV cells, which reached only 10 MWp in 2002, reached 1,088 MWp in 2007, which is just five years later, and again shows a phenomenal growth to 21,000 MWp in 2012. In contrast to the rapid increase in production volume, the domestic installation growth was sluggish. As of 2012, more than three-quarters of gross production has been sold to overseas markets, and Chinese solar firms have no choice but to spearhead market development with price competitiveness.With increasing legal capacity and confidence, the Chinese government began to follow a more proactive and sophisticated litigation strategy against US protective measures. DS 379 vividly shows China's improved jurisprudence. The bone of contention in this case was a discriminatory measure of the United States against non-market economy (NME) countries, including China. Countries classified as NME by the WTO and by domestic tariff regulations of major industrial powers had to endure several discriminatory measures, especially in the determination of anti-dumping and countervailing measures. As the WTO rules do not provide perfect guidance on the issue of non-market economies, the imposition of anti-dumping and countervailing measures was mainly at the discretion of domestic regulations."
"The method of calculating anti-dumping and countervailing duties over the NME was highly controversial, to the extent that there was no legal consensus on the matter, even among US governmental agencies, and particularly between the Department of Commerce (DOC) and the Court of International Trade (CIT).61 Even though “dumping”, as a potential violation of the WTO rules, can be determined by comparing the new exporting value with the “normal value” in the exporting market (as Article 2.1 of the Anti-Dumping Agreement stipulates), the nature of a non-market system made the comparison in practice extremely challenging. The US government, as a stopgap measure, conventionally had not imposed anti-dumping and countervailing duties against NMEs.62 From 2006, however, the DOC, with a green light from the CIT, started to investigate injuries perpetrated by the importation of Coated Free Sheet Papers (CFSP) from China in order to calculate dumping margins by taking the price of identical products in the third surrogate market as the yardstick of normal price. Many analysts firmly believed that this surrogate method often the imposition of higher AD rates than would occur if the producer's/exporter's prices and costs were used. To make it worse, the Department of Commerce often initiated both AD and CVD investigations on the same products.63"
"To rectify America's controversial customary practices, China had not hesitated to resort to the WTO adjudication mechanism. As the Department of Commerce imposed the AD and CVD on some Chinese products, such as Carbon Quality Steel Pipe (CWP), the Chinese government brought the case to the WTO Dispute Settlement Body (DSB). In this case, the panel acknowledged that the imposition of anti-dumping measures with NME methodology and the parallel CVDs could potentially impose a “double remedy.” Furthermore, the Appellate Body confirmed that the practice of a double remedy is not consistent with Article 19.3 of the SCM Agreement.64 Likewise, China's resort to the WTO adjudication against the US customary practices that are in conflict with China's material interest demonstrates China's resilience and enhancing legal capacity."
"China has also utilized the WTO mechanism as a shield by imposing protective tariff measures when its industrial interests are threatened. The DS 414 case was initiated by China's imposition of countervailing and anti-dumping duties on Grain Oriented Flat-Rolled Electrical Steel (GOEs) from the United States. As China's manufacturing powerhouse in the Northeast region was hit by the global financial crisis, leading to the reduction of exports, the Chinese government imposed protective measures. Around this time, China started using anti-dumping more aggressively against exports from the United States. As a result, the share of total US exports to China subject to anti-dumping duties increased from 3 percent in 2008 to nearly 8 percent in 2011.65 These measures were also retaliatory, to equivalent measures the United States had taken. China's ability to increase countervailing duties shows its rapid institutional learning, and its loss in DS 414 did not change the increasing trend of China taking CVD measures."
"A similar trend can be confirmed in the renewable energy sector. In WTO dispute resolution, it has been argued that the rapid ascendency of China in the wind industry was mainly due to China's outsmarting the WTO rules by “gam[ing] the system and exploit[ing] the institutional limitations of the WTO.”66 Despite the WTO's Agreement on Subsidies and Countervailing Measures, which prohibits specific types of subsidies that are contingent on export performance or on the use of domestic instead of imported goods, the Chinese authorities, by using a special fund, offered grants to Chinese wind turbine manufacturers who agreed to use key parts and components made in China.67 Even though China's controversial subsidy practices ignited the DS 419 case, China's wind turbine industry has been taking the lion's share of the global market during the long consultation process. When it comes to US countervailing duties on solar panels and other products in DS449, China proactively challenged the United State's double remedies of AD and CVD, and the panel report found the US measures inconsistent with the WTO rules."
"Conclusion"
"This paper has illuminated the nature of the competitive trade game being played by the United States and China under the shadow of WTO rules. Even though the United States has long been touted as a norm-maker and privilege-taker, even in the context of the WTO, China's rapid legal capacity-building has diminished American dominance as an institutional power. China has effectively responded to litigation from the United States, and proactively challenged protective measures through WTO adjudication. Even if China's legal capacity has not yet surpassed or even reached the US level, it has become sufficient to effectively deal with a trade war. Furthermore, China's steel making and renewable energy industries have reached the top in the global market, muddling through potential constraints and obstacles posed by WTO rules and a series of litigations from the United States."
"The Trump administration – cognizant of the limitations of America's institutional power and of the uses of the WTO as a policy tool to reverse a trade imbalance – adopted the brinkmanship strategy that goes beyond legal leverage. While this negotiation stunt is detrimental to the rules-based international order and the vitality of the world economy, it has been welcomed by many, among them even liberal commentators, because no alternative measure seems to exist to ensure that China will genuinely embrace and internalize WTO rules.68 The striking response reflects America's deep-seated distrust of China's compliance with the WTO rules and of the efficacy of the WTO's dispute-settlement mechanisms. In a nutshell, the Trump administration and many Americans are skeptical of China's “intentions.”"
"Countering this American skepticism, this article has suggested a structural cause for the situation: excessive industrial capacity induced by the unique relationship between China's central and local governments. Regardless of the central authority's control and management, many local governments have jumped into strategic industries to boost sluggish local economies and create jobs. While making a good effort to legally respond to US pressure at the WTO level, China's central authority has also made at least some effort to solve the problem of overproduction and thereby avoid more trade disputes. Unfortunately, the Chinese central authority's efforts have been met with only partial success on the international front."
"The findings of this article imply that the two economic giants – the United States and China – should seek more room for coordination, rather than engaging in mutually destructive tariff wars and negotiation gambits. The Trump administration's assertive tactics may either induce China to make greater concessions or signal the demise of barely entrenched WTO rules. As the probability of the second scenario is not small, urgent efforts to mediate should be made by other top leaders with the aid of international organizations. If Trump and Xi would spend their time and energy managing and controlling the issue of overcapacity in a more constructive way, the strategic trade game of the two superpowers could still get back onto the normal track of WTO rule."
"This paper examines why the United States and China could not accommodate their trade disputes within the framework of the World Trade Organization (WTO), which now escalated into a rhetorical and retaliatory tariff war. The existing literature, which assumes the dominance of US institutional power in the WTO litigation process, has not anticipated the administration's current gambit that has ignited a trade war with China. Specifically, many liberal-minded pundits and public alike were puzzled by the United States imposing self-destructive tariff measures against the WTO rules, despite the WTO still remains as an effective tool and resource for America's trade policies. Against such a backdrop, this paper claims that the concurrence of America's limited legal leverage in the WTO and China's domestic industrial structure that induces overproduction substantially explains the puzzle. To support this central claim, the paper conducts a comparative case analysis of US–China disputes in two industrial domains: steelmaking and renewable energy, including solar photovoltaic (PV) power and wind power. Despite contrasting domestic industrial structures and sectoral characteristics, the case study shows a similar pattern present in China's successful legal maneuvers and US strategic failures. Furthermore, the study also reveals the structural causes of overproduction beyond the Chinese central authority's managerial capacity."
""
"Introduction"
"In the midst of ongoing trade disputes between the United States and China, one item of breaking news shocked people around the world. A leaked White House draft executive order and private discussions between President Donald Trump and his top advisors, reported on the Axios news website, implied that the Trump administration was considering a withdrawal from the World Trade Organization (WTO).1 Even though Trump denied the allegation a day later, the episode vividly suggested his administration's dissatisfaction with, and distrust of, the WTO. While denying the allegation, Treasury Secretary Steve Mnuchin admitted Trump's distrust of the WTO by confirming, “The president has concerns about the WTO, he thinks there's aspects of it that are not fair, he thinks that China and others have used it to their own advantage, but we are focused on free trade.”2"
"To make matters worse, the Trump administration's perception of China as a manipulator of the WTO rules has motivated it to take a series of assertive measures. The imposition of tariffs on $34bn worth of Chinese products and the Chinese government's following retaliatory measures in 2018 announced the official prelude of a US–China trade war. As of April 2019, it is reported that the United States has put tariffs on $250bn worth of Chinese goods, while Beijing has put duties on $110bn worth of US products.3 The irony is that the initial US tariff measures are hardly compatible with the WTO rules. The measures ratcheted up anxiety over the administration's policy orientation rather than taming China's competitiveness.4 Even though the trade war itself is now in its final stage for settlement, as top trade officials of two economic giants are so close to reaching a bilateral deal, America's backlash against the WTO continues by procrastinating the appointment of Appellate Body (AB) members. The hamstrung AB not only poses a threat to the WTO system as a whole but also hurts the US interest. In the recent case of Chinese agricultural policies that discriminate against US and other countries' market access, the United States could not adopt their retaliatory measures as the AB procedure stumbles, even despite the panel's finding against China's discriminatory measures.5 In this regard, “the other trade war” against the institutions of WTO has not been finished.6"
"In the Trump Administration's perception, the WTO is an unnecessary straightjacket that aggravates America's trade deficits with China, and an inefficient tool to constrain China's malpractices. Reflecting this perception, in the meeting with representatives from the steel and aluminum industry, President Trump claimed that “the WTO is great for China and terrible for the United States, and great for other countries.”7 By the same token, the US Trade Representative official, in the middle of the escalation of the trade war, also stated, “the WTO currently does not offer all of the tools necessary to remedy this situation.”8 Likewise, Trump's deep distrust and frustration of the WTO as a tool to address and redress unfair trade practices of mercantile China motivated his destructive policy steps, which wreak havoc on the institutional stability of the WTO and the global economy.9 The Trump administration's gambit is a puzzle to many researchers and practitioners with liberal values, as the WTO rules have long been regarded as an unequal playing field tilted in favor of the United States and a few industrialized Western countries. Empirical research reveals that panel and AB reports are more likely to mirror US jurisprudence than that of other countries, and that even third party disputes are frequently handled by US law firms due to their information power.10 In a similar vein, the 2018 Economic Report of the President confirms how effective the United States is in comparison to China in the WTO dispute settlement system: “the United States has won 85.7 percent of the cases it has initiated before the WTO since 1995, compared with a global average of 84.4 percent. In contrast, China's success rate is just 66.7 percent.”11 Even though Trump's predecessors shared some concerns over the protracted dispute-settlement, some legal loopholes, and the activist AB and its judicial overreach, no one so substantially linked it with conflicts with China as Trump. The bottom-line conviction of the WTO as an effective tool for America's trade policy and as a crown jewel of the judicialized international organization was solid in the past.12"
"Considering this background, this article examines the question, “Why the United States and China could not accommodate their trade disputes within the framework of the WTO?” The paper's primary claim is that the concurrence of America's limited legal leverage and China's rising legal capacity in the WTO promoted the United States to play the political and bilateral game, rather than exclusively resorting to the judicialized legal game. Furthermore, we view the penchant for overproduction in many local governments in China as motivation for Beijing to muddle through the WTO rules and take legal recourses actively if the United States imposes protective measures. To support this claim, this paper analyzes trends of adjudication between the United States and China at the WTO level. The paper also presents an in-depth comparative case analysis on disputes between the two countries related to the steel-making and renewable energy industries, inclusive of solar photovoltaic (PV) and wind power sectors. The track record of US trade disputes with China shows that the United States has not been able to achieve its cherished goals due to the narrow legal leverage of the WTO and China's enhanced legal capacity. Despite China's recurring practices of subsiding industry and dumping to address overproduction, the legal recourse of the United States to the WTO has not been consistently successful."
"The in-depth institutional analysis of China's industrial governance also reveals the structural factors behind China's subsidy and dumping practices. Many local governments, highly motivated by the widespread “GDP worship” in the local officialdom, competitively nurture strategic industries.13 As the race to attract some selected industries has frequently resulted in overproduction and dumping in foreign markets, these practices have been the main cause of trade disputes involving the United States. However, because China's central authority has not been particularly effective in managing and controlling overproduction, resorting to the WTO's rules is not necessarily a solution for the United States."
"The next section of article critically reviews how the US role has been transformed from a friendly inviter to a brinkman who shakes the fundamentals of the WTO rules. To illuminate the US frustration of WTO rules, this section will take issue with the socialization literature that sketches a positive outlook of China's compliance with the WTO rules. The subsequent section examines the general trend of US–China trade disputes in the WTO, and lays out the rationale of analytical focus on two contrasting industrial domains: steel-making and renewable energy. Finally, the article digs into the dynamics of China's management and control over two selected domains, in particular the central-local government relationship."
"From a Legal Game under the Shadow of WTO Rules to the Trump Administration's Assertive Trade Policies"
"When the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trades (GATT) system evolved into the WTO in 1995, most US policy makers were convinced that this institutional evolution would solidify America's dominant institutional power. Motivated by the Clinton administration's strategic vision of “Engagement and Enlargement,” US policy makers believed that the creation of the WTO would enhance open and fair trade in favor of American values and interests. Based on this tenet, the US government supported China's integration into the WTO system as it would facilitate and consolidate the marketization and the rule of law in China. In this period, the United States had the absolute conviction of its institutional power to utilize the WTO procedure in its favor, and to socialize any newcomers to abide by the reformed WTO rules with high-legal characteristics."
"Theoretically, a state that plays a leading role in the creation of institutions and enjoys institutional power can influence the preferences, goals, and behaviors of other states as a way of promoting its own interests through institutions. As a result, many international institutions, whether formal or informal, dispose states to act in the directions that advantage some while disadvantaging others.14 Analogous to the case of other institutions, the United States expected to be “a system-maker and privilege-taker” in the WTO.15 Empirically, the GATT system conferred more benefits in the form of economic growth rates to industrialized Western countries than to under-developed or developing countries.16 The reality of WTO politics after its creation, on the other hand, vividly shows that the WTO rules and procedures are a double-edged sword that other state actors, including China, can invoke for their diplomatic leverage."
"When China's 15-year effort to join the WTO finally succeeded in 2001, it changed the landscape of institutional power in the WTO. To dissipate the suspicions and anxieties of the main stakeholders of the WTO, the Chinese government undertook substantive additional responsibilities in its accession code compared to other new members. The scope and depth of China's WTO commitments were unprecedented in WTO history; by accepting “WTO-plus obligations,” China undertook onerous responsibilities regarding its market economy conditions, foreign investment, domestic governance, and a special review mechanism. In addition, China also embraced “WTO-minus” provisions, which set a lower threshold for importing members when they are attempting to impose trade remedies against Chinese products.17 To faithfully perform its international legal obligations and live up to the expectations of transnational actors and the Chinese people, the Chinese government embarked on a domestic legal reform aimed at compatibility with WTO rules.18"
"A crucial dimension of being a WTO member is to embrace its rules for the settlement of disputes with other members. Unlike the substantive rules of the WTO, which confer asymmetrical benefits on developed countries, the procedural aspects of the WTO rules provide an opportunity for developing countries. As adjudication requires a specific legal question on a specific issue and relevant statutes, power asymmetry is of less concern in adjudication processes than in bilateral negotiations. If a side is physically weaker, but its argument has stronger legal grounds, it is in a better bargaining position vis-à-vis a stronger opponent. Some pieces of empirical evidence demonstrate the efficacy of weaker states' recourse through the channel of international courts, even against superpowers.19 At least in theory, therefore, the WTO should be an attractive forum for developing countries to defend themselves as it has long been touted as an organization with a high level of obligation, precision, and delegation. Even empirically, many researchers have found no evidence of any jurisprudential predilection to favor industrialized and wealthy countries in rulings, and instead report a comparatively fair procedure, which levels the playing field for developing countries.20"
"Even if developing countries can expect a comparatively fair adjudication process, reaching such a stage is not necessarily easy. Many empirical studies by political scientists have indicated that there are some barriers to developing countries' full access to the WTO. Developing countries usually have neither the financial capacity to bear costly adjudications nor government officials with a shrewd enough understanding of the WTO rules to manage the whole process. If developing countries can overcome such barriers, however, they also tend to be repeat players in the WTO adjudication process, just as the wealthy industrialized countries are.21"
"In the history of the WTO, some countries have quickly learned how to use the WTO rules and adopted a strategy of “aggressive legalism,” which can be defined as “a conscious strategy of utilizing a substantive set of international legal rules and making them to serve as both ‘shield’ and ‘sword’ in trade disputes among sovereign states.”22 The “shield” comes into play when international legal rules provide a justification for a sovereign country's domestic measures, whereas the “sword” is wielded when a sovereign country challenges another country's government measures in negotiation or in the WTO litigation process. Among East Asian countries, Japan was the first to adopt the aggressive legalism strategy and South Korea followed suit. These countries had been suffering from US unilateral retaliatory trade policies, such as the notorious “Section 301 of the U.S. Trade Act of 1974”; however, they had been reluctant to rely on legal measures before the transition in the policy stance as long as there was a satisfactory surplus in their trade relations with the United States and while their security relied on the United States. A series of litigations by South Korea and Japan in the last decade, however, demonstrates that the WTO system has become significantly legalized, and that a confrontation in the Dispute Settlement Body (DSB) does not destroy cooperation in other areas."
"For over a decade, there has been hot debate as to whether the Chinese government has started to adopt the aggressive legalism strategy. A few journal articles have asserted that the Chinese government had already adopted tactics based on aggressive legalism by around 2002. A series of safeguard measures on imported steel were strong signals of aggressive legalism, according to these articles.23 Conversely, other articles asserted that it was too early to evaluate the Chinese government as consciously adopting aggressive legalism at that time, as it continued to prefer bilateral settlements in trade disputes with the United States and the European Union (EU) even when litigation might have better served Chinese interests. The Chinese government's reluctance to rely on litigation was conspicuous in cases such as the disputes over the Coke Export Quota with the EU and Value Added Tax on Integrated Circuits with the United States.24"
"Over time, the Chinese government has started to show enhanced institutional capacity and has more frequently resorted to the WTO dispute-settlement mechanism when US protective and retaliatory measures infringe on China's trade interests. Many experts pinpoint 2007 as the turning point for China's stance on adjudication; China has been a claimant in 19 cases since that year. Regarding the implications of such a transition, one expert claimed that a “socialization dynamic – a process of inducting actors into the norms and rules of a given community – best explains away China's more frequent resort to the WTO adjudication.”25 In other words, China has transformed itself from a clumsy newcomer in the WTO club to a mature senior member who has internalized the club rules and deals with quarrels with other members in a mature way."
"Even if this socialization saga holds a kernel of truth, the problem is that the United States – the founder of the club – does not perceive the situation in this way. Rather, in the United State's view, China has started to manipulate the procedural law without internalizing the substantive aspects of the WTO rules. An analogy might efficiently explain the ways in which the conceptual difference between the substantive and procedural aspects of the WTO rules makes the socialization saga controversial: if a criminal suspect sues an abusive police officer who arrested him by using a controversial investigation method, the suspect's resort to the legal system does not itself vindicate his honor as a good citizen; however, a track record of compliance with substantive rules would suggest that a suspect is both innocent and has internalized societal norms. In other words, mere deference to the procedural law does not guarantee true socialization; compliance with substantive law is critical in evaluating degrees of socialization."
"Understanding the difference between these two dimensions of law is also important to analyze the attitudinal shift of the WTO and the United States toward China. The selective internalizing of procedural law is actually pervasive in the diplomatic strategies of many idiosyncratic regimes. Even Libya under the Gaddafi regime actively utilized the International Court of Justice to resist UN Security Council resolutions demanding the extradition of those allegedly involved in the bombing of civil aircraft in the Lockerbie case. In the oral pleading of the ICJ litigation, the Gaddafi regime pointed out the inconsistency of the Security Council resolutions with the Montreal Convention, which stipulates that nations may “prosecute or extradite” a suspect. As the inconsistency was acknowledged by many prominent international lawyers and the diplomatic community, the United States and the UK faced a legitimacy crisis and lost substantial bargaining power in the negotiation.26 Although the litigation showed the Gaddafi regime's shrewd understanding of the procedural aspect of public international law, few would likely argue that it demonstrated the regime's socialization or internalization of substantive laws of the international community."
"The Trump administration's gambit, which has shaken the bedrock of the rules-based international trading system, reflects the United State's deep grudges over China's allegedly manipulative conduct and the WTO system itself. In line with the “America First Doctrine,” Trump rejects not only China's allegedly unfair trade practices but his predecessor's decision to integrate China into the WTO system. As a presidential candidate, Trump asserted that “the city of Pittsburgh, and the State of Pennsylvania, have lost one-third of their manufacturing jobs since the Clintons put China into the WTO.”27 This overt display of regret over the decision to integrate China was unprecedented.28 Since his presidency began, Trump has been making his promised gambit by ordering the United States Trade Represntative (USTR) to take a series of controversial tariff measures against Chinese goods, which obviously goes beyond the legal leverage of WTO rules. According to a USTR report, China takes an instrumental approach to the WTO rules as, “Too often, China flouts the rules to achieve industrial policy objectives.” Furthermore, the report also demands a more assertive action beyond the legal remedies by claiming, “it is now clear that the WTO rules are not sufficient to constrain China's market-distorting behavior.”29"
"The Trump administration's deeply rooted distrust toward the WTO is already well documented in the 2018 Trade Policy Agenda and 2017 Annual Report of the President of the United States on the Trade Agreements Program, released in March 2018.30 The report argued that the WTO is undermining the interests of the United States because it is not operating as originally intended, and, in particular, the dispute settlement system imposes the judges' own policy preferences. It also declared that the WTO had given market-distorting countries like China an unfair advantage over market-based economies. Since the US Congress's approval of permanent normal trade relations with China in 2000, which was an essential prerequisite for China's WTO accession, the US trade deficit against China has steeply increased, from $84bn in 2001 to $375bn in 2017. The actions taken by the administrations of George W. Bush and Barack Obama “were largely rifle shots at specific infractions made within the WTO's dispute-resolution system,” but Donald Trump, no longer satisfied with the dispute settlement system within the WTO, is taking “big-picture action” by questioning the legitimacy of the WTO's role in promoting more efficient markets.31"
"From the perspective of the Trump administration and Trump's main political supporters, China has effectively wielded its enhanced institutional power and can now frame the procedural law in its favor without internalizing substantive rules. They believe that, as a result, America is losing the trade and legal game under the shadow of WTO rules. To reverse this course, the Trump administration adopted unprecedented assertive tactics because it is politically free from the legacy and path-dependence of the liberal international order. In other words, deep grudges over losing a game have spilled over into challenging the rules of the game itself. Furthermore, as WTO rules require high levels of obligation, precision, and delegation, they tend to restrict the leverage of policy options and thereby fundamentally conflict with Trump's negotiation style, which is unchanged from his real estate mogul days. He prefers to make extreme and almost unacceptable offers in an early phase of negotiation, which tends to result in a final deal in his favor after a modest pullback.32 In the end, deep frustration over the straightjacket of WTO rules have motivated him to adopt assertive trade polic"
"The World Trade Organization agreed recently to China's request to create a dispute panel tasked with judging whether US tariffs on solar panels violate international trade rules.The trade restrictions were imposed by President Donald Trump's administration last year, part of a raft of measures initiated by Washington that have triggered a tit-for-tat tariff war between the world's top two economies. China filed its first complaint on the solar panel tariffs at the WTO in August 2018, arguing that the so-called ""safeguard measures"" were an illegal attempt to protect US producers from foreign competition.The WTO's decision to set up a dispute settlement panel was a procedural move that followed automatically from China's second request for arbitration. But it comes at time of escalating tension between Washington and Beijing, some of which is cantered on the WTO. Trump, meanwhile, threatened to pull the US out of the body if conditions were not improved. He has been especially critical of the terms granted China when it joined the organisation, including its developing nation status, which Washington argues helps shield China from the scrutiny it merits as a major economic powerhouse."
"Solar photovoltaic (PV) systems have experienced strong market growth over the last decade. Since the mid-2000s, the increase in demand in line with policy supports in Europe has attracted the Chinese players into the PV manufacturing market. Chinese production soared in a short time and managed to quickly reduce the cost thanks to large-scale supply with mass-produced products. Faced with the global economic crisis, the European countries began reducing their policy supports that caused a decrease in the demand for PV installations. Despite such a market situation, Chinese PV manufacturers have continued to produce large quantities of solar PV products and thereby aggravated the global PV industry situation with a global supply–demand imbalance. China's rapid market expansion without domestic market development has brought unexpected results with an oversupply of PV materials and equipment in a global market and destabilized the PV market. It influenced the PV policy mechanisms of other countries. Many PV firms in the world have since gone into bankruptcy. China and Europe lately went through a trade dispute over the Chinese solar panel imports (dumping suspicion). In this context, this study aims to identify the PV policy mechanisms based on a multiperspective approach in Germany, Japan, and China. A systematic logical framework is proposed and then used to explain each country's PV policy strategy and results. Moreover, PV globalization impacts and interactions among them are studied using the international trade theory. At the end, this research also attempts to seek optimal strategies to improve the global PV mechanisms. "
"Renewable energy, produced with widely available low-cost energy resources, is often included as a component of national strategies to address energy security and sustainability. Market and political forces cannot disrupt the sun or wind, unlike oil and gas supplies. However, the cost of renewable energy is highly dependent on technologies manufactured through global supply chains in leading manufacturing countries. The countries that contribute to the global supply chains may take actions that, directly or indirectly, influence global access to materials and components. For example, high-purity polysilicon, a key material in solar photovoltaics, has experienced significant price fluctuations, affecting the manufacturing capacity and cost of both polysilicon and solar panels. This study developed and validated an initial system dynamics framework to gain insights into global trade in polysilicon. The model represents an initial framework for exploration. Three regions were modeled—China, the United States, and the rest of the world—for a range of trade scenarios to understand the impacts of import duties and non-price drivers on the relative volumes of imports and domestic supply. The model was validated with the historical case of China imposing an import duty on polysilicon from the United States, the European Union, and South Korea, which altered the regional flows of polysilicon—in terms of imports, exports, and domestic production—to varying degrees. As expected, the model tracked how regional demand shares and influx volumes decrease as a duty on a region increases. Using 2016 as a reference point, in the scenarios examined for U.S. exports to China, each 10% increase in the import duty results in a 40% decrease in import volume. The model also indicates that, under the scenarios investigated, once a duty has been imposed on a region, the demand share from that region declines and does not achieve pre-duty levels, even as global demand increases. Adding additional countries and other components in the photovoltaic supply chain (panels, cells, wafers) to this model could enable policymakers to better understand the relative impact of trade measures across the entire photovoltaic module manufacturing supply chain and the conditions that encourage industry evolution and competitiveness."
"This paper reviews the highly politicized recent decision by the U.S. to impose large dumping and countervailing duties on solar cells and modules imported from China. Attention is devoted to discussing the case, the conflict between the Obama administration’s trade policy and environmental goals, shortcomings inherent in the investigations related to solar imports, China’s response to the allegations, the impact on downstream firms that install solar panels, and the future of U.S.–China trade relations. U.S. trade policy is sending a negative signal to the rest of the world that will only encourage retaliation and obstruct the solar sector’s development. Punitive duties are inconsistent with President Obama’s energy and export initiatives. The U.S. should refrain from transforming trade policy mistakes into energy/environmental and export policy failures.1 The Obama Administration recently announced a Blueprint for a Secure Energy Future, an energy initiative to stimulate widespread adoption of new energy sources such as solar power.1 Washington has spent billions of dollars in production subsidies and consumption tax credits over the years to stimulate demand for solar energy by making it less expensive to retail consumers. Low cost solar modules are necessary to make solar energy competitive with fossil fuels. A recent decision to impose large antidumping and countervailing duties on imports of solar cells and modules from China, the least cost producer, will deal a serious blow to the administration’s plan of using renewable energy initiatives to reduce carbon emissions and slow global warming. Punitive duties will dramatically raise solar energy prices in the U.S. and make solar power less competitive with other forms of energy. Higher solar cell and module prices will serve as a tax on renewable energy that will discourage the adoption of solar panels on homes and businesses across the country, reduce investment in the industry, make the industry less competitive at home and abroad, and destroy thousands of installation jobs.This paper reviews the recent highly politicized decision to impose large dumping and countervailing duties on solar cells and modules imported from China. Attention is devoted to discussing the unfair trade case, the conflict between the Obama administration’s trade policy and energy/environmental goals, shortcomings inherent in the unfair trade practice investigations related to solar imports, China’s response to the allegations, the impact on downstream firms that install solar panels, and the future of U.S.–China trade relations.2 Antidumping and countervailing duty investigationsDumping is said to occur when a foreign company sells the same or similar product in the U.S. market at less than “normal” or “fair” value, defined as a price that is below the producer’s sales price in its own country, or at a price lower than the cost of production. Unfair subsidization takes place when a foreign government provides subsidies, or financial assistance, that benefit production, manufacture, or exportation of goods. Subsidies include such actions as direct cash payments, tax credits, or loans below market rates. Unfair pricing and illegal subsidization are investigated in separate but parallel proceedings. No attempt is made to demonstrate that unfair trade practices are being used, or that they are a result of foreign government actions. Price discrimination or U.S. market prices below estimates of foreign production costs are taken as proof that unfair trade practices are in effect.Firms in a U.S. industry that believe they are being injured by unfair competition through dumping or unfair subsidization of foreign production can file a petition with both the U.S. Department of Commerce and the U.S. International Trade Commission. The Department of Commerce conducts an investigation to determine whether dumping or unfair subsidization has occurred, and calculates dumping or subsidy margins. The International Trade Commission determines whether the domestic industry has suffered material injury or is threatened with material injury resulting from dumped or subsidized imports. Both agencies conduct preliminary and final investigations. Many factors are considered in the investigations, including trends in the domestic industry’s output, sales, market share of imports, inventories, capacity utilization, productivity, ability to raise capital, research and development, employment, and profits. If the Department of Commerce and the International Trade Commission make affirmative findings of dumping or unfair subsidization during the preliminary phase of the investigations, duties are assessed on imports of that product into the U.S. Ad valorem duties are set equal to calculated dumping and subsidy margins. Importers are then required to post a bond or cash deposit to cover the duties which would be collected in the event that an antidumping or countervailing duty order is issued upon completion of the final phase of the investigations. Provisional duty deposits can be collected 90 days prior to the final determination date.Petitions must be filed by an entity that represents interests of the domestic industry. This may be a large import-competing manufacturer, group of producers, or a union within the domestic industry that produces a product which competes with the alleged dumped or subsidized product. The petitioner must represent at least 25% of domestic production. Information on conditions of the U.S. market, the domestic industry, and evidence of unfair trade practices must be provided by the petitioner to support the allegations.3 Unfair trade practice casesThe solar trade case began on October 19, 2011, when SolarWorld Industries America Inc., a subsidiary of a German firm located in Hillsboro, Oregon, filed a petition with the Department of Commerce and the International Trade Commission on behalf of the Coalition for American Solar Manufacturing (CASM).2 The petition alleged that Chinese solar companies were receiving unfair subsidies such as free land and low-interest rate government loans, and were selling crystalline silicon photovoltaic cells and modules in the U.S. at prices below their cost of production. CASM is comprised of SolarWorld and a coalition of small U.S. solar manufacturers referred to as “six unnamed co-complainants.” CASM argued punitive duties were necessary to counter perceived “unfair trade practices” and “level the playing field” with China.Antidumping duty (AD) investigation No. 731-TA-1190 and countervailing duty (CVD) investigation No. 701-TA-481 were initiated against imports of crystalline silicon photovoltaic cells and modules from China on October 19, 2011.3 Solar cells are important intermediate products purchased by downstream module producers. Imports of solar cells and modules from China were valued at an estimated $3.1 billion in 2011.4 Suntech Power Co. Ltd., and Changzhou Trina Solar Energy Co., Ltd., were targeted in the investigations because they were the two largest exporters during 2010. Based on the preliminary phase of these investigations, it was determined that the U.S. industry was materially injured by imports of the products in question that received unfair production subsidies and were sold in the U.S. at less than fair value.Substantial punitive duties were levied on imports of solar products from China. Suntech’s final dumping margin was 31.73%. Trina Solar faced a final dumping margin of 18.32%. Fifty-nine other Chinese exporters were assigned dumping duty rates of 25.96%. Remaining Chinese exporters were hit with a final dumping duty rate of 249.96%. Wuxi Suntech Power Co., LTD, and 10 affiliates faced a final net subsidy rate of 14.78%. Trina Solar and affiliates were assessed a final net subsidy rate of 15.97%. Other Chinese producers faced a final net subsidy rate of 15.24%. The countervailing duty is added to the dumping duty even though the difference between calculated Chinese and U.S. prices fully captures the distortion resulting from both dumping and unfair subsidies. Combined punitive duties ranging between 34 and more than 260% are exorbitant and unrealistic, and can only be attributed to a biased methodology used to calculate dumping and subsidy margins.5 Provisional duty deposits for both solar unfair trade practice investigations were collected 90 days prior to the final determination date. The International Trade Commission issued a final affirmative injury determination on November 7, 2012.4 China’s responseSolar manufacturers in China dismiss the ruling as being nothing more than trade protectionism. Trade remedy actions were used to protect a few U.S. import-competing firms that are laggards in the industry. Chinese solar firms claim to be private entitles that do not receive illegal subsidies. They purchase inputs competitively, and do not receive below-market rate government-subsidized loans. Chinese manufacturers have implemented cost-cutting procedures to gain an edge in the global race to develop and manufacture clean energy technologies. Rather than emulate this example, some U.S. firms chose to pursue the less expensive strategy of hiring lawyers to bash Chinese competition. These firms blame their failures on subsidized Chinese imports. Respondents argued SolarWorld’s inability to compete was a result of poor supply chain management. For example, SolarWorld locked into undesirable long-term contracts for important inputs such as polysilicon during a period when key input prices were falling dramatically.7 China has retaliated by initiating unfair trade practice investigations of U.S. firms that export solar-grade polysilicon, a key material in solar panel manufacture, alleging that state and federal subsidies to U.S. renewable energy production have injured their Chinese competitors.8 Such trade actions will undoubtedly encourage Chinese firms to accelerate global diversification and expansion initiatives. Solar products will be transshipped through other countries, and production will be moved to nearby countries to avoid U.S. duties.5 Cost testDumping is defined as selling a product in the U.S. market at a price below “normal value.” Normal value is estimated as either the sales price of the same or similar product in the “home” (foreign producer) market, or calculated from the cost of producing the product incremented by selling and administrative expenses, overhead, and profit. U.S. law mandates a cost test in unfair trade practice investigations. The intention is to remove from determination of the average home-market price those home-market sales made at prices below the full cost of production. Such “sales” were not “made in the ordinary course of trade.” Only home market sales of goods at prices above the cost of production would be used to calculate the average home market price. This practice increases the likelihood that dumping will be found by inflating the average home market price. The end result is higher dumping margins and antidumping duty rates.Two features of the cost test work against interests of China. First, allegations of dumping are substantiated through lengthy questionnaires completed by foreign companies. Targeted companies are required to divulge detailed information about every aspect of their business activities, including costs of producing and selling each product in the U.S. market, home market, and third country markets. Companies are reluctant to divulge sensitive cost and sales information. Large companies find it costly to respond to questionnaires. Small companies may not have the expertise or resources to do so. If tight reporting deadlines are not met, or questionnaires are not forthcoming, the “best information available” is used in dumping calculations. This information typically comes from U.S. competitors that filed the original petitions. Chinese companies were given only 17 days to respond to the allegations. According to China’s Chamber of Commerce for Import and Export of Machinery and Electronics Products (CCCME), heavier punitive duties on Chinese-made products resulted when producers refuse to disclose information beyond reasonable limits. The result is excessive production cost calculations and inflated dumping margins.The second feature relates to China’s designation as a nonmarket economy (NME) country. Under the NME methodology, home market prices cannot be used in dumping calculations because they are distorted by pervasive government regulations, particularly trade-distorting subsidies. However, home market prices and costs are considered to be reliable enough to serve as a basis for calculating subsidy benefits and countervailing duty rates. Normal value in the dumping investigation is determined by identifying all productive inputs necessary to make the product, such as labor, materials, energy, and overhead, and then valuing those inputs based on their prices in a surrogate market economy country. The dumping margin becomes the average difference between the surrogate’s and U.S. prices. India’s economy was used as a surrogate for China. Higher labor costs and input prices in India make a determination of dumping more likely by raising production cost estimates, and inflate dumping margins. Availability of the NME methodology encourages U.S. firms to file antidumping and countervailing duty petitions simultaneously.6 Downstream effectsThe Coalition for Affordable Solar Energy (CASE) was formed to oppose the unfair trade petitions. Members include profitable downstream companies such as SolarCity, SunRun, and Sungevity that install modules, including those made in China. CASE represents interests of 700 companies that employ over 14,000 workers in such activities as solar project planning, development, engineering, logistics, construction, retailing, and installation. CASE claims the U.S. is a net exporter of solar products to China by $200 million, and to the world by $2 billion. A trade war would jeopardize solar trade.10 According to CASE, the petitions threaten the planned installation of solar power systems in the amount of $11 billion in 2012, and the potential installation of $60 billion proposed projects.11 Steadily falling cell and module prices have been driving the rapid adoption of solar on residences and businesses across the country while creating thousands of installation jobs. Raising the price of solar cells and modules will negatively impact downstream firms, consumers, and cost jobs. AD and CVD statutes do not permit the International Trade Commission to consider the likely impact on downstream firms, end users, or the entire economy when reaching an injury determination.U.S. companies that purchased solar panels made in China earlier this year were retroactively hit with punitive duties. Marco Mangelsdorf, co-owner of ProVision Solar Inc, a company in Hawaii that designs and installs solar panel systems, received a $138,000 bill from U.S. Customs. The bill is 250% higher than the value of panels he purchased from a Chinese supplier. Lincoln Dahl, owner of African Energy, in St. David, Arizona, employs seven installers. He was billed more than $42,000 for dumping and countervailing duties. According to William Perry, a Seattle attorney who has represented some of the companies facing the duties, U.S. firms that imported Chinese solar panels could be asked to pay roughly $100 million in punitive duties.12"
"Randy Velker is the founder and President of Simple Energy Works in Crossville, Tennessee, a company that designs, sells, and installs complete residential and commercial solar energy systems. Most of the solar panels used by Simple Energy Works are produced in Memphis at a cost not significantly different from modules made in China. Competition from China keeps costs down throughout the industry. Lower module prices reduce the cost of solar energy per watt of electrical power generated. This reduces the energy system’s payoff, the period of time before a system recovers its cost by providing power at a lower cost than electricity generated from fossil fuels. Currently, solar energy systems have a 12–13-year payoff for homeowners, and a 5–6-year payoff for commercial installations. If prices go up, the payoff period will be extended considerably, making it much more difficult to sell solar energy systems.Dumping and countervailing duties are also inconsistent with President Obama’s “National Export Initiative” intended to double U.S. exports in 5 years. Punitive duties are impediments to exports because they dramatically raise prices of inputs used by downstream companies, making them less competitive at home and abroad. Billions of dollars have recently been invested in production of polysilicon, polymers, and solar manufacturing equipment largely designed for export. These activities will be less likely to export and create jobs. Recent decisions to impose high antidumping and countervailing duties on imports of solar cells and modules from China, the least cost supplier, will dramatically raise prices of solar products. These trade actions are inconsistent with the Obama administration’s renewable energy initiatives to reduce carbon emissions and slow global warming that can only succeed if solar products are produced as cheaply as possible. Solar energy must be made less, not more expensive to retail consumers if the goal is rapid adoption of solar on residences and businesses across the country. This may entail trading freely using more inexpensive Chinese cells and modules. If the Chinese government is willing to subsidize production of cells and modules, the U.S. will benefit from importing more of these products.Higher cell and module prices are also inconsistent with President Obama’s “National Export Initiative.” The U.S. is a net exporter of solar panels to China, and the rest of the world. Punitive duties reduce U.S. exports by raising prices of inputs used by downstream companies, making them less competitive at home and abroad. Billions of dollars have been invested in the U.S. in production of polysilicon, polymers, and solar manufacturing equipment largely intended for export. These activities will now be less likely to export and create jobs. Punitive duties imposed by one country invite retaliation from targeted countries. China retaliated by initiating unfair trade practice investigations of U.S. firms that export solar-grade polysilicon, a key material in solar panel manufacture, alleging that state and federal subsidies to U.S renewable energy production injured their Chinese competitors.U.S. trade policy is creating friction in the solar energy sector, and is sending a negative signal to the rest of the world that will only encourage retaliation and obstruct the sector’s development. China has already retaliated by initiating unfair trade practice investigations of U.S. firms that export solar-grade polysilicon. Punitive duties are inconsistent with President Obama’s energy and export initiatives. The U.S. should refrain from transforming trade policy mistakes into energy/environmental and export policy failures."
"Manufacturing subsidies offered in the Inflation Reduction Act will help boost US solar panel manufacturing, easing supply problems stemming from US-China trade tensions, Enel SpA CEO Francesco Starace told analysts during the company's 2022 earnings call March 16.Enel is building a panel factory in Italy, and the Inflation Reduction Act makes it more likely that the company will launch a similar project in America, Starace said.In 2022, Enel saw reduced availability of panels resulting from import hurdles applied to Chinese products in the US, Starace said. The Italian utility deployed a record 5.2 GW of renewables across its markets during the year, but it fell short of its installation target""The US import slowdown of panels imported from China was the real reason behind these 5.2 [GW] not being 6 [GW],"" Starace said, adding that supply chain stress that emerged during 2021 ""morphed into a very specific problem of importing [photovoltaic] panels into the US market.""Enel installed 782 MW of new wind capacity in the US in 2022, taking its US wind portfolio to almost 6 GW. It also built 693 MW of US solar generation to break through the 2-GW mark in the country.US imports of solar panels in 2022 were down 1.4% compared with 2021 after shipments plummeted in the first half of the year, according to Panjiva data, an offering of S&P Global Market Intelligence.Volumes were partly affected by enforcement of the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act. The 2021 US law banned imports linked to China's Xinjiang region without proof that goods were made without forced labor.US Customs and Border Protection detentions of equipment were largely responsible for an overall 16% drop in US solar power capacity additions in 2022, to 20.2 GW, the US Solar Energy Industries Association said March 9.China has consistently denied allegations of forced labor. The law ""is built on a lie and designed to impose sanctions on relevant entities and individuals in Xinjiang,"" Liu Pengyu, a spokesperson for the Chinese embassy in Washington, D.C., said in a recent email to S&P Global Commodity Insights. Building more domestic manufacturing capacity in the US will improve availability for American solar developers, Starace said, adding that he expects disruptions in the supply from China to remain.Aside from solar, Enel sees Inflation Reduction Act-related tailwinds in its electric mobility segment, with consumer-facing services in electric vehicle charging already picking up speed, Starace said.Enel is currently pursuing €21 billion worth of disposals, of which €12 billion will come in 2023.The group's new strategy for the 2023-2025 period will see it focus on just six markets — Italy, Spain, the US, Brazil, Chile and Colombia — while exiting others such as Peru and Argentina.S&P Global Commodity Insights produces content for distribution on S&P Capital IQ Pro."
"China's solar manufacturing and R&D industry has developed rapidly since 2000: by 2010, 40% of the world's solar panels were manufactured in China. This has occurred as a result of strategic government economic planning, which has included concerns about energy security, energy diversity, and about the stimulation of a renewables-based green economy. The growth of China's solar industry has been marked since 2011 by what has come to be termed a “Solar Trade War” between the EU, the USA and China. The paper analyzes the heterogeneous framing of China's solar energy industry by corporate, nongovernmental and government actors in the USA and European Union. In so doing, the paper aims to critically investigate the production of specific market knowledge(s) that are not only instrumental and rational, but based on often-contradictory discursive constructions of an apparently merely technological and economic phenomenon such as the production of solar modules."
"Highlights"
""
"		• In the US-China trade dispute, energy market depth can be compromised if policy becomes burdensome for market participation.  • Assisting countries in the developing world grow their economies is the best long-term strategy for the US trade balance.  • We shed light on several energy market impacts of the US-China trade war.  • Policy that raises barriers to international trade does not bode well for US and global energy security.  • Promoting growth through open trade is the best policy for expanding future US energy exports. "
""
"Abstract"
"We use detailed quarterly data on US energy exports to examine the impacts of the US-China trade dispute on US energy-related commodity exports. Largely due to the shale revolution, the energy-related US current account balance has been reduced to close to zero, down from accounting for about half of the trade deficit in 2008. This is despite evidence that tariffs on imported energy-related commodities, such as solar panels, did not appear to negatively impact US imports. We estimate a regression of non-energy net exports dependent on gross domestic product, the exchange rate, and past non-energy trade deficit. We argue that the trade war led to a number of distortions that reshaped the US balance of trade in energy-related commodities. The risks of a protracted US-China trade war include slower economic growth, which is compounded by the risks associated with the aftermath of COVID-19."
"Spurred by the dramatic increase in oil and gas production from shale, the US rapidly moved toward a position of net energy exports since 2008. Moreover, the value of US net energy exports has been rising. This presents a stark contrast to the US trade balance just over a decade ago when US crude oil imports accounted for over 45% of the total trade deficit, and energy imports in their entirety accounted for about 56% of the total trade deficit."
"The overall trade deficit in goods has been growing despite an emerging trade surplus in energy-related goods. Hence, it is worth briefly exploring the drivers of the recent growth in the non-energy goods trade deficit. We estimate a traditional relationship between the real trade balance, real gross domestic product, and the real exchange rate. We concentrate on pre-COVID-19 data, as we want to abstract from the short-term effects of the pandemic on long-term trends."
"We now turn to the effects of the trade war on US energy exports. Of course, energy imports are the other important part of the current account equation. For completeness, we briefly discuss some aspects of US energy imports in the Appendix. As is the case throughout the paper, we will concentrate on pre-pandemic economic data. Although the pandemic changed the short-term picture significantly, many of its impacts are arguably transitory, and we believe the important trade-related decisions ought to be taken with an eye towards long-term fundamentals. In what follows, we rely on data reported by the US Census Bureau through the commodity trade database available at usatrade.census.gov. US export values are depicted in units of $/day to normalize differences in the number of days per month."
"The data is depicted to contextualize the discussion of the impacts of tariffs on the energy sector. In contrast to energy-related imports, energy-related exports are a significant fraction of total exports, which signals that the economic health of countries outside the US, and hence their energy demands, will play a major role for the overall US trade balance. If economies outside the US falter, their energy demand will be negatively affected, which will in turn adversely impact US energy exports."
"The total value of US exports has increased since January 2016. About half of the increase has been in ‘Energy and Energy-related’ commodities, primarily due to growth in oil, gas, and petroleum product exports (Fig. 2). The 12-month daily average export value of oil, gas, and petroleum products was $2.891 billion from January 2016 through December 2016 and $6.097 billion from October 2018 through September 2019—an increase of $3.205 billion. By comparison, the total daily average value of all commodity exports over the same two periods was $47.602 billion and $54.292 billion, respectively—an increase of $6.690 billion. Thus, oil, gas, and petroleum products accounted for 47% of the increase since 2016."
"Despite the trade dispute between the US and China, the value of US exports of oil, gas, and petroleum products climbed through mid-2018, then remained relatively flat through September 2019. Noting that domestic production of relatively low-cost supplies continued to grow throughout, fueling steady growth in the volume of exports (Fig. 3), the flattening of the value of exports after mid-2018 is largely an indicator of slowing global demand and a flattening of price rather than a flattening of quantities shipped.5 The effects appear to be distributional, particularly in Asia, rather than impacting the overall level. Total exports from the US of oil, gas/LNG, and petroleum products were all higher year-on-year in September 2019.Although the overall quantity of US exports of oil, gas, and petroleum products has not been significantly encumbered by the US-China trade dispute, the distribution of exports has changed. This can be attributed to a number of factors, including trade tensions, shifts in regional commodity prices (especially for natural gas), and different rates of demand growth around the world. As indicated in Fig. 4, US exports of oil, petroleum products, and gas (LNG) to China, Korea, and Japan are currently a relatively small fraction of total US exports of each of those commodities. However, Asia constitutes a particularly interesting area of potential future growth, particularly because the region is growing rapidly and must rely upon significant energy imports. Recent trade tensions had a negative impact on US volumes exported to China, but the flows were largely redirected. As seen in Fig. 5, the value of exports shifted away from China in mid-2018, due to the US-China trade dispute. However, Japan and South Korea fared differentlyDespite the prescriptions of basic trade theory, the perception that the US has been “losing out” to foreign manufacturing has been all too real, and a major driver behind recent protectionist policies. The mercantilist approach in trade negotiations is based on the idea that trade surpluses are desirable. This became a core guiding principle behind recent US trade policy but recent events, including the post-pandemic recovery, create an opportunity for a “restart” of US policy towards China and the region more broadly. While the US-China relation will likely not return to the pre-trade war era, there is a possibility of change, as the US returns to adopting a more multilateral approach to foreign affairs. The magnitude of this dispute remains significant, and, as it involves the world's two largest economies, its ramifications extend well beyond just the US and China. So ongoing analysis is paramount. This paper sought to shed light on the impact of the US-China trade war on US energy exports."
"Policies that raise barriers to international trade do not bode well for US and global energy security. Unencumbered trade enhances fungibility and allows short-term disruptions to be arbitraged quickly [11]. Impeding this through policy actions that raise uncertainty and/or negatively impact investment will ultimately limit market responsiveness and raise costs. We argued that it is not in the best interest of the US to limit access by foreign countries to US energy exports. In addition, an analysis of US energy-related imports (see Appendix) demonstrates that the impact of tariffs on imports of solar panels and other energy products are mitigated by other domestic policies—at the federal and state levels—such as renewable portfolio standards, tax credits, low carbon fuel standards, etc. Such policies have an offsetting effect on the impact of tariffs by encouraging greater deployment of solar energy technology."
"Of course, as China does not import an equal value of goods from the US, its ability to retaliate with tariffs on US-produced goods is limited. However, it has significant sway in global supply chains for new energy technologies, and given the US push through various state and federal policies to promote broader adoption of renewables and batteries, this portends to be an interesting area to watch, particularly due to China's dominant position in the supply chains for those commodities. Going forward, the implications from COVID-19, together with a protracted trade war would increase the risk of a slower global economic recovery and growth. Promoting growth through expanding US energy exports (something in which the US has a comparative advantage) might be a preferable option to adopting protectionist measures, thereby compromising trade and diminishing the prospects for expanding US energy exports."
"U.S. solar panel imports remain under pressure as trade disputes threaten to choke off equipment supplies for project developers."
"The number of shipping containers delivering solar panels to American ports during the fourth quarter of 2021 was up slightly from the prior quarter but down 7% from a year earlier."
"Imports have fallen sharply since mid-2021 as the U.S. started detaining panels linked to alleged labor abuses in China, and domestic manufacturers began pushing the U.S. Commerce Department to extend tariffs on Chinese products to countries in Southeast Asia, which have become the main suppliers to America's solar market in recent years."
"The latest threat came Feb. 8, when Auxin Solar Inc. asked the Commerce Department to investigate whether Chinese companies have shifted solar cell and panel production to Malaysia, Thailand, Vietnam and Cambodia in order to avoid paying U.S. tariffs."
"Tariff proponents have said their interests align with the Biden administration's goal to boost domestic manufacturing, adding that solar supply chains would shift to continue serving the U.S. market if the government levies new import taxes."
"Their opponents disagree, noting that if the Commerce Department sides with Auxin, tariffs could be applied retroactively to shipments from a group of countries that accounted for more than 85% of U.S. solar panel imports during the final three months of 2021."
"""The reason why this [case] is so critical is [because of] what this product is — it's a product that this administration is devoted to using to fighting climate change,"" Matthew Nicely, a partner at Akin Gump Strauss Hauer & Feld LLP and lawyer for the Solar Energy Industries Association, which opposes new trade tariffs, said on an investor call Feb. 15. ""And the mere initiation of it is going to chill trade."""
"The Chinese Embassy in Washington did not respond to a message seeking comment. China denies committing human rights abuses."
"The year 2017 was recorded as the second hottest year after 2016, which is being attributed to the increasing concentration of carbon dioxide and other GHG in the atmosphere (Global Temperature Trends, 2017). Experts have warned that the global temperature rise of 2°C over the preindustrialized scenario would cause severe ramifications and make living conditions on the planet more adverse (Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, 2018). An effective instrument to promote sustainable development and mitigate GHG emissions is energy generation using renewable energy technologies (Paris Climate Agreement, United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change, 2016)."
"Based on resource availability, commercial maturity, and energy market dynamics, countries across the globe have been using a combination of policy instruments to harness renewable technologies such as wind and solar power (Butler & Neuhoff, 2008; Enzensberger, Wietschel, & Rentz, 2002; International Renewable Energy Agency [IRENA], 2012; Mallon, 2006). Cullen (2016) reviewed the renewable energy goals across countries and the policies directed at achieving those objectives."
"One of the earliest instruments was the feed-in tariff (FIT). Under this mechanism, project developers got an assured long-term tariff at a certain premium over the conventional tariff, with priority access to the grid. Germany and Spain used FIT effectively to promote their wind and solar power sectors (Couture & Gagnon, 2010). Similarly, Denmark and Netherlands, where wind turbine technology got developed, also promoted windfarms using FIT (Bauwensa, Gotchevb, & Holstenkampc, 2016)."
"Experts found FIT to be an effective climate policy instrument, leading to higher level of capacity deployment (REN 21, 2018). The assured and remunerative returns by way of FIT spurred large-scale investments in the renewable business value chain, besides contributing to research activities. Butler and Neuhoff (2008) observed that FIT helped in tariff reduction, whereas Verbruggen and Lauber (2012) found FIT promoting a broad spectrum of renewable technologies across geographies. Dong (2012) and Jenner, Grob, and Indvik (2013) commented on the effectiveness of FIT in wind and solar deployment across the EU, whereas Yildiz (2014) found FIT facilitating participation of citizens in Germany's wind sector."
"Renewable purchase specifications or renewable purchase obligations (RPS/RPO), 3 is the other policy mechanism used to promote clean energy. Experts found RPO as a key driver behind the growth of wind installations in the United States (Bird et al., 2005; Bolinger, Wiser, & Fitzgerald, 2004; Shrimali & Kniefel, 2011; Trent & Jaccard, 2001). Similarly, Mallon (2006) and Mitchell, Bauknecht, and Connor (2006) commented on the catalyzing effect of RPO on the growth of renewables in the United Kingdom."
"Comparing RPO and FIT, Rickerson, Janet, and Robert (2007) observed FIT to be appropriate for emerging technologies, whereas RPO is suitable for near-market commercial technologies. A comparative study on renewable energy in the United Kingdom and Germany by Butler and Neuhoff (2008) highlighted FIT facilitating higher deployment. Sun and Nie (2015), while comparing FIT and RPO, found FIT increasing renewable quantity and stimulating research, while RPO effective in reducing emissions. Using a panel data approach for the period 1996–2013, Shin-Je, Chang, and Chang (2017) found solar and wind FIT to be more effective than RPS for EU countries."
"Another popular fiscal policy instrument is tax credits, available in two formats as production tax credits (PTC) and investment tax credits (ITC). Availability of PTC showed a strong resonance with wind capacity addition in the United States, leading to boom and bust cycles (Barradale, 2010; Lu, Jeremy, Michael, & Chris, 2011). Shrimali, Lynes, and Indvik (2015) found PTC to increase the effectiveness of other climate policy instruments such as green power options using panel data for the 50 states of the United States for the period 1990 to 2011. Comello and Reichelstein (2016) found higher tariff and ITC making solar rooftop attractive for households in California."
"Schrader (2002) reviewed the effectiveness of environmental tax as imposed in Germany and the United Kingdom. Antonio, Scandurra, Carfora, and Fodor (2017) observed the effectiveness of climate policies in promoting renewable investments using panel data technique for the period 2004–2011 across a large number of developed and developing countries. Mariana and Ibikunle (2014), using panel data of OECD and BRICS 4 countries for the period 1990–2010, found some climate policies impeding the growth of renewables. Carfora, Pansini, Romano, and Scandurra (2018) analyzed the factors determining the choice of energy policy by undertaking an assessment of 56 developed and developing countries using Probit model for the period 2004–2011."
"In addition to the aforementioned policy instruments, several other factors influenced the growth of solar and wind power sectors. Carley (2009) found social and economic parameters such as resource endowment, political stability, per capita energy consumption, and tariff as key drivers influencing the growth of renewables in the United States. Using panel data, Shrimali and Kniefel (2011) observed state policies having a higher impact on renewable penetration in the United States. Cicea, Corina, Ion, and Cosmin (2014) highlighted the influence of gross domestic product (GDP), energy intensity, and GHG emissions impacting wind deployment in the United States. Some scholars found a correlation between GDP growth and energy demand (Apergis & Payne, 2010; Ruhul & Shuddhasattwa, 2012), whereas others correlated earning capability with the willingness to pay (Baek & Gweisah, 2013; Stigka, John, & Giouli, 2014). Shukla and Chaturvedi (2013) used an integrated assessment model to analyze emission stabilization approaches for India and concluded that sustainability push at a global level for renewable technologies is essential supported by conducive national energy policies."
"Grid integration is another important factor highlighted by many experts. Countries and regions with a substantial share of variable power find it technically challenging to manage their grids (Alishahi, Moghaddam, & Sheikh-El-Eslami, 2012). The International Energy Agency and the International Renewable Energy Agency have commented on the need for redesigning of power systems to accommodate higher volumes of renewable power in the grid (IEA, 2016; IRENA, 2015). California in the United States, with a high rooftop penetration, presents a duck-curve challenge to the grid managers (National Renewable Energy Laboratory [NREL], 2018)."
"Viktorija and Dalius (2014) found transparent governmental policy facilitating investment into the sector. Dombrovski (2015) found corruption as a major irritant to renewable investments in OECD countries. Janosch, Komendantova, and Patt (2015) found availability of cheaper funds as a major reason for higher penetration of solar projects in low resource countries such as Germany. Similarly, Jacqueline and Finenko (2016) observed a strong influence of low-cost funds on the feasibility of solar projects. Kilinc-Ata (2016) conducted an econometric analysis of factors influencing renewable deployment across 27 European countries and 50 states of the United States for the period 1990–2008 and found nuclear power consumption of electricity and price of coal as key nonpolicy drivers. Hatakeyama (2018) developed comparative indicators for Japan, with which local governments undertake effective implementation of public policy towards sustainable development. The summary of studies is presented in Table 1."
"COVID-19 disruptions to tech-metals supply are a wake-up call"
"Solar panels, wind turbines and batteries need silicon, cobalt, lithium and more to convert and store energy. Access to these elements, known as technology metals, is crucial for combating climate change. Some 3 billion tonnes of metals and minerals will be needed to decarbonize the global energy system by 2050, the World Bank estimates1 . Supplies were stretched before COVID-19. Now, the tech-metals sector is in disarray."
"The pandemic has partly or wholly closed hundreds of mines, smelters and refineries (see http://go.nature.com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/3ehkn9g ). Metals production will be at least one-third lower this year than last, with an estimated potential loss worldwide of almost US$9 billion in revenue."
"South American and African mines have been hit the hardest. https://www.mining-journal.com/covid-19/news/1388255/fifty-peru-mines-to-restart and is still https://www.reuters.com/article/us-health-coronavirus-peru-mining-exclus/exclusive-peru-mines-set-to-restart-to-hit-80-production-in-a-month-industry-official-idUSKBN22J266 . South Africa's mines, including those for platinum-group metals, were closed in March and have run at half capacity since May -- levels that are https://www-spglobal-com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/marketintelligence/en/news-insights/latest-news-headlines/south-african-mines-at-50-capacity-not-viable-says-sibanye-ceo-8211-bnn-bloomberg-58619954 ."
"Industrial demand for metals has fallen in the global slowdown2 . Factory and border closures have disrupted international supply chains, too. For example, lockdowns in China interrupted supplies of almost half of the world's battery materials earlier in the year. The city of Wuhan, where the virus was first reported, is a major manufacturing hub for vehicles and batteries. Its plants were shut from the end of January until April."
"Metals markets are volatile as a result. Prices are expected to fall by 13% on average this year2 , with decreases ranging from 0.5-4.5% for platinum, copper and aluminium, to 11% for zinc and 17% for nickel. By contrast, some scarce materials face price spikes and fierce competition to secure supplies3 - 5 . These include rare earth elements (such as cerium, yttrium, lanthanum and neodymium), which are used in computer chips, mobile phones, batteries and magnets. Demand for them is soaring because many countries want to boost their renewable-energy sectors to stimulate and decarbonize their economies6 ."
"Governments and researchers must work together to secure world supplies of technology metals. Steps include: supporting the mineral and mining sector through the pandemic; tightening regulations for the import and export of metals and sustainable extraction practices; and increasing the recycling rates of metals from electronics waste."
"Pressingly, more research and development is needed to make it easier and cleaner to produce metals, and to recover them from products that have reached the end of their useful life."
"Valuable materials"
"More than 30 metals are crucial for green-energy technologies. Aluminium and copper are most in demand, for turbine blades, wires and electrodes, for example. Cobalt, lithium, nickel and iron are key ingredients in batteries. For instance, more than 60% of mined cobalt goes into rechargeable batteries. Rare metals such as indium and gallium are widely used in electronics components, such as transistors and computer chips. Neodymium and dysporium are used in magnets."
"Demand for these 'critical metals' is skyrocketing to meet renewable-energy goals. For example, the world's capacity from wind and solar sources needs to double to deliver half of global supply by 2035 under the Paris climate agreement (see http://go.nature.com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/2jvjte7 ). More energy will need to be stored, meaning a greater need for vanadium, nickel, lithium and cobalt. Demand for these last two metals is expected to rise by up to fivefold from 2018 levels by 20501 . Other technology advances, such as 5G digital communications, are adding to pressures on these resources."
"Supplies are controlled by a small number of companies and countries. Among the biggest mining corporations by revenue are, for example, Glencore in Baar, Switzerland; BHP in Melbourne, Australia; Rio Tinto in London; and Vale in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil (see http://go.nature.com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/3ktnrme ). China supplies around 90% of rare earth elements. Chinese and European companies control cobalt production in the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC), a nation that is also rich in copper and tin, tantalum, tungsten and gold. Australia and Chile dominate the production of lithium4 , whereas southeast Asian countries produce most nickel and China produces most graphite."
"Regions that are reliant on imports are vulnerable to fluctuations in supplies, prices and political whims. Producers are not immune. For instance, in 2018 a policy change in the DRC triggered an economic cascade that suspended operations at one of the country's largest cobalt mines, Glencore's Mutanda mine. The government announced that it would treat cobalt as a strategic substance and increased its mining royalty from 2% to 10%. Price turbulence followed, exacerbated by falling demand for electric vehicles in China and bottlenecks in obtaining the chemicals needed to process the ore. Mutanda has been closed since last November, putting 20% of the world's cobalt production offline."
"The world's biggest economies recognize the risks. For example, the US Department of Energy lists 35 critical materials for technologies5 . The nation imports gallium mainly from China, the United Kingdom, Germany and Ukraine. For rare earth elements, it depends on China, Estonia, Malaysia and Japan3 . It obtains lithium from Argentina, Chile, China and Russia, whereas cobalt comes from China, Norway, Japan, Finland and the DRC5 ."
"Similarly, the European Union has a list of 30 critical raw materials. Shortages of rare earth elements could, for example, derail the https://ecdpm.org/great-insights/mining-for-development/eus-ore-metal-import-flows-engagement-towards-responsible-sourcing-industry-supply-chains 7 . China relies on imports, too -- of lithium from Australia and Chile, nickel from South Asian countries, platinum-group metals from South Africa and Russia, as well as cobalt from the DRC."
"The COVID-19 pandemic is exacerbating supply and demand problems. Wuhan's manufacturing shutdown and a 20% drop in the Chinese economy in the first quarter of this year initially drove down the prices of copper by 19.6%, nickel by 18% and cobalt by 7%. Prices have since been slowly rallying as some manufacturing has opened up. By contrast, prices of dysprosium and neodymium increased around February and March, because these metals were still highly sought after, whereas lithium and lanthanum experienced price drops around April (see 'Metals markets')."
"Source: Shanghai Metals Market"
"Metals markets. Charts showing metals price change."
"Markets are likely to remain turbulent for the next year at least, as the global economic slowdown depresses demand. Aircraft manufacturers (including Boeing and Airbus) and vehicle producers (such as Tesla, Volkswagen, Jaguar-Land Rover and Toyota) have shrunk production. Mining is still stalled across much of the world, with workers in Zambia, the DRC and South Africa subject to COVID-19 restrictions."
"Three options"
"Governments can respond in three ways."
"First: exploit other reserves. For example, improving access to deposits of rare earth elements in Brazil, Vietnam, Australia, Russia, India and Greenland would reduce reliance on China (see go.nature.com/385tusy). This is a long game-- it would take at least 15 years for Europe to establish a supply chain for rare earth elements outside China, for instance7 . And the environmental cost of developing mineral reserves is high: waste from mining can contain radioactive elements and other contaminants, and waste water from processing can release ammonia and heavy metals. All the chemicals in minerals need to be considered for clean production."
"Second: redesign technologies to use alternative materials. This needs to happen anyway. For example, cobalt is not abundant enough in Earth's crust to deliver all the batteries the world needs affordably, and it is often mined in poor social and ethical conditions. Manufacturers such as the US car maker Tesla and the battery firm CATL in China are pursuing alternative batteries that are cobalt-free. However, many replacements rely on nickel, which is carcinogenic, or iron (in lithium iron phosphate batteries), which are less efficient at storing charge. Solid state and sodium-ion batteries are other promising options."
"Third: recycle. Spent batteries and obsolete devices have higher concentrations of metals than do ores, and so extraction from these is potentially more economical. Recycling shores up supplies, even if it cannot meet rising demand. It shrinks supply chains and logistical costs. Countries or regions that have strong technology sectors, such as the EU, the United States, China, India and Japan, produce most electronic waste and could reprocess it domestically8 . There are economic, technical and regulatory barriers to overcome, however."
"Women sort electronics waste for recycling in a Vietnamese village."
"Credit: Nguyen Huy Kham/Reuters"
"Two women in straw conical hats sit on low stools sort through bowls of electrical parts for recycling"
"Recycling rates are low: worldwide only 17% of electronic waste is collected and treated. Europe has one of the highest rates (around 40% in 2018; see http://go.nature.com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/2tkqfgr ), with roughly half (40-60%) of the metal produced in the region coming from scrap (see http://go.nature.com.ezproxy.cul.columbia.edu/3tyj22t ). There's ambition to do more: the European Commission's Directive on Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment has a goal of 65% from 2019. Yet few member states have the facilities to meet it."
"In China, the recycling of spent lithium-ion batteries is beginning to supplement the supply of critical raw materials. China has made its electronics manufacturers legally responsible for recycling the products they make, or they are taxed to cover the costs."
"Yet much scrap still goes straight to landfill or (sometimes illegally) to countries such as Nigeria, Ghana, Pakistan, Tanzania and Thailand, many of which have inadequate environmental and health and safety laws. Metals and other toxic substances, such as flame retardants, lead and cadmium, contaminate soil and groundwater and damage workers' health."
"Recharge the sector"
"The following three steps need to be taken to stabilize the supply of critical metals."
"First, political leaders should support metals and minerals industries and recycling in their post-pandemic stimulus packages. With demand for green-energy technologies surging, this sector is ripe to deliver revenue and jobs. Tax relief for mines would allow them to restart. Cross-border and domestic supply chains should be protected by ensuring that raw materials can be transported from mines to plants. Governments and banks should also target investment to recycling and reuse of tech metals, to reduce reliance on imports."
"Second, researchers and manufacturers should develop a 'circular economy' for these materials8 , 9 . Products need to be more eco-friendly, less energy-hungry, longer-lasting and easier to recycle and repair. Reuse of defunct products, recovery of materials and recycling of metals all need to be integrated into industry, along with cleaner production methods9 , 10 . That will require public and private research to combine principles from metallurgical, chemical, environmental and biotechnical engineering."
"Third, states should set up a global association under the United Nations' Sustainable Development Goals to support the critical-metals sector and renewable-energy technologies. Such a body would focus on the sustainable management of mineral-metal resources, including legal, financial, technological and environmental aspects. Priorities include revitalizing the international supply chain, boosting manufacturing, transferring recycling technologies and innovating in urban waste recycling and resource recovery."
"A good model is the EU research network EIT RawMaterials, run by the European Institute of Innovation and Technology (EIT). In 2019, it established the Rare Earth Industry Association to bring academia and industry together to strengthen research and policies across the sector. Collaborators include the Association of China Rare Earth Industry, the Japan Society of Newer Metals and Europe's Critical Raw Material Alliance."
"Materials are the lifeblood of the tech sector. As the world faces economic, environmental and social upheaval, it is ever more crucial to keep supplies flowing."
"To achieve carbon neutrality and carbon reduction goals, China needs to consider industrial structure and trade. This study aims to test the validity of environmental Kuznets curve (EKC) hypothesis at the industry level in China and study the different impact of Sino-US trade in intermediate goods and trade in final goods on China’s environment. To do so, we used the annual data of China’s 25 sectors in 1990–2015 and classified 25 sectors into three main industries. Based on the Stochastic Impacts by Regression on Population, Affluence and Technology framework, we investigated the validity of EKC hypothesis and the driving factors of greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions. The results show that (1) EKC hypothesis is verified for the country and the tertiary industry. (2) Compared with the primary industry and the secondary industry, the economic growth of the tertiary industry brings less GHG emissions. (3) Intermediate goods exported to all sectors in the USA will increase GHG emissions in the country and the three main industries, but final goods exported to consumers in the USA will reduce GHG emissions except the tertiary industry. From our results, the EKC hypothesis is a suitable model for environmental policy in tertiary industry, but it does not apply to the primary industry and the secondary industry. Environmental policy in the primary industry and the secondary industry needs to focus on reducing energy intensity. In the case of exports to the USA, intermediate goods pollute the environment, while final improve the environment. Thus, China needs to increase controls on exports of intermediate goods with low added value and high pollution and gradually shift to the production of environmentally friendly final goods."
"Access provided by Columbia University Libraries"
"Introduction"
"In the past few centuries, the world economy has developed prosperously. However, with the rapid growth of global economy, the world has fallen into the dilemma of dealing with environmental degradation, such as the greenhouse effect. Global average surface temperature in 2006–2015 is 0.87 °C higher than that in 1850–1900. If the warming rate continues, global warming may reach 1.5 °C from 2030 to 2052 (IPCC 2018). The main driving factor of global warming are the GHG emissions, the most important of which is CO2 (Liu and Xiao 2018; Zhang et al. 2019). The international community is increasingly concerned about carbon emissions reduction. Countries including China are looking for a win-win policy of economic growth and GHG emissions reduction (Sheng et al. 2021)."
"China’s rapid economic growth has a great impact on the world economy and has attracted the world’s attention. Based on the statistics from the World Bank, the gross domestic product (GDP) in China has grown from 827.87 billion dollars in 1990 to 11,520.04 billion dollars in 2019 (constant dollar in 2010), and the annual growth rate of GDP has always remained above 6% (World Bank 2020). However, China’s rapid economic growth has accelerated energy consumption and CO2 emissions, which makes China the biggest carbon emitter. In 2015, China proposed in the Paris Agreement that China would peak CO2 emissions by 2030. In 2020, China has clearly proposed the goal of achieving carbon neutrality by 2060. According to the report, from 2005 to 2019, the CO2 emission per GDP of China decreased by 48%, the proportion of coal consumption decreased from 72.4% to 57.7%, and the proportion of non-fossil energy rose to 15.3% (Project comprehensive report preparation group 2020). Nevertheless, China still faces three difficult tasks including economic restructuring, energy structure optimization, and establishment of green and low-carbon economic system."
"With the deepening of globalization, international trade has greatly promoted China’s economic growth. The USA is the main country of trade for China, and the continuous expansion of bilateral trade scale between China and the USA greatly promotes the economy. However, trade not only promotes the economy but also influences the environment. Grossman and Krueger (1991) suggested that the impact of trade on the environment include scale effect, structural effect, and technology effect. The impact of trade on the environment of each country is uncertain, and it depends on the comprehensive impact of the three effects (Liu and Dong 2017)."
"Global policy makers recognize the importance of environmental protection in the process of economic growth, and China is no exception. In order to achieve the goal of reducing emissions, it is helpful to study the relationship between GHG emissions and economic growth. Environmental Kuznets curve (EKC) is a common theoretical basis of studying the relationship between environmental stress and economic growth (Wang et al. 2017). Stochastic Impacts by Regression on Population, Affluence, and Technology (STIRPAT) model, which is a quantitative analysis framework used to study the impact of population, affluence, and technology on the environment, is often used in the study of EKC hypothesis (Liu and Xiao 2018; Lin et al. 2016; Wang et al. 2016;). Many existing studies focus on the validity of EKC hypothesis at the geographical level (Dong et al. 2018; Lin et al. 2016; Altıntaş and Kassouri 2020;). However, the difference in the validity of EKC hypotheses is not just at the geographical level. Al Mamun et al. (2014) pointed out that different sectors may have different levels of economic growth and different environmental stress contributions. Accordingly, we raise a question: Does the difference in the validity of EKC hypotheses exist at the industry level? In addition, with the development of international trade, trade in intermediate goods is rapidly increasing (Zhang 2020). The impact of trade in intermediate goods and trade in final goods on environment may be different. Therefore, we propose the second question: Is there a difference in the impact of trade in intermediate goods and trade in final goods on China’s environment? Based on the above questions, this paper uses GHG emissions as an indicator of environmental stress to test the validity of EKC hypothesis at the industry level in China and study the different impact of Sino-US trade in intermediate goods and trade in final goods on China’s environment. Figure 1 shows the framework of this study.Based on the country and the three main industries panels data which are consist of annual data of 25 sectors in China from 1990 to 2015, this article uses PCSE estimation technology and semi-parametric panel-fixed effect model to verify the validity of EKC hypothesis between GHG emissions and economic growth of China and its three main industries. Furthermore, two trade-related variables are added into STIRPAT framework: intermediate goods exported to all sectors in the USA and final goods exported to consumers in the USA, and the impact of China’s export trade toward the USA on China’s environment is studied. The conclusions are as follows:"
"First, EKC hypothesis is verified for the country, but EKC hypothesis is not widely verified for China’s three main industries. It is found that the EKC hypothesis is valid only in the tertiary industry, but not in the primary and secondary industries. This means that EKC hypothesis is not a suitable model for sustainable development policy in the primary and secondary industries, whose economic growth will inevitably increase GHG emissions, while the tertiary industry can achieve decoupling between GHG emissions and economic growth."
"Second, economic growth is the main positive factor for the increase of GHG emissions in the country and the three main industries. However, differences exist in the three main industries with respect to the impact of economic growth. The results show that compared with the primary industry and the secondary industry, the economic growth of the tertiary industry brings less GHG emissions. Energy intensity and energy structure are also positive factors of GHG emissions. Compared with the adjustment of energy structure, reducing energy intensity is a more effective way to reduce GHG emissions. From the results, we believe that the economic growth of China’s tertiary industry is greener, and China can further increase the proportion of tertiary industry to improve the industrial structure. In addition, improving energy intensity should be a priority in policy making to reduce GHG emissions."
"Third, China’s export trade toward the USA has an impact on China’s environment. The impact of export of intermediate goods and that of export of final goods are different, and the three main industries also have heterogeneity. It is found that intermediate goods exported to all sectors in the USA from the primary and secondary industries will increase GHG emissions, while final goods exported to consumers in the USA will reduce GHG emissions. The tertiary industry will increase GHG emissions whether it exports intermediate goods to all sectors or final goods to consumers in the USA. This means that in the case of exports to the USA, intermediate goods pollute the environment, while final improve the environment. In the future, China should try to avoid undertaking the production of export goods with low added value and high pollution and increase the control on pollution of export goods to promote the development of high-quality trade."
"Policy suggestions"
"This article confirms the EKC hypothesis of GHG emissions in the country and the tertiary industry, which means that economic growth can be a solution to reduce emissions. However, we believe that economic growth needs to be regulated. The government should adhere to sustainable development, change the previous economic growth model, and strive to lead a low-carbon economy, so as to reach the inflection point as soon as possible. Therefore, China needs to accelerate the transformation of energy structure and establish a clean and low-carbon energy system. China needs to strictly control coal consumption, reduce the proportion of fossil energy, promote wind energy, solar energy, nuclear energy, and other clean energy technologies, and gradually form an energy structure dominated by clean energy. Additionally, the government needs to encourage enterprises to develop low-carbon environmental protection technology and reduce energy intensity and energy waste. In addition, it needs to establish a nationwide carbon trading market, commercialize carbon assets, and take market means to force enterprises to pay attention to carbon emission reduction, so as to reduce the cost of carbon emission reduction. It should accelerate the construction of a green financial system, bringing green credit and green bonds into the scope of monetary policy guarantee, and realizing green recovery and green development through the green financial system."
"In terms of industry, China needs to further relax the market access of the service industry, vigorously develop the service industry, further increase the proportion of the tertiary industry, and realize the transition from the industrialization stage to the post industrialization stage. We will continue to eliminate the backward production capacity of the secondary industry, transform high energy-consuming industries, and further reduce carbon emissions produced from industrial production. We will use the internet of things, big data, artificial intelligence, and other new technologies to promote the intellectualization and low-carbon of traditional industries and build the low-carbon environmental protection industry into a new strategic industry for national economic growth."
"In terms of trade, China should avoid the transfer of pollution-intensive enterprises from developed countries, encourage export enterprises to transform from pollution-intensive type to technology-intensive type, and realize high-quality green trade. In foreign trade, we should pay attention to the introduction of clean technology and expand the technical effect of trade. We should establish a low-carbon certification service system for export products, guide export enterprises to carry out research and development of low-carbon emission technology, promote the reduction of carbon emission of enterprises through regulations, and improve the competitiveness of export products. At the same time, low-carbon certification of export products can help export enterprises to effectively pass through green barriers."
""
""
"U.S. Senator Marco Rubio (R-FL) joined Senators Rob Portman (R-OH), Sherrod Brown (D-OH), Bob Casey (D-PA), Mike Braun (R-IN), and Roger Marshall (R-KS) in sending a letter to President Joe Biden urging him to heed the unanimous recommendation of the International Trade Commission (ITC) and extend the Section 201 safeguard tariffs on Chinese-manufactured solar panels for another four years."
"In May 2017, U.S. solar panel manufacturers filed a Section 201 safeguard petition with the ITC, seeking global tariffs in response to surges of solar panels, particularly from China. The ITC unanimously found that surging imports had injured U.S. solar panel producers. In January 2018, President Trump concurred with the ITC recommendation to impose a four year safeguard measure on foreign solar panels. With the safeguard set to expire, and the ITC recommending the renewal of safeguard tariffs, it is up to the Biden Administration to extend the tariffs for another four years to protect American solar panel manufacturers. In the letter, the senators noted that it is vital for the extended safeguard to apply to bifacial solar modules, which are currently not subject to the current tariff regime. The importation of Chinese-manufactured bifacial solar panels is also causing serious harm to domestic solar manufacturers."
"""American solar manufacturing should be a key part of the clean energy economy, but despite the United States leading the world in solar research and development, China's exploitative industrial and trade practices continue to hinder the growth of a strong U.S. solar supply chain,"" the senators wrote. ""We can only build that capacity if our trade laws are utilized and enforced to the fullest extent possible. Doing so will support American workers and businesses, promote fair trade, minimize the environmental impacts of solar manufacturing and reduce global supply chain reliance on forced labor."""
"* * *"
"January 20, 2022"
"To: President Joseph Biden, 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue N.W., Washington, D.C."
"Dear President Biden:"
"We write in support of extending, for four years, the safeguard duties imposed on imported solar products pursuant to Section 201 of the Trade Act of 1974, and applying the extended duties to imported bifacial solar products. We urge you to consider the U.S. International Trade Commission's (ITC) unanimous recommendation that Section 201 relief should be extended so that the domestic solar industry can complete a positive adjustment to import competition and avoid further serious injury. It is in our national interest to support American workers whose jobs are threatened by surging imports, many of which are traded unfairly by China."
"According to the ITC, the current Section 201 duties have been an essential safeguard measure, helping our domestic industry expand and upgrade production and create new jobs. In fact, the United States has set records for solar deployment every year that the safeguard measures have been in place; deployment in 2019 exceeded deployment in 2018 by 23 percent, and 2020 set a new record for solar installations."
"We are pleased to see that the safeguard is working; however, the goal of the safeguard is to provide the time and space for our domestic solar industry to get back on its feet, and achieving this goal will require additional time. Between the COVID-19 pandemic and the continued exclusion for bifacial solar panels, the domestic industry and its workers continue to reel from import pressure. As you consider whether to extend the solar safeguard, we urge you to extend the duties imposed on imported solar panels for four years, noting that the ITC makes clear: ""an extension of less than four years would not appear sufficient for the industry's efforts to adjust to import competition."" As such, we consider it vital to include bifacial solar products as part of any extension to ensure the integrity and success of the safeguard moving forward."
"Moreover, the temporary support to domestic industry provided by the safeguard also helps preserve the interests of the United States in pursuing improved environmental quality and human rights. We do not accept the premise that the only way for our country to invest in renewable energy sources is to remain dependent on Chinese-produced, and other imported, goods. In fact, we can reduce emissions by fostering increased capacity for domestic solar cell and module manufacturing, since products manufactured in the United States are among the most environmentally friendly in the world and built with strong labor standards."
"Further, continued dependence on China in this regard rewards and encourages the continuation of the forced labor atrocities committed against the Uyghurs and other predominantly Muslim ethnic groups in the Xinjiang Uyghur Autonomous Region. There is serious and justified concern that Chinese polysilicon manufacturing is propped up by exploitation of Uyghurs and others, and understand that polysilicon produced by forced labor is widely used in imported solar products from not only China, but from third-countries as well."
"American solar manufacturing should be a key part of the clean energy economy, but despite the United States leading the world in solar research and development, China's exploitative industrial and trade practices continue to hinder the growth of a strong U.S. solar supply chain. We can only build that capacity if our trade laws are utilized and enforced to the fullest extent possible. Doing so will support American workers and businesses, promote fair trade, minimize the environmental impacts of solar manufacturing and reduce global supply chain reliance on forced labor. In this instance it will also help to facilitate significant growth in the domestic solar supply chain, as well as in the domestic clean technology sector as a whole."
"The US government recently imposed countervailing duties on imports of Chinese-made solar panels used to generate electricity. The measure was based on the accusation that Chinese solar producers received unfair government subsidies. The dispute comes at a time when world demand for solar panels has been growing rapidly such that the world is expected to produce 11 percent of global electricity from solar energy. To encourage the development of solar-generated electricity, many countries in the world including the United States have been giving financial and non-financial support to the industry, and China is not the only country to support its domestic solar industry."
"Keywords: Trade, Tariffs, China, USA, Solar industry."
"INTRODUCTION"
"Solar energy is the most abundant source of energy on earth, and a modern technology referred to as Crystalline Silicon Photovoltaic Systems (C-Si-PV, abbreviated to PV) is used to convert solar energy to electricity. The basic element of the technology is the PV cell, a semiconductor device which does the conversion. When connected, PV cells form a PV module (panel), which, when integrated with additional accessories create PV systems which can produce megawatts (MW = million watts) of electric power. OECD's International Energy Agency (IEA) predicts PV technology to supply over 10% of global electric power (Technology Roadmap, 2010). The G-8 summit in 2008 in Aomori, Japan, adopted a common policy to provide concerted public support and incentive systems to make PV technology more efficient because solar power holds promise to address global challenges of energy security, climate change, and sustainable development. In the midst of concerted and unified global efforts, however, cross-national disputes arise, as in the case of US-China dispute. In October 2011, seven US solar manufacturers filed petition with Department of Commerce (DOC) seeking action against Chinese PV industry. The seven companies were led by an affiliate of a German company named Solar World AG who had filed similar complaint with the German government and the EU in 2009, but was turned down in Europe (USITC, 2011). The countervailing duty (CVD) petition claimed producers in China received unfair government subsidies. In December, 2011, DOC imposed countervailing (CVD) duties on Chinese companies (Bradsher, 2011)."
"SOLAR INDUSTRY"
"Global demand for PV systems has been growing at 40 percent a year and in 2010, there were 23,000 megawatts of PV installations worldwide, generating the equivalent of 23 nuclear power plants. The rapid growth has been spurred by numerous government subsidy programs. A famous such program is known as Feed-in-Tariff(FIT), which guarantees fixed price for solar energy producers, and is used in over 60 countries worldwide including the United States, where solar PV systems are projected to grow to 50,000 MW and supply 8 percent of the nation's electricity by the year 2025 (Study, 2008). US government also supports solar energy by subsidized loans, tax credits, land grants, and, on a state-by-state basis, mandates the use of solar electric power. An example is the state of California which recently enacted legislation requiring utility companies to obtain a minimum of 33 percent of their electric power from renewable energy (Baker, 2011). Solar power in the US has been growing at about 40 percent a year, and the cost per kilowatt-hour of solar PV systems has been declining, in part due to declining cost of components."
"Globally, the largest country installer of PV systems is Germany with capacity of 10,000 megawatts. Europe's share of global PV market was about 73 percent in 2010, as Figure 1 shows. US share is 6 percent and growing, China and Korea 2 percent each and growing rapidly, and the rest of world 9 percent."
"Between 2010 and 2011, as the data in Table 1 show, world demand grew by 69.3 percent, and the rate of growth for the regions in the world ranged from 941 percent in the United Kingdom, 257 in Italy, 224 in China, 211 in Israel, 144 in France, 66.7 in the United States, 29.9 in Japan, and so on. Even Greece, the country facing dismal economic outlook, increased its capacity by an impressive 167 percent. Enticed by such phenomenal demand, new producers entered the industry and existing producers expanded by means of added capacity, mergers and acquisitions. In China, many companies entered the industry anew in the middle of the decade contributing to the significant increase in China's output, both in absolute as well as relative terms."
"The size of PV market in Europe did not go unnoticed by US producers who have concentrated their production and marketing strategies to serve the European export market. An executive at one US Company involved in the case put it this way, ""demand outside the United States is the critical driver of success in the (US) industry"" (USITC, 2011). Demand in Europe, however, is beginning to decline. Beginning in March 2012, Germany scaled back its subsidy program by 29 percent and plans to continue cutting. Other European countries like UK, France, Spain, and Italy have also begun scaling back their subsidies due to financial constraints facing European governments. Demand in the US, however, has been growing steadily due to government mandates and a national policy of increasing reliance on renewable energy. As of 2011, the US has under construction some 77 utility-scale projects with a total capacity of 13,200 megawatts. Suddenly, US producers' export market in Europe is stagnating and domestic market in the US is expanding. Arguably, that may have caused US producers to lobby the government to protect the domestic market against foreign imports."
"Production"
"Spurred by remarkable demand and government support programs, production of PV systems has been growing spectacularly. Global output was 277 MW in 2000 and rose to 24,000 MW in 2010 (1000 MW is equal to a gigawatt, GW), an increase of 6,376 percent. As the data in the Table 2 show, all countries increased their production. In the United States, output in 2010 was 1486 percent the 2000 level; Germany 8791 percent; Japan 1681 percent, and so on. Japan was the world leader between 2000 and 2007. In 2001, Japan produced 46 percent of world output, and the United States produced 27 percent. China produced less than one percent. In the second half of the decade, though, China accelerated its production capacity and replaced Japan as the world leader producing 46 percent of world output in 2010."
"Price"
"PV price in world markets seems to fall 20 percent when production capacity rises 100%. Volume doubled between 2002 and 2004, and price fell from $2.20 to $1.80, and between 2007 and 2009, volume more than doubled and price fell by almost 40 percent. After 2008, price declined faster and reached $1.00 in 2011 (World Solar, 2012). Considering that China's output was less than 7 percent of world PV production until the middle of the decade, it is doubtful that China was the driver behind the price decline in world markets. In his address before USITC, economist Kenneth Button stated that consistent with the history of wide range of semiconductor type products, the price of PV modules has been declining progressively for many years, long before Chinese producers entered the PV market (Button, 2011). Studies at George Washington University concluded that once Chinese producers began to achieve economies of scale, their prices for PV modules became more efficient and gradually became identical to world prices, not lower (Bayaliyev, Kalloz, & Robinson, 2011). The decline in price of PV produced in China can better be explained by pointing to classic competitive imperatives: Fall in the price of production inputs especially polysilicon, erosion of barriers to entry to the market resulting in an industry with fierce price rivalry, cost efficiencies resulting from economies of scale, and industry oversupply."
"US POLICY"
"US policy toward solar energy is one of long term and multi-faceted support as manifested by numerous policies and programs such as the Solar America Initiative (SAI) to make solar energy cost efficient and competitive with conventional forms of electricity (grid parity), and the Department of Energy's (DOE) Sun Shot Initiative and Solar Energy Technology Program (SETP) to provide financial and other forms of assistance to industry in the following areas: Market Transformation, to address marketplace barriers and create opportunity for market expansion; Device and Process Proof of Concept, to support R&D to develop more efficient devices and processes; Component Prototype and Pilot Scale Production, to support R&D to generate prototype PV components; and, System Development and Manufacturing, to support industry and university collaboration to develop solar technologies (Solar Power, 2012). As recently as June 2012, DOE announced awarding $56 million to support advanced solar power technologies (Energy Department, 2012)."
"The US Energy Information Administration (EIA) published a report in August, 2011 titled Direct Federal Financial Interventions and Subsidies in Energy (Analysis, 2011). EIA identifies five subsidy and support programs for energy industries: Direct cash expenditures to producers and consumers; tax subsidies to reduce federal tax liability for producers and consumers; R&D expenditures primarily to producers; loans and loan guarantees; and electricity expansion programs for certain geographic regions in the country. According to EIA, the value of direct federal financial subsidies in energy markets doubled between 2007 and 2010, growing from $17.9 billion to $37.2 billion. With regard to solar power, EIA identifies key expenditures and subsidies, summarized in Table 3."
"Another government support program is the dedication of vast areas of Federal Lands for solar power projects. In 2012, the Bureau of Land Management is dedicating Solar Energy Zones, the combined areas of which come up to 98 million acres in many states for the long term goal of facilitating the generation of up to 10 million Megawatts (Renewable Energy, 2012). Table 4 shows a sample of the Zones."
"In addition to all Federal support programs, governments at many state and even municipality levels give support and subsidy to solar producers and users. States like California, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Louisiana, Hawaii, Michigan and many others have diverse support and subsidy programs. Government subsidies to solar industry are popular in America. According to a 2011 survey of public opinion, nine out of 10 Americans support the development and use of solar technology, and eight out of 10 people say that the federal government should support solar manufacturing in the U.S. and should give federal subsidies for solar energy (Leone, 2011)."
"ANALYSIS AND CONCLUSION"
"The CVD petition that started this trade dispute was filed by a local affiliate to a German company and six anonymous US companies, claiming material ""injury"" from Chinese imports. In response, a much larger number of companies in the US solar industry, including the over 100 companies represented by the Coalition of Affordable Solar Energy (CASE), spoke up against the petition. CASE made the argument that companies in the industries of selling, installing, distributing and servicing PV panels, and employing thousands of workers, would get hurt and possibly go out of business if the government were to impose punitive duties on Chinese products. It turns out that the US solar industry employs about 100,000 workers of which 57% are in the installation business, 21% are in sales and distribution, and only 14% in manufacturing (Nash-Hoff, 2012). Demand for PV systems continues to be price sensitive, and any increase in price due to punitive tariffs could dampen demand and hurt the business of the US companies employing 86 percent of the industry's workforce. A recent study published in January of 2012 predicted that tariffs on imported PV products from China will result in as many as 50,000 lost jobs in the US. Furthermore, retaliatory tariffs placed on US exports of polysilicon to China would put another 11,000 American jobs at risk in the first year alone (Brattle Group, 2012)."
"As for the world view of the industry and financial support, the world community considers solar energy as a promising solution to important environmental and economic challenges that is worthy of public support. In a recent publication by the International Energy Agency of the OECD, IEA states that development of affordable, inexhaustible and clean solar energy technologies will have huge long-term benefits. It will increase countries' energy security through reliance on an indigenous, inexhaustible and mostly import-independent resource, enhance sustainability, reduce pollution, lower the costs of mitigating climate change, and keep fossil fuel prices lower than otherwise. These advantages are global. Hence the additional costs of the incentives for early deployment should be considered learning investments (Solar Energy, 2011). IEA estimates that by 2050, PV will provide 11 percent of global electricity production and avoid 2.3 gigatonnes of CO2 emissions per year (Gigatonne is equal to ten billion tons). IEA advocates the continuation of government support until PV achieves grid parity, i.e. competitiveness with electricity grid retail prices, estimated to occur in 2020. Once grid parity is achieved, IEA endorses progressive phase-out of the majority of economic incentives, but continue support for R&D to advance the technology and reduce cost (Technology Roadmap, 2010)."
"As for government subsidies of solar industry, the US government has a strong policy of advocating and supporting solar energy. The Economic Report of the President in 2010 boasts of government's subsidies of tens of billions of dollars for production and generous tax credits for consumption of PV systems (Ikenson, 2012). Even the USITC, the government agency that investigated the CVD petition, made reference to the environment-friendly government incentive measures, and other policies including those that stem from national obligations under international environmental agreements (such as the Kyoto Protocol), have contributed to the growth of certain segments of the industry of producing electricity from renewable energy especially solar and wind (USITC, 2011). In this global environment of world-wide and US government support for solar energy by means of subsidies and other financial and non-financial incentives, it is an occasion for the DOC to reconsider the imposition of CVD tariffs."
""
"China’s solar PV industry has experienced a remarkable period of rapid growth in recent decades. In 2008, China became the largest PV producer and exporter, with exports reaching 11.7 billion US dollars, approximately 69 times higher than that in 2001. While the onset of the global financial crisis retarded the development of the Chinese PV industry, China still dominates the global solar PV market. As of 2016, China installed 34.5 GW of new solar PV and exported 16.7 billion US dollars of PV products, accounting for a global market share of 45% and 34%, respectively.1 Many researchers have directed their attention toward investigating the driving forces behind China’s PV industry. Several factors have been found to be important in explaining the unprecedented growth of the PV industry. These include consistent and multidimensional policy support, research and development (R&D), technological learning, factor endowment advantage in labor force and raw material as well as reduction of external trade barriers (de la Tour, Glachant, and Ménière 2011; Goodrich et al. 2013; Grau, Huo, and Neuhoff 2012; Groba and Cao 2015; Liu and Goldstein 2013; Zhao, Wang, and Yu 2016). While the determinants of China’s installed PV capacity and export value have been well documented at an aggregate level, the behaviors of PV firms at the micro level have not been explored, to the best of our knowledge. This article uses highly disaggregated firm-level data to investigate a relatively unexplored dimension of export pricing behavior. Examining firm-level export pricing has implications for more clearly understanding the sources of competitiveness of China’s solar PV industry, which is a serious concern for policy makers and firm owners. We aim to answer the following questions: (1) Are there any differences in export prices of solar products across firms and destinations? If yes, what factors contribute the differences? (2) How does China acquire and maintain the largest share of the global solar PV market? More specifically, does its competitiveness stem from price competition or quality competition?Recent studies have established that export prices differ systematically across exporting firms and destinations, even within narrowly defined product categories (Harrigan, Ma, and Shlychkov 2015; Manova and Zhang 2012; Martin 2012). This also holds true for solar PV products. For instance, the average price of China’s solar panel (Harmonized System code 85,414,020) exported to the United States was 42% higher than the price of the solar panel exported to Canada in 2013.2 This systematic price dispersion reflects the difference in the quality and feature of an exported product, which could further serve to discriminate how China’s solar exporters position their products competitively in the international market. The competitiveness of China’s solar product depends upon nothing but price or quality; when China dominates the global solar market, it must charge relatively low price or provide high-quality product. The nature of China’s competitiveness prevailing in the international solar trade (price competition versus quality competition) could be distinguished by examining the sign of the correlation between export price and some firm or destination characteristic variables, such as distance, market size, firm productivity, and financial conditions. In the workhorse model of heterogeneous firms, Melitz (2003) predicts that only firms with productivity above a certain threshold level can export. Firms with higher productivity have lower marginal costs, are able to charge lower prices, and earn higher revenues. This price competition model thus predicts that the cheapest products are the most competitive. Some later studies (Baldwin and Harrigan 2011; Crozet, Hatte, and Zignago 2013; Verhoogen 2008) further turn the standard heterogeneous firms trade model into the quality competition model by incorporating quality differentiation across products. In these models, competitiveness depends upon the qualityadjusted price, and the association between observed price and competitiveness is reversed. Firms that are more competitive will make use of better-quality, more expensive inputs and therefore face higher marginal costs and prices. These clearly opposed implications regarding the relationship between competitiveness and export price provide the foundation to distinguish between price and quality competition. For example, several studies have investigated how exporters compete in the international market by estimating the price-distance relationship (Baldwin and Ito 2011; Crozet, Hatte, and Zignago 2013; Rollo 2012). They argue that, as trade costs rise with bilateral distance, products with the lowest price could be exported to the most distant destinations when price competition dominates, leading to a negative relationship between export price and distance. Inversely, if quality competition prevails, export price should increase with the distance of the destination market. Using the Heckman two-stage estimates, this article empirically investigates export price variations and competition patterns for solar PV products across firms and destinations when there is selection into exporting. We find that there are substantial differences in export prices across firms and destinations, even within PV products narrowly defined at the 8-digit Harmonized System (HS) level. These vast price differences could be attributed to country and firm heterogeneity. After controlling for selection bias, we find that although export prices fall systematically with firm age, they respond positively to the importer’s income, electricity generation from solar sources, implementation of solar policy, firm size, capital intensity, and their status as a state-owned enterprise (SOE). Furthermore, more importantly, we find that more productive firms and firms exporting to larger markets tend to compete in quality, while firms with better financial conditions are more likely to compete in price. Our study contributes to three strands in previous research. First, our study relates to the literature that investigates the determinants of solar industry development and cross-border “green” trade (i.e., trade for renewable energy and other environmentally friendly products). Several studies have quantified the determining factors of total export of “green” products. They find that trade liberalization, foreign direct investment, government policy, and other traditional gravity variables are important in fostering trade in clean products (Algieri, Aquino, and Succurro 2011; Costantini and Mazzanti 2012; Groba and Cao 2015; Sawhney and Kahn 2012; Zhao, Wang, and Yu 2016). Previous studies also focus on the pricing decisions of solar products. Gillingham et al. (2014) investigate the determinants of the prices of solar PV systems in the United States. They find considerable price dispersions of solar PV systems, both across locations and within agiven location. Such dispersions arise from differences in government policies, market structure, and firm-specific characteristics. Kimura and Zissler (2016) compare the prices of solar PV systems in Japan with those in Germany and find that prices were almost two times higher in Japan than in Germany in 2014. They argue that module costs and construction costs contribute to the price differences. Seel, Barbose, and Wiser (2014) follow a similar approach to price differences in residential PV systems in the United States and Germany. They find that average residential PV system prices in Germany are roughly half of those in the United States and that this price discrepancy stems primarily from differences in soft costs. The majority of these studies mainly rely on country-level data; empirical studies at the firm level and even the product level remain scarce. This article attempts to fill this gap in the literature by empirically investigating export pricing behaviors of Chinese solar exporters at a firm level. Our dataset covers 140 of China’s export markets and 2,006 solar PV exporting firms for the period 2000–2013. Second, our study also contributes to the literature on examining whether the pricing behaviors of exporting firms correspond to price or quality competition models. In a pioneering work, Baldwin and Ito (2011) attempt to classify the disaggregated export products as facing either price competition or quality competition. They find that a high proportion of products could be classified as qualitycompetition goods for the major EU countries, and the lower proportion is for Canada, Australia, and China. Crozet, Hatte, and Zignago (2013) follow up on the study of Baldwin and Ito (2011) by estimating the impact of market accessibility on export price. They find that price competition dominates in countries specialized in high-quality goods, while quality competition is more important when specialization is in low-quality goods. Rollo (2012) and Manova and Zhang (2012) also discuss the implications of their empirical findings in light of the predictions of price and quality competition models. Both of them find evidence favoring quality competition models. Most of the existing studies distinguish between price and quality competition by estimating the relationship between price and country characteristic variable, shedding no light on the impact of firm characteristic. However, recent studies have confirmed that some firm characteristics, such as firm productivity and financial constraint, are important in affecting the competition pattern (Baldwin and Harrigan 2011; Fan, Lai, and Li 2015; Verhoogen 2008). In addition, some country characteristic variable such as distance is time invariant. Its inclusion in the regression model excludes the possibility of controlling for the unobserved time-invariant destination fixed effects, which could bias the estimator. Therefore, our study builds on the literature by estimating the relationship between price and several time-variant country and firm characteristic variables. Third, our study is part of a larger agenda to examine export price variations across firms and destinations. Starting with Schott (2004), several studies have provided empirical explanations for the vast export price differences, including Harrigan, Ma, and Shlychkov (2015) using US data, Martin (2012) using French data, Bastos and Silva (2010) using Portuguese data, and Manova and Zhang (2012) and Ge, Lai, and Zhu (2015) using Chinese data. Our study is closer to those of Manova and Zhang (2012) and Ge, Lai, and Zhu (2015), both of which also investigate Chinese export price dispersion at the firm level. However, Ge, Lai, and Zhu (2015) focus on multinational price premiums for general products, and Manova and Zhang (2012) mainly examine the relationship between export price, country characteristics, and firm revenue, offering little evidence for many other firm-level determinants, while our analysis focuses on both country- and firm-level factors affecting export prices of particular PV products. More importantly, given that firms are heterogeneous and not all select into exporting, a firm’s pricing decision can only be observed when it starts to sell in a destination market. This leads to the conclusion that selection into exporting is correlated with pricing strategy. Estimates that do not take selection into account, therefore, suffer from a selection bias. However, the selection bias is not accounted for in many existing export price studies. In this article, we further build on Manova and Zhang (2012) and Ge, Lai, and Zhu (2015) by concentrating our attention on the quantitative importance of market selection in shaping pricing behavior. The remainder of the article is structured as follows. The stylized facts section presents a set of stylized facts regarding China’s exports of solar PV products. The methodology and data sectiondescribes the data and methodology used to investigate the pricing behavior of Chinese solar PV exporting firms. The results and discussions section presents and discusses the empirical findings. The final section concludes."
"This article addresses the implications and remaining challenges behind the seemingly happy ending of the recent EU–China trade dispute on solar products. First, the EU's choice of a specific trade defence measure – anti-dumping – was based on shaky arguments. Second, further trade disputes on green goods are very likely, in particular because China is increasingly implementing domestic support policies on green sectors, bringing down Chinese export prices. Third, trade defence measures could be adopted as an expensive option. Alternatively to this, the EU and China could consider setting up constructive and preventive mechanisms in order to stabilize trade and broaden their economic relationship."
"Policy relevance"
"In July 2013 the EU accepted an undertaking by Chinese solar wafer, cell, and module manufacturers to fix minimum import prices for their products, along with a volume cap to be imposed on Chinese solar exports to the EU. In spite of the seemingly happy end of a trade dispute between the two major players in the renewables sector, we show that the possibility of trade disputes over low-carbon products in the near future cannot be ruled out. Drawing on the China–EU photovoltaic ‘dumping case', we highlight some weaknesses in the EU's choice to resort to anti-dumping measures and emphasize the urgent need to invent new forms of trade dialogues between the EU and China as first-choice trade dispute settlement policies."
"On 5 June 2013, the European Commission (EC) imposed provisional anti-dumping duties on EU imports of solar panels from China on the grounds that Chinese solar panels were exported at a price lower than their production cost and that this gap created severe injury to the EU's photovoltaic (PV) industry. After fierce negotiations, the Commission accepted, on 2 August 2013, an undertaking offered by the majority of Chinese solar panel exporters that limits module imports to 7 GW annually at a minimum price of €0.56/watt. Companies outside the agreement or in breach of it are liable for punitive import duties averaging 47.7%. The deal was commended by EU trade officials as the amicable solution sought by both the EU and China."
"Footnote"
"1 Bearing in mind the dispute over the inclusion of civil aviation in the EU Emissions Trading System, which China resolutely opposed, this settlement has shown that amicable solutions can indeed help ease economic tensions between key trade players in the low-carbon and climate change-related industries and prevent long-lasting and costly dispute settlement at the World Trade Organisation (WTO) Dispute Settlement Body (DSB). Yet, as both the EU and China have identified green and low-carbon sectors as key drivers for economic growth, the possibility of trade conflicts over low-carbon products in the near future cannot be ruled out. In various statements, the EU PV industry has reasserted that it remains unhappy with the amicable solution."
"Footnote"
"2 EU ProSun, the alliance of European solar manufacturers that brought the Chinese anti-dumping case, said on 3 December 2013 that it was confident the European Court of Justice would rule that the resolution of the deal is not in line with the Commission's own rules."
"Footnote"
"3"
"a number of articles have been published that focus on EU–China PV policies. For example, the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC, "
"Citation"
"2012) conducted a full review of a range of renewable energy technologies, analysing the effectiveness of related supportive policies by policy type. Grau, Huo, and Neuhoff ("
"Citation"
"2012) provided an overview of the PV industry and policies in Germany and China, pointing to the need for further cost reduction throughout the global value chain and for global policy coordination that reaches beyond increasingly national and local interests. Groba and Cao ("
"Citation"
"2014) assessed China's wind and PV technology export determinants by using a gravity model, highlighting the implications for Europe."
"To our knowledge, none of the existing studies provides an explanation for the sudden imbalances in EU–China PV trade and on the rationale for setting up anti-dumping measures at EU borders. This article is a first attempt to provide a rough political and economic appraisal of the deal struck on 2 August 2013 and confirmed by the definitive decision from the Commission on 2 December 2013. Our main finding is that the deal does not mitigate the risk of future trade disputes between Europe and China in the renewables sector. In the first place, the specific trade defence instrument contemplated by the EC (anti-dumping) in the early stages of the trade conflict is problematic, as it could lead to criticism and possible retaliation from its trading partners (see Section 2). Second, and more importantly, China has increasingly implemented domestic policies to support its industries, particularly its strategic and emerging sectors (SESs), most of which are green sectors. These policies are likely to bring down Chinese export prices, which in turn will lead to further trade disputes (see Section 3). Trade defence measures could be adopted as an expensive option in economic terms, although political gains would remain short-term. Alternatively, the EU and China could consider setting up constructive and preventive policy coordination mechanisms in order to stabilize trade flows and broaden their economic relationship (see Section 4)."
"2. Dumping anti-dumping"
"Following complaints lodged by the industry, the EC conducted two parallel investigations concerning imports of solar panels from China: an anti-dumping investigation and an anti-subsidy investigation. We focus on the former in the following. In its Regulation of 4 June 2013, the EC stated that, during the investigation period (IP) from 1 July 2011 to 30 June 2012, the sales prices of crystalline silicon PV modules and key components (i.e. cells and wafers) originating in or consigned from China had been less than their production costs, which had had a negative effect on the profitability of the EU's industry (EC, "
"Citation"
"2013a). For the companies sampled by means of an EU-distributed questionnaire, the EU compared the weighted average normal value of each type of like product established for an analogue country (India) to the weighted average export price of the corresponding type of product. On this basis, the EU estimated that the provisional weighted average dumping margins"
"Footnote"
"4, expressed as a percentage of the Cost, Insurance, and Freight Community frontier unpaid price duty, ranged from 48.1% to 112.6%. In its Implementing Decision of 2 December 2013, the EC confirmed this finding (EC, "
"Citation"
"2013b)."
"Although the reports were well-balanced and convincing in light of the available information, they nonetheless raised various concerns. First, the fact that anti-dumping is triggered by industry complaints (with looser conditions than for alternative defence measures such as temporary safeguards) makes its political legitimacy narrow. Trade defence measures encompass responses to ‘fair trade' and ‘unfair trade' (Jackson, "
"Citation"
"1997). Even though the distinction between the two has become increasingly blurred, the choice of one defence instrument over another is not politically neutral. Unlike anti-dumping and anti-subsidy measures, safeguards do not focus on whether trade is fair or not, so the conditions for imposing them are more stringent. In particular, proof of a higher level of injury than the material injury required for anti-dumping and anti-subsidy is required by the EC. The flip side of the coin is that their political legitimacy is much higher. In the case of safeguards, a country acknowledges that it cannot cope with market price swings, whatever the underlying reasons for market imbalances. Another essential feature of safeguards is that they apply to all such imports from all countries (this is called erga omnes). In the case of anti-dumping measures"
"Footnote"
"5, a culprit is singled out. Anti-dumping defence measures are designed to offset the effects of such ‘unfair' actions and even to have some kind of ‘punitive' effect to discourage such actions in the future (Jackson, "
"Citation"
"1997). Legally, EU PV industries had the choice to lodge a safeguard complaint or an anti-dumping complaint. Had the injury been severe, they could have favoured the former. As in most cases, they chose the latter, offering to the EC the opportunity to blame Chinese exports via a dumping policy. Surprisingly, however, China's support policies were not documented by the EC's investigation."
"A further weakness in the EU case against Chinese dumped exports lies in the choice of the reference market price – or ‘normal value' – of PV modules. Initially, the EC had chosen the US as the analogue country, as is the case in about half of the anti-dumping cases against non-market economies (Eggert, "
"Citation"
"2006)."
"Footnote"
"6 However, as the EC admitted, the choice of the US PV price as a reference cost was disputable, ‘mainly due to the fact that the US market was protected from Chinese imports during part of the IP by anti-dumping and anti-subsidy measures' (EC, "
"Citation"
"2013a). The final choice was India. Yet, the same criticisms could have applied. At the time the EC launched the investigation, India was expecting to begin an anti-dumping investigation into imports of PV modules into the country. According to the Indian Ministry of Commerce, Indian solar manufactures had called for anti-dumping duties as high as 200%."
"Footnote"
"7 Domestic manufacturers ‘were struggling to survive under conditions of oversupply. They have not been able to compete with their global competitors on prices'"
"Footnote"
"8, in spite of trade protection measures. For product code CN 8541 40 (‘solar cells whether or not assembled in modules'), the basic duty rate is nil in India, but when landing charges (1%), a countervailing duty (CVD) (12%), a CVD special duty (4%), and a central excise education ‘cess’ rate are added together, this gives a total duty rate equivalent to 17.24%. These duties supplement the domestic content measures (DCMs) imposed on crystalline silicon (c-Si) solar cells and modules for projects under the National Solar Mission, which aims to add 20 GW to the country's solar power capacity by 2022. India's PV manufacturing sector was thus not only protected but also, clearly, in bad economic shape when it was chosen by the EC as the reference market."
"Finally, some interested parties consulted by the Commission during the investigation argued that PV modules and equipment had become ‘a commodity where individual producers are not able anymore to set prices but where prices are subject to worldwide demand and supply' (EC, "
"Citation"
"2013b). These interested parties alleged that it was this situation that had caused the material injury to the EU's industry rather than the dumped imports. The investigation did not refute the assumption that PV modules and equipment had become a commodity, but simply underlined that this would not justify unfair price and trade practices. The commodity assumption was implicitly confirmed by the substance of the temporary deal struck by the EU and China, as it included price floors and import quotas, which are, historically, genuine commodity market management mechanisms. The acknowledgement that PV panels could be commodities weakens the dumping probe and argues more strongly in favour of safeguards."
"All these concerns illustrate and confirm that, in the present case, the anti-dumping economics is based on shaky arguments, but the political economy aspect is much stronger. As Arvin Panagariya recalled, ‘when a country resorts to anti-dumping to promote the interests of narrowly defined producer interests, it inflicts a disproportionately large injury on the rest of its citizenry. The net effect on the country is positively harmful' (Panagariya, "
"Citation"
"2002). In fact, any import tariff produces a negative net welfare effect on the economy as a whole."
"Theoretically, anti-dumping is economically defensible only if dumping is predatory, meaning ‘if the offending firms sell the product below cost to drive other firms out of the market and then earn super-normal profits by raising the price to the monopoly level. But with so many potential sources of supply around the world in modern times, the probability of a small number of firms establishing the monopoly price is virtually zero' (Panagariya, "
"Citation"
"2002). Moreover, predatory behaviour was not considered at all by the EC investigation."
"3. Why further trade disputes are looming"
"China's export price formation involves a combination of two mechanisms, each of which is likely to trigger disputes over dumping. First, there is an export price formation process based on bargaining between exporters and importers. China's domestic PV product markets (wafers, cells, and panels, as well as converters and racks, etc.) can be deemed competitive given the high number of firms, their relatively small and/or equal market shares, and the similar nature of their products (Zhao, Shi, Chen, Ren, & Finlow, "
"Citation"
"2011). To reduce prices, EU purchasers are able to bargain and play off several Chinese PV panel producers providing that there is no collusion or price fixing among the Chinese exporters. As China's domestic PV product market remained relatively small compared to its export market before the massive implementation of supply-side support policies in 2012, some Chinese PV producers have had to shrink their margins and offer prices that are sometimes lower than domestic prices (and sometimes even factory prices), while ensuring that they average out over time with a profit."
"Footnote"
"9 This also helps to win more customers and expand foreign market share. This trade practice is common in the solar energy sector and a regular subject for complaint by the Chinese PV manufacturers themselves."
"Footnote"
"10"
"Second, China provides PV producers with corporate tax rebates (50% reduction), enabling them to sell their PV products at a price that undercuts the price they would have to apply in the absence of such policies. Moreover, for PV cell and panel manufacturers, Chinese banks offer loan facilities at below-market rates"
"Footnote"
"11, and leading PV producers (e.g. SunTech) have been encouraged to accept the loans, particularly during the boom years (roughly 2008–2012). Combined with economies of scale, this may have lowered the marginal cost of PV manufacturing in China and provided Chinese firms with additional financial sources to offset any temporary losses induced by factory price dumping (Yu, "
"Citation"
"2013). Given all these domestic support policies, the hypothesis that China is pursuing a strategic export policy (with the intention to bankrupt foreign firms and then raise prices, in line with the textbook behaviour of monopolistic firms) cannot be totally discarded, despite that fact that no evidence has been collected so far to corroborate this."
"A third dispute-triggering factor is the lack of coordination among push and pull policies worldwide, and especially between the EU and China. In terms of timing, the above-mentioned supply-side policies in the Chinese PV production sector coincided massively with demand-side policies (notably, feed-in tariffs, FITs) in the EU."
"Footnote"
"12 Moreover, the unbalanced nature of supply-side/demand-side support policies between the EU and China will very probably extend to other (green) sectors. On the one hand, according to the National Plan for the Development of SES over the 12th Five-Year Plan period"
"Footnote"
"13 (published in 2012), China will implement more supply-side support measures for SES. As several Chinese official documents indicate"
"Footnote"
"14, the clear objective of China's supply-side support policies is to make sure that the industries promoted (e.g. SES) gain dominant competitiveness in the future, even though this choice incurs expensive social costs due to the sub-optimal use of public budgets (which, in the short term, need to be used for other priorities such as poverty, health, and transport). On the other hand, EU Member States are constrained by free competition regulations and cannot, like China, massively and rapidly implement supply-side support policies for green industries (although there are different supply-side support policies in certain Member States). All else equal, the imbalance between the capacities of China and the EU to pursue domestic support policies heightens the likelihood of future trade disputes."
"4. Coordinating ex ante push and pull policies"
"We first provide a reminder of why ex post coordination through anti-dumping measures, trade disputes, or price undertakings is sub-optimal. The case against anti-dumping has been made by reputed trade economists such as Bhagwati ("
"Citation"
"1989), Panagariya ("
"Citation"
"2002), Krugman and Obstfeld ("
"Citation"
"2006, p. 145), to name but a few. As Paul Krugman and Maurice Obstfeld stated in their popular international economics textbook,"
"Economists have never been very happy with the idea of singling dumping out as a prohibited practice. For one thing, price discrimination between markets may be a perfectly legitimate business strategy … Also the legal definition of dumping deviates substantially from the economic definition. Since it is often difficult to prove that foreign firms charge higher prices to domestic than export customers, [countries] often try to calculate a supposed fair price based on estimates of foreign production costs. This ‘fair price’ rule can interfere with normal business practices: A firm may well be willing to sell a product for a loss while it is lowering its costs through experience or breaking into a new market."
"From an EU perspective, the question could be asked whether or not trade defence measures are able to generate long-term gains – an eventuality that is far too often disregarded in classical and static trade theory. In the PV case, the EU's implicit objective is to revive Europe's manufacturing of crystalline PV modules. Increasing PV manufacturing in Europe could be deemed a necessary condition for sustaining PV innovation. The link between current crystalline PV panel manufacturing and the development of the next generation would be clear if the manufacturing and development were (largely) carried out in the same firm. In such a case there would be a direct link between the bankruptcy of the manufacturing (because of Chinese competition) and the discontinuation of development and innovation. Yet this linkage is not well established. Our ongoing research on this issue has so far provided only fragile and limited evidence."
"Footnote"
"15"
"The solar war crystallizes technological catch-up by China on decades-old technology. What is more at stake for the leaders of the green race (such as the EU) and for the mitigation of GHGs is not so much whether China is involved in dumping and the effect that this might have on commodity export prices, but rather the potential threat to innovation due to uncoordinated EU and Chinese domestic support policies. From this perspective, the price undertaking accepted by the EC does not stabilize the expectations of EU industries over the long-term conditions of competition with China."
"The EU and China could establish a pre-WTO mechanism to prevent similar trade disputes in the future. The EU has regular dialogues with China on trade relations and energy, such as the EU–China Joint Committee, the Energy Dialogue with the National Energy Administration, and the Research and Development Dialogue. Yet, to our knowledge, none of these deals with the energy–trade nexus and particularly with the trade-related aspects of green technology policies. The legal and political nature of such a mechanism would need further discussion. The main idea is that, under this mechanism, EU industries could sit down at the table and negotiate with Chinese officials and industry representatives instead of lodging their complaints directly with the Commission's Directorate General for Trade. The mechanism could also serve as a joint initiative to identify products for which technology spill-overs and other factors risk igniting further trade disputes and threaten the impetus for innovation in the EU. It would also provide a platform for EU–China discussions on how to reduce the imbalance between their respective domestic support policies. Meanwhile, the EU should be prepared to advance sound arguments to support its anti-trade measures as its ultimate policy response in order to highlight the importance of the issues at stake. The negotiation of an Environmental Goods Agreement (EGA), officially launched on 8 July 2014 in Geneva, rests upon a similar diagnosis. Focusing on the removal of tariff barriers on environmental goods, it falls far short of expectations that non-tariff barriers and behind-the-border measures for such goods would be addressed in one single agreement (De Melo, "
"Citation"
"2014). This is reminiscent of what happened with the agricultural trade agreement. It was only when the US and the EU struck a bilateral deal in 1992 on agricultural domestic support and export policies and then passed it on to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT)/WTO that agricultural trade liberalization was able to get under way, albeit slowly and with difficulty."
"Since early 2018, the US–China 'trade war' has increased tariffs on a wide range of Chinese products, including solar panels. The tension between the US and China in solar sector, if left unchecked, will not only harm the bilateral relationship between the two trade powers but also impede climate change mitigation as higher costs will slow down the deployment of solar products. The article begins by tracing the rapid development of the solar energy sector in China, before reviewing US trade measures to counteract the increased imports and protect its domestic industry. The article then proceeds to examine the WTO rules, finding that China is likely to prevail in the dispute on claims made under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade and the Agreement on Safeguards. However, while WTO litigation may be a necessary step it is not sufficient. China must also take the opportunity to solve deeply-rooted problems in its solar industry, namely solar overcapacity and heavy reliance on export markets in a limited number of countries that render Chinese solar manufacturing susceptible to trade restrictions imposed by other countries. Addressing these issues will not only remove a major irritant to the US and other trading partners but would also solidify the position of the industry within the country. The article recommends two options for China: first, explore domestic market potential for solar energy so as to absorb manufacturing capacity. The key here lies in progressively scaling up domestic solar consumption, which is essential in promoting China's solar development in a healthy and sustainable manner. Second, strengthen ties with countries along the Belt and Road Initiative (BRI) in solar trade and investment. Exporting Chinese solar technologies and building solar power infrastructure in BRI countries not only alleviates China's over-dependence on a limited number of advanced economies' markets but also contributes to 'greening' the BRI and global climate change mitigation."
""
"China became a major player in renewable energy (RE) technology during the 2000s. Chinese solar PV cell and module makers quickly dominated global sales in that industry, while the country's wind turbine producers became poised for significant exports after capturing their rapidly growing home market. In countries like the US, Chinese RE technology strength has been met with claims of excessive governmental support of exports. This study examines to what extent Chinese firms' solar PV and wind technology successes have been enabled by policy supports, and whether those policies appear to have been driven by broader goals versus RE export promotion per se. The evidence suggests that governmental policy toward both wind and solar originated in a push for export-competitive Chinese companies. But the specifics differed substantially due to the particular requirements of building technological capabilities in each: export readiness necessitated substantial support for domestic installation of wind but not solar PV power. The findings also suggest that as the decade of the 2000s progressed, environmental goals played an increasing role alongside export promotion in motivating and shaping Chinese RE technology policies.Renewable energy (RE) capacity – electric power generation from hydro, wind, solar, geothermal, and biological sources – is increasingly accepted as an important policy goal by countries worldwide. Underlying this acceptance have been concerns about climate change, other environmental problems, and the vulnerability of fossil fuels to economic and geopolitical shocks. Large developing countries like China and India both contribute and are especially vulnerable to these pressures. For example, about 70% of the increase in primary energy1 consumption by 2020 is forecasted to derive from the non-OECD countries (mainly developing ones), about 30% from China alone (Ito et al., 2005; Zhou et al., 2010). An additional incentive for RE policy has been that fast-growing RE demand provides excellent business opportunities. World consumption of renewable energy is predicted to increase from 57.8 quadrillion Btu in 2011 to 109.5 quadrillion Btu in 2035, and could potentially meet up to three quarters of total energy demand by 2050 (EIA, 2011, IPCC, 2011). These opportunities have been particularly strong for solar photovoltaic (PV) and wind power technologies."
"China has joined in the quest for RE technology adoption and production with considerable success. This effort, along with related ones aimed at “greening” China's economy more generally, have been both celebrated and questioned internationally. While noting the challenges, the World Bank (2012) recently spotlighted China's strategies for improving the environmental quality of its growth path. Similarly, the rise of RE installation in China has been taken as a positive step relative to the country's quickly mounting greenhouse gas emissions (Pew Charitable Trusts, 2011). On the other hand, critics have pointed out that China's economy will continue to be mostly coal-fired,2 while the country pursues additional fossil fuel sources in domestic shale deposits and African oil. Finally, the Chinese government has been seen as unfairly subsidizing the ability of Chinese firms to pursue world leadership in the export of RE technologies (Bradsher, 2010a, Bradsher, 2010b)."
"Like many countries, China has responded to their rising importance in world trade and capital flows by adopting policies to encourage domestic producers to capture a share of RE technology markets. These policies, while similar in many respects to other leading countries' previous and current practices, have been especially extensive and integrated across the demand and supply sides. In 2010, the United Steel Workers (USW) (2010) union filed a 5800 page petition that led to a US government complaint with the World Trade Organization (WTO), alleging that Chinese RE subsidies specifically target export production in ways prohibited by the WTO (United Steel Workers, 2010). This complaint has since been dropped, but more recently, US solar panel and wind turbine tower makers have charged the Chinese with subsidizing below-cost exports (Wald and Bradsher, 2011)."
"The present study explores China's wind and solar RE experience in light of the interplay among its domestic uptake of RE capacity, its production and export of these technologies, and the relevant policy frameworks. While motivated by the trade controversies mentioned above, the focus is not the specifics of international trade rules and requirements. Nor are critics' questions about whether China is doing “enough” environmentally addressed. Rather, the goal is to examine the role of export promotion in China's RE experience in the context of the country's overall growth trajectory and policy framework—industrial, macroeconomic, energy, and environmental. To what extent has Chinese RE technology success been enabled by policy supports, and to what extent have those policies been driven by broader goals versus the support of RE exports per se?"
"The paper proceeds as follows: the next section examines the details of RE production, installation, and export in China—in particular, wind turbine generating systems (WTGS) and solar PV. Section 3 then looks at the proximate causes of rapid growth in Chinese WTGS and solar PV, both government policy and market developments. In the fourth section these proximate causes are situated in the broader context of China's overall growth policies and experience, and the concomitant environmental impacts and concerns. Section 5 returns to the initial research question in light of the trends and tensions revealed by the evidence, concluding with a discussion of policy implications for both China and the United States."
"2. Renewable energy technology growth"
"During the 2000s, China came to lead the world in installed RE capacity3 with 103.36 gigawatts (GW),4 almost twice as much as that of the United States (Table 1). Even excluding hydroelectric power, which accounts for over half of China's total RE capacity, its combined wind and solar capacity in 2010 roughly equalled the comparable subtotals for the US and Germany. China's rapid growth in RE capacity has reflected its emphasis in the country's Eleventh and Twelfth Five-Year Plans (for 2006–2010 and 2011–2015). The proportion of renewable energy in total national energy consumption is currently targeted to be above 9.5% (Xinhuanet, 2011). Table 2 compares the actual data in 2010 with the targets specified in the Twelfth Five-Year Plan, which reveals China's ambition to further boost renewable energy capacity."
"3.1. Market, capability and policy in solar PV"
"The early rapid growth in China's solar PV sector came in the downstream segments of the industry, cells and modules, not in purified silicon production or ingots and wafers (see Fig. 1, Section 2.1). These upstream segments require high levels of technological capability and investment which, in tandem, create sustainable competitive advantage for market leaders and significant barriers for would-be entrants. During the 2000s, the state-of-the-art technique in silicon purification was the Siemens method. Although its basics had been known for years, cost-efficient application of this process depended on long experience in “precisely controlling the parameters of all the chemical reactions” (de la Tour et al., 2011, p. 767). As a result, market concentration and profits have been high at this end of the PV value chain. In 2010 the top four firms – only one Chinese – accounted for 58.5% of the market, and 2009 profit margins exceeded 40% (Green Rhino Energy, 2012)."
"In contrast, the downstream cells and modules segments have been characterized by lower entry barriers and intense competition: The 2010 four-firm concentration ratio in cells was only 24%, and both segments experienced rapid year-to-year turnover among the leading firms as Chinese companies entered the market (NREL, 2011). The requisite capability levels are not prohibitive, and turn-key production lines are available on international markets. In addition, PV cell and module production are labor and energy intensive, both factors with which China is well endowed. Finally, PV cell and module producers benefited from an influx of Chinese executives returning from abroad, where they had gained valuable experience in leading international solar technology firms (de la Tour et al., 2011). Thus the new Chinese companies were able to scale up and achieve international cost competitiveness quickly.5 The first major producers were strictly Chinese-owned; significant FDI came later, mostly took the form of joint ventures, and by the end of the decade involved only a third of the top companies. By that time, four of the top five global solar cell and module producers were Chinese firms (Platzer, 2012), and China's PV industry accounted for almost half of world output (Pew Charitable Trusts, 2011)."
"Beside the supply-side characteristics of the downstream solar PV segments, a demand-side policy shock in the European market in the mid-2000s proved to be timely for Chinese producers. Germany, the largest solar PV market in the world, has been the most important importer of China's solar cells and modules. The German Renewable Energy Act (EEG, Erneuerbare-Energien-Gesetz) strengthened the nation's feed-in tariff, and was soon emulated in other top solar markets such as Spain and Italy (Butler et al., 2008, Commission of the European Communities, 2005, 2008, Germany Renewable Energy Agency, 2012, Photovoltaique, 2008). These feed-in tariffs triggered waves of large-scale installation in European countries and greatly boosted demand for China's solar PV exports, at precisely the time that Chinese producers were expanding output and capacity."
"The importance of direct policy supports in the rapid rise of Chinese PV cell and module exporters is unclear. Certainly these producers benefited from the early-2000s emergence of a suite of policies aimed at moving Chinese manufacturing generally, and exports in particular, up the technology ladder; this broader policy framework will be discussed in Section 4. But given the foregoing analysis, it is probable that not much direct policy support was needed for the early and rapid penetration of world export markets by Chinese solar PV cell and module producers. That not much was given is suggested by de la Tour et al. (2011, p. 768), who find that “(b)esides public education, it does not seem that Chinese authorities have played a direct role in the industry development until recently.”"
"The recent changes in solar technology policy began around 2009, after Chinese PV cell and module makers had established a formidable position in world markets. One was a push to increase Chinese companies' share of the upstream segments of the solar technology market. Two interrelated incentives for the policy shift were the greater profitability and the constraints placed on Chinese cell and module makers – who had long relied on imported silicon – by a global silicon shortage in the mid-2000s (Myers and Yuan, 2007). The government responded by instituting R&D subsidies and other supports to encourage capability building by Chinese silicon makers. Closing this gap is likely to take time: while Chinese silicon producers work to master the Siemens method, global market leaders are pioneering higher-efficiency technologies such as fluidized bed reactors (Filtvedt et al., 2010). Domestic PV cell and module producers are providing the market demand to enable Chinese silicon makers to learn, develop, and ramp up capacity. Although by 2010 China was producing a plurality of the world's silicon output at 33%, little was being exported (SEIA, 2011)."
"Another 2009 policy shift did target China's exporters of PV cells and modules. The economic crisis that began in 2008 depressed global solar demand, both directly and indirectly, as fiscally strapped European countries reduced installation subsidies. Contemporaneous with aggressive expansion by Chinese solar cell and modules makers, this created overcapacity and depressed prices and profits. Responding to corresponding problems across the country's export-dependent industries, the Chinese government initiated a wide range of supports, including reinstitution of explicit export subsidies that had earlier been dropped; the goals appeared to be employment and social stability as much as export promotion (Yardley, 2008). Of particular importance in solar cells and modules was subsidized credit from state-owned banks (Bradsher, 2009, Lewis, 2011, Bayaliyev et al., 2011). Government subsidies were estimated to provide a significant manufacturing cost advantage to Chinese producers, more than offsetting higher shipping costs (Goodrich et al., 2011); the US Department of Commerce, in imposing a new set of tariffs, concluded in 2012 that Chinese solar PV exporters have received subsidies ranging from 2.90 to 4.74% (International Trade Administration, 2012). While these policy supports have been substantial and controversial, their timing – along with the market analysis provided earlier in this section – suggests that they were instrumental in defending rather than creating market position for Chinese solar cell and module companies."
"The recession-induced shakeout also played a role in a final policy shift, as Chinese corporate and governmental strategists realized the vulnerability created by heavy reliance on foreign demand for solar PV technology. Fig. 3, Fig. 4 (Section 2.2) show that by 2010, installed wind capacity exceeded that for solar by more than a factor of fifty. But in 2009, China significantly increased its targets and incentives for domestic uptake (see Table 7). These included supports for both grid-connected solar module installations and distributed solar capacity for off-grid settings (Burgermeister, 2009). The motivation for this change clearly went beyond relieving immediate pressure on Chinese PV producers: In 2011, sharp increases were announced in China's targets for solar capacity installation for 2015 and 2020, to 9 and 50 GW, respectively (the Twelfth Five-Year Plan; Wong and Yixin, 2011). The significance of this point will be discussed at the end of this section and in Section 4 on China's evolving environmental policy framework."
"The foregoing findings on Chinese firms' wind and solar technology success can be briefly summarized. These two RE markets were among those targeted at the end of the 1990s as higher valued added industries, and in particular, ones in which an export presence could be built. For solar PV, at least in the downstream segments involving cells and modules, the availability of turn-key production facilities on international markets allowed Chinese companies to vault quickly and directly into the front ranks of global competition. For WTGS, the need to build specialized technological capabilities required an intermediate stage: technology transfer from leading world turbine producers during gradual ramping up of production by Chinese firms. Both the incentive for foreign WTGS makers to produce in China and the opportunity for local manufacturers to gradually increase output and capabilities were provided by generous, steadily increasing policy supports for domestic wind capacity installation, while supply-side measures hastened the development of the Chinese producers. These supports, initially at least, can best be understood as means toward the eventual end of high value added exports."
"Things began to change as the decade of the 2000s progressed. The environmental burdens of continuing rapid growth became increasingly visible. This became a growing concern in the context of international efforts to address climate change, and in particular, insistence by the US that China and India be part of any solution. In light of these developments, China's success in leapfrogging to global leadership in installed wind power capacity took on new meaning. From a chiefly instrumental role in supporting export capability, continued growth in wind power uptake became an important policy goal in and of itself. This goal was quickly extended to incorporate a new emphasis on domestic capacity in solar PV as well."
"Demand-side solar technology supports toward the end of the decade came in the context of a burst of policy initiatives aimed at limiting losses and instability created by the global late-2000s economic slowdown. But helping Chinese PV cell and module makers over this rough patch cannot explain domestic capacity goals reaching ahead more than a decade. Nor would these demand-side supports be necessary to help jump-start capability in the coveted, higher-profitability silicon segments of the PV value chain: Chinese solar cell and module export production already provide a ready market for local silicon ingot and wafer output. Demand-side capacity subsidies are costly as long as RE-based power is more expensive than that from conventional sources. The costs of both wind and solar power have fallen steadily with technological innovation, experience, scale, and grid enhancements. China's wind experience suggests that subsidizing the movement down this cost curve allowed the serendipitous coincidence of building export capability while simultaneously diversifying the domestic electricity supply. But continued growth in domestic wind installation supports even after the top WTGS producers have reached export readiness, along with the recent rise in such supports in solar, suggest that by the end of the 2000s export dominance may no longer have been the sole, or even the chief, motivation for policy."
"Thus, China seems now to be crafting wind and solar policy in the context of serious efforts to address the problems of air pollution, energy intensity, and carbon emissions—all goals that are widely accepted within the international political arena. The foregoing analysis suggests three sets of reasons for the Chinese to anchor their RE policies to these goals going forward: economic, political, and environmental."
"Economically, measures aimed at rapid domestic wind and solar uptake provide a boost to these RE technology industries through stable, growing demand and the opportunity to improve product quality at home.8 Politically, strong demand side policies also change the context in which supply side incentives for those industries are interpreted. Producer supports that do not appear to be chiefly aimed at exports are less likely to trigger resistance among China's trade partners. The recent complaints brought against Chinese RE technology exports in the US are examples of China's vulnerability to being seen as seeking export advantage at the expense of other nations."
"Environmental considerations offer perhaps the most compelling argument for a RE technology policy that is anchored by domestic installation supports. The infamous Beijing smog of late 2011 placed a locally inescapable, internationally visible exclamation point on the escalating environmental spillovers from China's coal-fired, export-driven growth path. Given their tiny share of the existing energy mix, falling costs, and evident amenability to demand side policy support, the mitigation potential of wind and solar seems enormous. This potential benefit could compound over time: as noted above, solar cell and module production is highly energy intensive, and China's world leadership in these products has been cheaply but dirtily fueled by its plentiful coal. The more that RE can be used to make RE equipment, the greater the environmental gain for the country."
"What are the policy lessons and implications for the US? To the extent that it is part of the continuing expansion of global markets for RE technologies (Walsh, 2009), there is likely to be unease in the US about supplying domestic RE demand with imports, which are perceived as exporting well-paid RE jobs (for example, Uchitelle, 2010). While attention to China's WTO compliance is important, that is unlikely to be effective as the centerpiece of a strategy on RE technology. China's experience – along with those of other leading countries – suggests that consistent, multidimensional policy supports for RE can foster rapid domestic implementation, and competitive RE technology producers, or both. The key is to make an informed choice which (if any) of these options to pursue."
"China's wind experience validates the observation in Lewis and Wiser (2007) that significant, consistent demand side incentives are important to private supply side WTGS investment and capability building, and thus can increase the likely returns on public supports to producers. Confidence in long-term, in-country demand provides encouragement for investment and a setting in which first rate capabilities can be developed and maintained as the technologies evolve. A market like wind technology, where specialized capabilities built over time are critical, is likely to be one in which US producers and their supply chains can compete effectively over the long run. It may therefore be a strong candidate for option three, combined demand and supply side policy supports."
"The lessons of China's solar PV experience are more nuanced. Competition in the global PV cell and module segments, with their off-the-shelf production technologies, is more strictly cost-driven. Given China's (coal) energy and labor cost advantages, maintaining market position in these segments may continue to be difficult for US producers. On the other hand, the heightened Chinese cell and module subsidies dating from 2009 are facing international political and regulatory challenges. Goodrich et al. (2011) suggest that in any event these subsidy levels may not be sustainable, and that in their absence, U.S. producers can compete in advanced downstream solar PV products. In addition, the WTGS case suggests there may be a clearer rationale for US supply side supports in the upstream, capability-intensive, higher-margin PV silicon segments. On the demand side, RE installation is a significant creator of relatively high-paying jobs (Craig et al., 2011). Friedman (2009) surveys US studies estimating that for solar PV, rooftop installation creates as much employment as manufacturing of the technology used, with the share of total jobs from manufacturing falling over time with increasing production efficiencies."
"Because supports for domestic installation of RE are generally viewed favorably in world political and governance terms for their obvious environmental benefits, they can temper world perceptions of producer subsidies. In a crowded and contentious global marketplace governed by WTO rules, this political dimension of domestic implementation support can be important for the U.S. as well as for China. China's RE technology experience suggests that when policy makers strike the right balance between public incentives and exposure to competitive market pressures, and situate them in the context of related policies that are complementary (both environmental and economic), producer supports can play an important role.9"
"We set out to explore whether Chinese companies' success in the wind and solar technology markets has resulted mainly from bare-knuckled export promotion by the Chinese government, or from a more broadly based policy mix in which export competitiveness is one among other important goals. Our findings are that it depends on which RE technology, and what time period, is in question. The market and policy trajectories in renewable energy and the wider context suggest that solar PV and WTGS exports were the primary goal from the start, although secondarily these industries also fit at that time with China's new emphasis on strategic energy supply and a higher-value added production mix. But domestic wind capacity installation, alongside carefully leveraged technology transfer, had to be pursued for years before WTGS exports were even a possibility. And in the event, both wind and solar policies have been swept up in China's newfound urgency to solve its environmental problems."
""
""
"The export performance of China with respect to solar PV and WETC has been exceptional since 2005. Our research aimed at outlining this development and examining the drivers behind it. We show that China runs large exports surpluses with only a few developed countries in both technology sectors and that it gained a considerable comparative advantage. Our findings are in line with more general trade studies outlining that China has developed comparative advantages in highly sophisticated good exports that do not necessarily correspond to its level of development (Rodrik 2006; Schott 2008). We show that China trades only marginally with other emerging markets and developing countries—especially with respect to solar PV technology components."
"This empirical study is the first attempt at estimating the driving factors of Chinese solar PV and wind energy components exports. The few existing studies in this field are limited to descriptive studies of trade development, policy performance and innovation. We conduct an ex-post econometric study using an augmented gravity model and a panel dataset of 43 countries from the developed and developing world that imported solar PV and WETCs from China between 1996 and 2008. In addition to controlling for standard socioeconomic variables derived from the gravity trade literature, we consider several explanatory factors that account for market, policy and innovation effects steaming from both importing countries and China. Specifically, we are interested in the effect of renewable energy support schemes and the renewable energy market size in importing countries on export flows from China. Furthermore, the role of Chinese R&D policy, innovation and bilateral technology transfer as well as the Chinese demand market for solar PV and WETCs is of interest."
"The results highlight that importing country per capita income has a significant positive effect on solar PV and WETC imports from China. The growth of Chinese per capita income also has a significant effect on exports. This is in line with the general trade literature showing that trade increases with country income. It also supports the environmental Kuznets curve hypothesis arguing that demand for (and supply of) environmental goods increases with income. Additionally, the area of importing countries, seen as another proxy for economic mass and also for renewable energy potential, has a significant effect."
"With respect to trade costs we find that distance has no significant effect but that high import tariffs have a negative effect on solar PV imports as higher costs are associated. This result is insightful as reducing technology specific tariffs are likely to increase the availability of clean energy technology in the global market, in particular for developing countries. Results on tariffs applied to WETC imports, however, are surprising as higher tariffs are associated with higher imports. However, this can be explained by several factors. First, WETC exports from China are extremely small compared to exports of solar PV components. Second, a larger share of exports is imported by developing countries, especially the East Asian economies and India, which apply higher tariffs. Thus, the result might be driven by the small size of the sector analyzed."
"The results also highlight that market size in importing countries is very important for understanding trade flows of solar PV components but not decisive for determining WETC exports. Strong development of electricity generation as an indicator for market size increases imports of components to satisfy demand. The results for WETCs are different as a large market in terms of electricity generation in importing countries reduces imports of wind energy components. A possible explanation for this finding is that countries with a large amount of generation, such as the USA, Denmark and Germany, have a strong, competitive wind turbine industry themselves and are thus not as reliant on technology imports. Additionally, countries with a smaller market, such as India and Indonesia import relatively more—compared to the solar PV market analysis. Market growth in terms of renewable electricity generation in China has a negative impact on respective WETC exports, but no significant impact on solar PV exports. This is in contrast to Sawhney and Kahn (2012) who suggest that solar PV exports to the US are determined by the exporting country market size. However, the descriptive analysis highlighted the reasons: While the national market remained small in terms of solar PV electricity generation, the solar PV component industry became particularly successful in targeting foreign markets. On the contrary, while the country developed a large home market for electricity generated from wind energy, its export performance in the sector increased but remained relatively small. In terms of policy this is interesting as it suggests that a future growth of the home market for solar PV in China might eventually decrease the currently large export surplus of the sector as rather the home market will be supplied. However, more research is required in this respect."
"We also show that the policy structure supporting renewable energy dissemination in importing countries has an effect on solar PV component imports from China. Differentiating between incentive tariffs, obligations and tax measures, we find that countries with an incentive tariff scheme in place are importing significantly more solar PV components than countries that have only implemented tax measures and obligations. This makes sense insofar as FIT are considered to be a very effective policy instrument for increasing generation from solar PV. Hence, if clean energy generation and respective technology imports are policy goal the implementation of incentive tariffs is advisable. However, these results should be interpreted cautiously for several reasons. First, we only test the effect of policy existence, as available data does not allow controlling for policy strength and policy design across countries. Second, numerous countries have simultaneously implemented various additional policies designed to strengthen renewable energy dissemination, but we only test for selected policies neglecting this policy mix."
"The paper also aims at identifying the effect of the Chinese R&D policy and innovation as well as the role of foreign knowledge as potential drivers for exports. Results are ambiguous but not in contrast to findings in the literature. We use data on central and provincial government S&T appropriations that have been identified in earlier literature as being directed to R&D on renewable energy."
"We find that only provincial R&D spending growth has a positive effect on Chinese solar PV exports, while central government R&D spending seems to have no empirically significant effect. We see several reasons for this finding. First, provincial government R&D spending experienced greater growth rates than that from the central government. Second, while central government S&T appropriations for renewable energies are linked to public institutions and universities, and thus the provision of public goods or basic research, this link is not so clear for provincial government appropriations, which are likely to be directed to specific technologies and projects. Also, indirectly explaining the insignificance of central government R&D appropriation, investment support for manufacturing through, among other, R&D policies has not been sufficiently tied to innovation incentives (Grau et al. 2012). However, these results should be treated cautiously and require further research for two reasons. First, the true amount of S&T appropriations allocated to research in solar PV and wind energy remains unclear and is only approximated in this study. Second, as we have to use growth rates as an explanatory variable and are controlling for time effects a large amount of explanatory power can be lost due to differencing or is captured by controlled time trends."
"We use technology specific patent data to obtain national and foreign knowledge stock in China in order to test the role of innovation and technology transfer in the context of trade. We show that the national knowledge stock on wind and solar PV technologies increased substantially in China. Estimation results however are puzzling. Growth in national knowledge does not play a significant role in determining exports of either technology components. Descriptively we highlighted that countries that have transferred more innovations to China in terms of patents on solar PV and wind energy technology also import more of the respective technology components. Yet, empirically we do not find any effect of bilateral knowledge transfer to China on technology component imports from China. One reason behind this could be that once technology, in terms of patents, is transferred to China from one country, the product produced with that knowledge or containing this knowledge can be exported to all countries and not just the specific country where the innovation originated. Furthermore, several data limitations and a reflection of the existing literature on clean energy sector innovation in China potentially help explain these results. Cross country data availability does not allow measuring different means of technology transfer, such as purchasing manufacturing equipment or hiring a skilled foreign trained workforce, as outlined by de la Tour (2011). Also, the literature suggests that both industries, solar PV and wind energy, moved from imitation and cooperation to indigenous innovation (Lewis 2011). Yet, imitation is not likely to be patented. Furthermore, own knowledge generation only recently became more important (Wu and Mathews 2012) and thus might not yet be reflected in the period analyzed. Additionally, the patent data used in this context does not control for innovations in the machinery equipment used for production of components used for clean electricity generation but rather only differentiates the latter. Further, although traded products are uniquely identified in international trade statistics, thus permitting a sector specific analysis, the product position in the production chain cannot be identified. However, knowledge transfer and innovation in production technologies and understanding whether upstream or final products are produced and traded might also be central in explaining Chinese industry development."
"Chinese companies have become major technology producers, with the largest shares of their output exported. This paper examines the development of solar PV and wind energy technology component (WETC) exports from China and the competitive position of the country‘s renewable energy industry. We also describe the government’s renewable energy policy and its success in renewable electricity generation as well as increasing renewable energy innovation and foreign knowledge accumulation, which may drive export performance. We aim at empirically identifying determinants of Chinese solar PV and WETC exports. We estimate a gravity trade model using maximum likelihood estimation. Besides controlling for standard variables, we consider additional explanatory factors by accounting for market, policy and innovation effects steaming from both importing countries and China. We use a panel dataset representing bilateral trade flows of 43 developed and developing countries that imported solar PV and WETCs from China between 1996 and 2008. Empirical results indicate that high income countries, with large renewable energy markets and demand side policy support schemes, in terms of incentive tariffs, are increasingly importing Chinese solar PV components. We show that trade costs have a negative impact on exports of solar PV components but not WETC. Additionally, we find a positive impact of research and development appropriation growth, especially from provincial governments in China, but no evidence that bilateral knowledge transfer and indigenous innovation affect exports."
"Access provided by Columbia University Libraries"
"1 Introduction"
"Since 1990, China’s economic growth and export performance has been exceptional. The rapid growth in energy consumption and carbon emissions makes China a decisive player in global climate negotiations. In attempting to create more sustainable growth, China has introduced various policies designed to increase its renewable energy generation capacity and to establish an industrial base for clean technology production. With respect to the latter, China is particularly successful as its clean technology industry experienced a remarkable development. The solar photovoltaic (PV) module producing industry, including companies like Suntech, JA Solar and Yingli, is extremely prosperous with double digit growth rates since 2000 (REN21 2011; IEA 2010). After producing only 3 MW in 2000, China’s solar PV panel industry became the largest global producer, making 10,852 MW in 2010, which accounted for 45 % of world production in 2010 (Algieri et al. 2011; EPI 2011). China’s wind turbine production also experienced a similar rapid growth. Companies such as Sinovel, Goldwind, Dangfang and Ming Yang increased their production from USD 26 million in 2003 to USD 104 million in 2005, building a supply capacity of 17 gigawatt; some 41 % of the global market (Caprotti 2009; BTMConsult 2011). At the same time, the Chinese government increased its efforts to close a knowledge gap to developed countries by increasing its research and development (R&D) spending on renewable energies and energy efficiency as well as by introducing numerous policies to support indigenous innovation and attract foreign knowledge. Yet, as this paper will highlight that the local market for renewable energy technologies components in China remained small until recently, with electricity generation from renewable sources contributing only a marginal share to total electricity generation. Consequently, the largest share of solar PV and wind energy equipment production is exported–to only a few high-income countries—and China became the largest exporter of solar PV modules and a major exporter of wind energy technology components (WETC)."
"Literature describing and examining the dynamics of trade in clean energy technology remains sparse and, with the exception of Algieri et. al (2011), does not account for development in China. Consequently we contribute to the existing literature in two ways. First, our research examines the development of solar PV and WETC exports from China and the competitive position of the country‘s renewable energy industry."
"Footnote"
"1 Furthermore, we describe the government’s renewable energy policy and its success in terms of renewable electricity generation and increasing renewable energy innovation and foreign knowledge accumulation in China. Second, as in the first study, we empirically identify driving factors of Chinese solar PV and WETC exports. We conduct an ex-post econometric study using an augmented gravity model. We use a panel dataset representing annual bilateral trade flows of 43 countries from the developed and developing world that imported solar PV and WETCs from China between 1996 and 2008. Overall our data represents about 90 % of Chinese exports with respect to both technologies. Besides controlling for standard socioeconomic variables derived from the gravity trade literature, we consider several explanatory factors accounting for market, policy and innovation effects steaming from both importing countries and China. Specifically, we are interested in the effect of renewable energy support schemes and the renewable energy market size in importing countries on export flows from China. Furthermore, the role of Chinese R&D policy, innovation and bilateral technology transfer and the Chinese demand market for solar PV and WETCs is of interest."
"We show that China experienced a rapid export growth for both solar PV and wind energy equipment, but that it only runs large export surplus with a few OECD countries. Main results support the descriptive analysis, as income both in importing countries and China are important export determinants. Furthermore, at least for solar PV, the results indicate a strong role for market size and policy setup in importing countries as well as trade costs in terms of tariffs applied to imports from China. The effect of the market size in China for solar PV components and WETCs is in line with the descriptive observation. While the national market remained small for solar PV, the solar PV component industry became particularly successful in targeting foreign markets. On the contrary, while the country developed a large home market for WETC, its export performance in the sector increased but remained relatively small. Additionally, we find a positive impact of R&D appropriation growth, especially from provincial governments in China, but no evidence that bilateral knowledge transfer and indigenous innovation has an effect on Chinese exports of solar PV components and WETC. Hence, our analysis calls for more research on the topic as our innovation measures presumably does not cover other means of innovation, such as purchasing manufacturing equipment or hiring a skilled foreign trained workforce, and respective supportive policies such as educational investments."
"Nevertheless, the results of our study are of interest to policy makers. Among other things, the results suggest that a renewable energy supportive market structure is essential to obtain solar PV technology in an international market. Furthermore, on the one hand, the reduction of import tariffs can significantly increase the availability of affordable solar PV technologies from China. Yet, on the other, increasing tariffs along WTO law can also serve as a tool for reducing solar PV component imports from China. Further, the results give a hint that future growth in the Chinese home market for solar PV might eventually decrease the current large export surplus of the sector, as the home market is supplied instead."
"The analysis is organized as follows. Section 2 provides a literature overview. Section 3 highlights the development of Chinese exports of renewable energy technology components focusing on solar PV and WETC and—in order to outline supply side mechanisms—brings it in line with efforts undertaken by the central and provincial governments to promote renewable energies in China. Section 4 presents the empirical framework. Section 5 describes data used to estimate determinants of imports of these technologies from China. The results are presented in Section 6 and discussed in Section 7."
"2 Related Literature"
"Literature on innovation, learning and the determinants of export development generally stems from two theoretical traditions. Literature rooted in the Heckscher–Ohlin–Samuelson model and its neo-endowment approach determines trade by the relative factor availability of labor, capital and knowledge. The other theoretical approach, influenced by the Ricardian school, understands technology differences between trading partners as the main determinant of trade between developed countries (Posner 1961; Vernon 1966). Innovation and technology is identified as an important non-price factor positively affecting bilateral trade between countries (Magnier and Toujas-Bernate 1994; Verspagen and Wakelin 1997; Krugman 1979; Grossman and Helpman 1991; Eaton and Kortum 2002). The empirical literature outlining the importance of innovation, government policies that encourage domestic R&D, investment and technology diffusion, as well as the levels and similarities of markets is large, but mostly focuses on developed countries. (Greenhalgh 1990; Wang et al. 2010; Levinson 2009; Papaconstantinou 1997; Madden et al. 1999; Wakelin 1998b). With the increasing competitiveness of developing countries’ exports, some empirical studies analyze these issues focusing on emerging markets, in particular East Asian economies (Pamukcu 2003; Hasan and Raturi 2001; Madden et al. 1999). Edmonds et. al (2008) show that China’s excessive foreign trade orientation substantially varies between countries due to growth of foreign invested firms and their respective links to home markets. Arguing that government policies play a role in nurturing domestic production capabilities, Rodrik (2006) and Schott (2008) suggest that China has developed comparative advantages in highly sophisticated good exports that are not comparable with its development level. Other studies also support the view that foreign direct investment (FDI) and innovation are important drivers for entering export markets. For instance, Zhang and Song (2000) find evidence that increased levels of FDI positivly affect manufacturing export performance, not only through exports generated by foreign affiliates but also by host country industries. In line with the theoretical literature on the importance on innovation and learning for exporting (Bell and Pavitt 1993; Westphal 2002), numerous empirical studies find evidence that innovation activities, technology spilloves through imports, and linkages to multinational companies have a positive effect on Chinese export performance (Guan and Ma 2003; Guan et al. 2009; Motohashi and Yuan 2010; Park and Lippoldt 2008). Fu and Gong (2011), for instance, using a panel of Chinese firm-level data, analyze the role of indigenous and foreign innovation efforts in technological upgrading, find that indigenous firms are leading in low- and medium technology industries, while foreign firms lead in the high technology sector. Wignaraja (2012) identifies that technology transfer from multinationals in combination with systematic investments in and upgrading of minor technological activities as important drivers behind the export success of the automobiles and electronics industry. In the context of the effect of innovation on trade there are two often used measures of innovation that are also used in this study—R&D spending and patents. Empirical evidence finds that increasing R&D spending might explain the export success of most countries (Hirsch and Bijaoui 1985; Buxton et al. 1991; Keesing 1967) and China (Zhao and Li 1997). Yet, R&D spending, reflecting only one input into the innovative process, might be an insufficient measure. Consequently, patent data, reflecting innovative output, is used as a proxy for innovation and technology transfer. Several studies using patent data further support the view that innovation is a decisive element in determining trade flows (Zeng 2009; Soete 1987; Roper and Love 2002; Wakelin 1998a). A related approach in this respect centers on the effect of intellectual property rights (IPR) on trade flows. Most empirical studies focus on exports from industrialized nations to a group of developed and developing importer countries. (Maskus and Penubarti 1995; Rafiquzzaman 2002; Smith 1999, 2001). In the early 2000s, studies began to focus on developing countries’ trade flows and the role of IPR rights (Park and Lippoldt 2005, 2008; Awokuse and Yin 2010; Yang and Maskus 2009; Branstetter et al. 2005). With respect to China, Awokuse and Yin (2010) present some empirical evidence suggesting that strengthened IPR protection in China significantly affected imports of knowledge intensive products."
"Some studies analyze the role of innovation and government policies in explaining the rapid development of the renewable energy sector in China. De la Tour et al. (2011) describe the role of innovation and technology transfer of the solar PV industry in China. In a descriptive market study they find that Chinese producers attained their current world position by purchasing manufacturing equipment and by recruiting executives from a skilled Chinese diaspora but that their innovation performance is driven by national policies designed to close the innovative gap in critical areas. Similarly, Wu and Mathews (2012), ignoring trade, investigate knowledge flows from advanced countries finding that the main foreign knowledge sources for China in the sector are the US, Japan and Germany. They also outline a rising dependence of China on its own knowledge generation, in particular from the public research institutes and universities. With respect to the Chinese wind turbine manufacturing industry Lewis (2005, 2011) and Ru et al. (2012) show that public policy plays a key role in the transition from imitation and cooperation to indigenous innovation. Yet, studies analyzing trade dynamics in clean technology industries are limited, especially with respect to developing countries. Focusing on export flows from developed countries, Constantini and Crespi (2008) and Constantinin and Mazzanti (2012) find that stringent environmental regulation and strong national innovation systems have a significant positive effect on exports of energy technologies. Algieri et al. (2011) analyze trade dynamics of the global PV industry and describe the competitiveness of major exporting countries. Focusing on US PV exports, they find a relationship between PV exports, foreign income and relative prices, but ignore the role of innovation. Analyzing renewable power equipment exports to the US, Sawhney and Kahn (2012) find that larger countries export significantly more and that the exporting countries’ domestic renewable power generation has a positive significant impact as well. Furthermore, sector specific FDI from the US to poor exporting countries determines export growth."
"In summary, while there is some evidence regarding developed countries’ exports in clean energy technologies and the role of innovation and environmental policy for the creation of a clean tech industry, there is little with respect to China. In the present paper we focus on solar PV and WETC exports from China. We link studies on policy effects and innovation in this sector to studies analyzing trade determinants of a new industry. We identify the relationship between Chinese export performance, policy efforts and innovation activities on the supply side within China, as well as drivers on the demand side in importing markets."
"3 Chinese PV and Wind Technology Exports and Renewable Energy Policy in China"
"International trade is a predominant element of the Chinese economic development. Even though growth rates have slowed since 2007 China has seen several annual growth rates of 10 % since the 1990s. Trade flows grew even faster after the country was formally admitted to the World Trade Organization (WTO) in 2001 (Edmonds et al. 2008). The composition of Chinese trade changed as the country moved from a comparative advantage in trade with low technology based processed foods, textiles and manufactured materials in the 1980s and 1990s, to an increasing more technology embodied trade in machinery and equipment (Yue and Hua 2002). Using a data set covering bilateral trade relations we find that a similar high-tech components trade pattern is reflected in the country’s exports and imports of renewable energy technology equipment. In this section we describe the export dynamics and the competitive position of the Chinese renewable energy branch. Data was obtained from UN Comtrade (2011) based on relevant harmonized commodity and coding system (HS) codes (Appendix 1)."
"Footnote"
"2 The approach allows for a detailed analysis of technology specific trade flows between countries, but does not permit an assessment with respect to the quality of traded goods (Hamwey 2005; Sawhney and Kahn 2012; Costantini and Crespi 2008)."
"Footnote"
"3 We also refer to the policy regime supporting renewable energy investment, generation development and innovation in China, in order to identify potential effects of both technology demand and supply side policies on trade in the subsequent empirical analysis."
"3.1 Development and Diversity of Chinese Clean Technology Trade"
"Global trade of renewable energy technologies grew only marginally before 2000, but has increased sharply since then (Costantini and Crespi 2008; Groba 2011). Figure 1 highlights that Chinese exports of solar PV components lagged behind this development, but increased sharply after 2006. Since then, Chinese solar PV exports have increased by a factor of 26, reaching approximately USD 32 billion in 2010. The share of Chinese exports across all global exports increased from 5 % in 1996 to 39 % in 2010, making China the leading exporter of this technology (Appendix 2). At the same time, imports to China increased by a factor of 12; increasing the Chinese share of global imports from 3 to 9 %. While China has become an importer of components as well, its global import share remained low and China developed a large export surplus in this sector. A similar, but weaker, development can be observed in WETC trade, where Chinese exports increased by a factor of 12, raising the market share from 2 % in 2000 to 6 % in 2010 (Fig. 2). In terms of China’s trade composition, the share of solar PV equipment exports out of total Chinese exports more than tripled from below 1 % in 2000 to about 3 % in 2010. Yet, for wind technology component exports, the share remains significantly lower."
"The study investigated the relationship between carbon dioxide emissions, economic growth, and energy consumption in China during a period of increasing urbanisation and international trade. It also studied the future paths of these relating variables and tested the EKC hypothesis in China. In this study, the EKC hypothesis is not valid in China. The choice of variable combination is particularly novel; this is the first time the effects of both urbanisation and international trade in studying China’s carbon footprint are accounted for. The set of variables were all integrated of order one. The Fourier ADL results, the Gregory-Hansen, Phillips–Ouliaris cointegration test and the Johansen cointegration analysis revealed the existence of at most one cointegration relationship, which was suggestive of the existence of long-run equilibrium relationships among the variables."
"The fitted FMOLS is used to obtain the long-run estimates, and the VECM fitted to check robustness. In the long run, urbanisation will contribute to lessening environmental pollution. Urbanisation growth improves environmental quality in a number of ways, and it is recommended that China enhance its drive for urbanisation as it is critical to combating environmental pollution in many forms. First, urbanisation growth leads to higher productivity resulting from its positive externalities and economies of scale. Urban productivity is more than 5.5 times that of rural areas, as suggested by the literature. Urban agglomeration allows for the same output to be produced using fewer resources. Thus, urbanisation growth reduces the ecological footprint. Second, urban population growth drives innovation, such as using green technologies that improve the environment. The results indicate that green energy and environmentally friendly machines and equipment, such as electric vehicles, will determine the future of the green economy in the long term. Lastly, high population density is a key determinant of energy consumption, according to urban economics literature. Urban living encourages walking and cycling rather than driving and can make public transport more viable and reduce the length of trips. Hence, the need for increased urbanisation in China."
"Also, energy consumption has a positive and significant effect on carbon dioxide emissions in the long run, so pollution from carbon dioxide emissions is worsened. Regardless of China being the largest global consumer of renewable energy, the need for an energy diversification policy and a shift towards more clean and sustainable energy, including hydropower, wind power, solar energy, bio-energy, and tidal energy, have become more critical than ever. The evidence is that 58% of China’s total energy use in 2019 comes from coal, which results in high levels of pollution. The need for China to switch to clean energy use in its production process to cause clean economic growth is imperative. This is especially important with the rebirth of the BRI program, with many more countries signing up and opening up trade. As shown in the results and discussion section, all other results in the study point to the use of clean and emission-free energy, which promotes trade, urbanisation and maintain the green growth of the economy. If it is business as usual, environmental pollution is expected to continue to be on the rise as forecasted, see Fig. 3. The study also established a delayed effect between carbon dioxide emissions and past values of energy consumption, suggesting a short-run equilibrium relationship between them. Also, the long-run relationship urbanisation and international trade have with carbon dioxide emissions is an indication that the two are essential in explaining carbon dioxide emissions, and when integrated with a switch to clean energy use, will be helpful in the early attainment of the SDG 13 and net-zero emissions in China than expected."
"Finally, future research recommendations can use some three cointegration regressor specifications of FMOLS, CCR, and DOLS for consistent parameter estimates to check robustness. Omitted variable bias can also be dealt with in future research by including related variables such as agricultural trade."
"The study tests the EKC hypothesis, forecasts future paths, and models the dynamic relationship between ecological and economic variables in China. The problem of sustainable and green growth in China arises with the rebirth of the Belt and Road Initiative (BRI) program. Although there has been various research on the subject, the basic EKC model results are often conflicting. To obtain consistent parameter estimates, the basic EKC model was extended; the study’s contributions or novelties include avoiding the omitted variable bias by introducing urbanisation rate and international trade, which according to the literature, simultaneously influence pollution levels significantly. Also, more recent and robust estimation techniques including the Fourier ADF (FADF) unit root test, the time-varying bootstrap causality test, the Fourier ADL and Gregory-Hansen cointegration tests, fully modified ordinary least squares (FMOLS), vector error correction model (VECM), and the forecast error variance decomposition (FEVD) analysis were employed. The techniques mentioned earlier were confirmed using traditional methods such as the Johansen cointegration test and the traditional testing methods for unit root. The EKC is not valid in China. Cointegration and long-run relationships are established. Also, the future path of CO2 emissions continues to be on the rise. While economic growth, energy consumption and trade significantly increase CO2 emissions, urbanisation significantly lessens pollution from CO2 emissions in the long run. Policy recommendations include using new technologies, energy diversification, and the ultimate switch to clean energy use, including hydropower, wind power, solar energy, bio-energy, and tidal energy. Also, the need for increased urbanisation in China is critical to reducing CO2 emissions. It is partly because urban agglomeration allows for the same output to be produced using fewer resources."
"Access provided by Columbia University Libraries"
"1 Introduction"
"Kraft and Kraft, (1978) led the way in investigating the nexus between energy consumption, economic growth, and carbon dioxide emissions in the USA, which has since seen several other studies consider different countries, groups of countries, and regions (Bekun et al., 2019; Fernando, 2018; He et al., 2012; Shahbaz, 2015; Singru, 2015; Yilanci & Pata, 2020). The debate on this subject is increasingly relevant in the carbon mitigation and energy economics literature as empirical findings have shown that countries that produce and consume more energy tend to be wealthier (Owusu & Asumadu-Sarkodie, 2016). This is particularly the case for China; it is the world’s most populous country with some 1.4 billion people as of 2019 and with a fast-growing economy, which has resulted in it being the world’s largest energy producer and consumer (EIA, 2019). Coupled with its pivotal involvement and leadership on the rebirth and expansion of the Belt and Road Initiative (BRI) program and with many more countries signing up by the day to promote trade and economic growth, it increasingly concerns how much damage is done to the environment. The reason being that China is heavily dependent on coal for its energy needs; 58% of its energy needs came from coal use in 2019 (EIA, 2019). Therefore, the need for relevant stakeholders and government to appreciate the dynamic relationship and future paths of the studied variables will cause the coming into effect, robust energy, effective and environmental policy construction."
"To that end, past literature on the subject used causality flows to create four well-established parts of the debate (Inglesi-Lotz & Pouris, 2016; Sarkodie & Adom, 2018). The first part involves the conservative hypothesis, where energy consumption is driven by economic growth (Baranzini, 2013; Jamil & Ahmad, 2010). The neutrality hypothesis makes up the second part under which economic development and energy consumption are not causal in either direction (Halicioglu, 2009; Soytas & Sari, 2006). The third part is called the feedback causality, in which causality on both sides is found (Bekun et al., 2019). Lastly, the energy led-growth hypothesis comprises the fourth part. This discrepancy in literature notes that economic development relies on higher energy use (Damette & Seghir, 2013; Ghali & El-Sakka, 2004)."
"The literature on the nexus between energy consumption, economic growth, and carbon dioxide emissions have been well documented. In China, there have been several such studies (Jalil & Mahmud, 2009; He et al., 2012; Riti, 2017; Zhang, 2018; Zhou, 2019; Dieppe et al., 2020; Jun et al., 2020). Few economic studies have investigated how trade openness and urbanisation influence the environment, with researchers incorporating urbanisation and trade as factors in the model to remove omission bias (Kwakwa, 2020; Shahbaz et al., 2015; Tripathy & Mishra, 2021). Our literature review identified the gap mentioned earlier. That is to say, our literature review is deficient because a couple of key economic variables (urbanisation rate and international trade) are missing in simultaneously investigating the nexus between energy consumption, economic growth, and carbon dioxide emissions in China. Urbanisation rate and international trade have a causal effect on environmental pollution and that the duo increases pollution levels (Lv & Xu, 2019; Ozatac et al., 2017). Despite the numerous studies that test the ECK hypothesis for China, we avoid omitted variable bias by extending the basic EKC model to include several covariates such as urbanisation rate and international trade to understand better energy consumption and economic growth, and carbon dioxide emissions nexus. The choice of the variables for this study is based on the sustainable development goals (SDGs) 7, 8, 9, and 13, which were adopted in 2015 by the United Nations. The choice to include the two covariates (urbanisation rate and international trade) is especially vital as China signs more free trade agreements such as the BRI program, during a period of increasing urbanisation and international trade, which could impede China’s early attainment of the SDG’s, especially, SDG 13."
"Footnote"
"1"
"Another deficiency which this study corrects includes the use of more recent and robust estimation techniques including the Fourier ADF (FADF) unit root test of Enders and Lee, (2012), the time-varying bootstrap causality test of Hacker and Hatemi-J, (2006), the Fourier ADL and Gregory-Hansen cointegration tests with confirmation form the Johansen cointegration test, fully modified ordinary least squares (FMOLS) and a vector error correction model (VECM), amongst others. One such advantage of our estimation techniques in this study includes the Hacker and Hatemi-J, (2006) bootstrap causality analysis, which allows instabilities to be sighted over time and that cointegration analysis is not a necessary condition for the use of this test."
"We seek to address the deficiencies mentioned earlier and have been the motivation for this study. The study’s main objective is to forecast future paths and model the relationships between energy consumption, economic growth, carbon dioxide emissions, urbanisation, and trade. Specifically, we aim to:"
"		(1) Forecast the future paths of the variables used in the study."
"		(2) Investigate the dynamic relationship between the variables used in the study."
"		(3) Test the EKC for China."
"The study’s contributions or novelties are in three strands. First, the choice of variables is particularly novel. It avoids the omitted variable bias by introducing urbanisation and trade, which, according to literature, simultaneously increases pollution levels. Second, more recent, appropriate, and robust estimation techniques are employed. The more recent FADF is first used to test for unit root, followed by a confirmation of the unit root test using the traditional unit root methods including ADF, PP, KPSS, and ZA, which allowed for structural breaks. The Fourier ADL and Gregory-Hansen cointegration tests are applied and confirmed by the Johansen cointegration procedure. To check robustness further, we specified two test types; the eigenvalue statistic and the trace statistic. The VECM and FEVD are used to investigate the variables’ future paths, both in the short term and long term and study the relationship between them. The more recent Hacker and Hatemi-J, (2006) bootstrap causality test is employed to allow instabilities to be sighted over time while making the cointegration analysis is not a necessary condition for causality. Lastly, the study will add to the literature and bridge the knowledge gap on the nexus between energy consumption, economic growth, and carbon dioxide emissions in China, especially with the unique choice of variables, sound, and robust analytical techniques. The study’s results are expected to guide policymakers in China to draft and implement policies targeted at achieving sustainable economic growth."
"The structure of the study is as follows. The next section centres on a review of literature related to the subject being studied. Section three focuses on the data and the analytical techniques used. The fourth section presents and discusses the results of our empirical study. Finally, the fifth section provides concluding remarks on the study and policy recommendations."
"This paper examines the market potential for floating solar panel technologies and identifies an underutilized niche. Installations on medium-sized bodies of water such as reservoirs, small lakes and ponds are just beginning to be exploited. This study conducted qualitative interviews with regional water authorities that expressed interest in the emerging technology being applied to their reservoirs and lakes. Results indicate major public utility companies have interest tempered by the initial costs, lack of environmental impact data and implementation time. This paper explores the feasibility of a small venture focusing on a socially responsible strategic alliance to bridge this gap."
"Keywords: Floating Solar Panel, Niche Market, Entrepreneurship, Environmental, Social Responsibility"
"INTRODUCTION TO THE SOLAR MARKET"
"This paper first explains the need for solar, and the different types of solar panels and installations commonly found on the market. While most solar markets are saturated, an entrepreneurial opportunity of floating solar panel systems targeted with water authorities and companies is discussed. The results of interviews with these companies' decision makers are presented to gauge the possibility of smaller scale freshwater floating solar panels is provided. The article concludes with the feasibility of a small business venture and partnership with a university to kick start such projects with energy utilities."
"With a rise in global interests in alternative and renewable energies, the demand for solar can be expected to increase as well. Solar is a desirable energy source due to being a clean alternative to traditional energy use such as oil, gas, and coal. Using solar instead allows for reductions in carbon dioxide, sulfur dioxide, and nitrogen oxide emissions (Siler-Evans, 2013). Reducing these greenhouse gases allows for cleaner air and better health and environmental consequences."
"The solar industry has been steadily expanding. In 2017, solar represented 55 percent of all global newly installed renewable energy (Teske, Meinshausen & Dooley, 2019). The success of this energy source in the United States is largely due to federal and state tax incentives and programs that made it easier for not only customers to purchase solar panels, but also encouraged solar businesses to enter in the market. This made solar a state revenue stream totaling 1.6 billion dollars and moved it towards cleaner alternative sources of energy (SEIA, 2019). In Connecticut, the price of solar panels has dropped 47 percent in the last five years, and solar contributes to 1.47 percent of the energy market in the state (SEIA, 2019). Furthermore, many other states have committed to their own alternative energy goals. The size of the solar project will affect the energy produced and cost of the system. The average price of residential solar in the United States has fallen to approximately 18,000 dollars (SEIA, 2019)."
"For example, the current residential solar panel installation market in Connecticut can be estimated using data provided by the Connecticut Green Bank. They have monitored the number of residential sales for each installation company since 2011. The CT Green Bank has helped households obtain loans, leases, rebates, and incentives to further promote solar energy in the state. In 2018, the Connecticut Green Bank listed the competition in Connecticut as consisting of 54 solar companies and a total revenue of over 138 million dollars, with 19 of these providers holding 98 percent of the market (The Connecticut Green Bank, 2019). The largest competitor was Sunnova which held 1,893 completed contracts out of 4,799. This gave them a market share of 39.44 percent. 35 companies represent the group Other in the chart with 98 installations (The Connecticut Green Bank, 2019). A list of company sales is summarized in Table 1:"
"These companies are providing the same products and services, with similar incentives. It is difficult to obtain any differentiation as these companies rely heavily on direct sales and do very little to market themselves differently. Many companies used purchasing power agreements (PPA) to get contracts with customers. These allow the installers to finance the solar panel project for their customers at no upfront cost, and allow their customers to buy the energy from the providers. PPAs had helped solar companies in Connecticut make sales even though there was a drop in product diversity among providers in 2018 (Sauer et al., 2018)."
"Given the growth in established rooftop and ground installations, there is limited incentive to pursue less proven opportunities in the current floating solar panel market. This is understandable, but ironic, given the revenue potential of these new waterbased solar systems. The most common applications for floating solar panels are medium size installations on lakes, reservoirs, and small ponds. There are many examples of these around the world. The largest installation is in China and consists of 166,000 solar panels, and sits on a lake that once was used for coal mining (Campbell, 2019). It is able to produce 40 megawatts of power. China too has an enormous potential for floatovoltaics. It is estimated that they can house over 160 GW of floating solar panels on their water (Kumar & Mallikarjun, 2018). While Japan has the most of these systems, China sure has the largest; consisting of 20MW and 40MW floating solar arrays (Campbell, 2019). Another application which is in New Jersey sits on a water treatment reservoir that has 400 solar panels and can produce 135,000 kilowatts per hour annually (Landers, 2011). California's application of floating solar arrays on commercial winery reservoirs provide between 33 and 200 kilowatts per hour (Aspen Publishers, 2009). It is obvious that Asia-Pacific countries are leading the industry with floating solar arrays. The United States should take this information as a learning opportunity; perhaps, they should be moving into larger floatovoltaic systems rather than smaller scale utility projects. This paper, however explores the latter. The NREL estimates that there are 24,000 man-made bodies of water in the United States that could house this technology (NREL, 2018), and this could provide the country with 10 percent of its energy per year. With the number of water bodies in the United States there is money to be made here."
"THE SOLAR OPTIONS"
"Solar panels can be made from a variety of materials, depending on the application and the price point. They also can be installed in a variety of applications, the most common being on building, on ground, and on water. These installations vary from smaller residential applications, larger commercial and industrial applications, to massive utility applications. In short, customers can incorporate solar technologies and projects in a variety of customized ways to optimize meeting their energy needs."
"Types of Solar Panels"
"Traditional solar cells can be cut from a single piece of silicon to make monocrystalline solar panels, or many pieces of silicon compiled together to produce a polycrystalline solar panel. Monocrystalline can go through a process called the Czochralski approach. This process can be part of the reason monocrystalline panels are more expensive as it requires a single crystal rotating in a high temperature heated silicon vat and raised to draw up a higher efficient material (Kerns, 2017). Monocrystalline solar panels are more expensive and more efficient (Kurpaska et al., 2018). On the other hand, polycrystalline photovoltaics panels are often less efficient and less expensive than their monocrystalline counterparts, due to a less complex production process (Kerns, 2017). Each of these methods and silicon ingots can be cut into wafers and then polished and refined."
"The least expensive solar panels are the thin filmed panels. These include amorphous silicon panels, cadmium telluride (CdTe) solar cell panels, copper indium gallium selenide solar cells (CIGS), and others. These thin film panels use silicon in their designs, but are not made of silicon wafers. They are thinner, but have a bulky installation (Morton, 2011). There is a concern when using thin film panels, as many of them contain cadmium - a dangerous carcinogen. If handled improperly or damaged and leaked into the soil, this chemical could cause health and environmental problems. Efficiency ratings are compared in Table 2:"
"Irvine and colleagues conducted their research in 2017 as a summary of journal articles on solar panel efficiencies. NREL reported their own summary in 2019. They have been gathering data on solar panel efficiencies since 1976; the data listed in the above table represents the records as of 2019 from certified and independent lab tests as reported by NREL. Solar panel efficiencies represent the amount of sunlight that is actually able to be converted into electricity by the solar panel. A higher rating means the panels are able to convert more energy. There are many reasons that efficiencies are not higher. Some found high cell temperatures, energy conversion efficiency issues with reflected light, and maximum point power tracking issues had adverse effect on efficiencies (Dinçer & Meral, 2010). Other factors that affect efficiency levels are the type of materials and size of the solar panels (Levitan, 2012)."
"Types of Installations"
"Residential customers, commercial customers, institutions, and utility-scale solar projects require different types of installations for most rooftop solar and ground-mounted systems. Rooftop solar are the most common installations. Many companies provide monocrystalline or polycrystalline panels over thin-film solar panels due to the lack of space required to make thinfilm worth it (Sendy, 2017). If a building has a flat roof, rooftop solar panels can be mounted with ballast systems, that weigh down the panels on roofs, or mechanically systems attached by being bolted to the roofs system (Greenzu, 2019). An angled roof requires a pitched roof system."
"The use of water based solar arrays and floatovoltaic solar panel installations is a newer and increasingly popular installation (Chandran, 2019), particularly outside of the United States. The United States only had 7 floating solar projects installed by the end of 2017, while Japan had 56 of the largest 70, and there were 100 floating solar systems installed worldwide (NREL, 2018). These water-based solar arrays have many benefits that ground-mounted arrays do not, particularly when space considerations are at a premium. These solar panels on water can reduce algae buildup, and have a cooling effect by blocking the sunlight from hitting the water which decreases evaporation (Sahu et al., 2016). The water can also lower the panels operating temperatures and having them perform more efficiently (Spencer et al., 2019)."
"The largest floating solar arrays can be placed on large bodies of water such as oceans and seas, but are relatively rare (SEIA, 2019). There is no consensus on the most effective floating installation process or design. Some floatovoltaics rest on large floating platform or barges while others are interconnected by metal structures and flotation devices, all featuring flat or tilted panels. Floating solar arrays typically use crystalline solar panels, and some concepts and prototypes have been made utilizing thin film panels, which may have greater benefits on oceans and seas by adapting to the waves because they are more flexible of a solar panel (Trapini & Sanafé, 2015). Floating solar arrays on oceans and seas need to be able to handle a variety of factors like waves and salt water and humidity degradation (Handara et al., 2016). The Netherlands has designed and installed a project that resides off their coast that is able to produce 50 kilowatts at peak production hour (Sea Technology, 2018). This is a pilot program as they hope to find ways to scale these farms to compete with the more traditional, large-scale ground installations."
"Finally, below medium scale floating panels, on a much smaller, residential scale, floating solar panels can be purchased as commercial products online and in stores for pools. For the most part, these products are used to provide the energy needed to heat or clean the pools. Some are even used as a floating solar water fountains (Rosa-Clot et al., 2017)."
"METHODOLOGY: QUALITATIVE INTERVIEWS"
"After looking at the current solar panel market in Connecticut and the different types of floating solar systems, the United States appears to have an untapped market for floating solar arrays. Much of the opportunity for medium sized water bodies and reservoirs has been underutilized in the state. The control variable here is usage restrictions, common around lakeside developments. These rules and covenants effectively prohibit any installations on the shore or in the water that would potentially limit recreational uses or spoil scenic views. Consequently, this study will focus on restricted bodies of water (such as drinking supplies) which ban land development and recreation, with the possible exception of fishing. Thus, it was decided to assess the interest for floating solar arrays among regional water authorities and water companies in the state."
"Sample"
"This is an exploratory study, not definitive empirical work. Possible future research should be conducted with a larger sample to further gauge the market's potential. We conducted a total of 4 qualitative interviews and 1 survey (Company E) with water authorities and water companies in the state to gauge their own opinions on this emerging technology, and to see what barriers exist in starting up this venture. Names have been altered to protect proprietary information. The sample is summarized in Table 3:"
"Semi-structured Interviews"
"The following semi-structured, open-ended interview questions were used to gauge the water companies' and authorities' perspectives after explaining the concept of floating solar arrays:"
"- Do you like the idea of floating solar arrays and has your company thought of pursuing this itself?"
"- What are the reasons you are not doing this currently?"
"- Would you be open to partnering with an organization that would take care of these issues for you?"
"- Would you be interested in partnering with a startup and university to do research and tests on the water quality?"
"- What suggestions would you have for this partnership and what should it look like?"
"- Can you go back to your legal department and see how much resistance there would be?"
"- Are there any additional comments or suggestions you may have?"
"RESULTS"
"These interviews lasted at least an hour, with options for follow-up. The same questions were sent to Company E in a survey. The following themes emerged from qualitative thematic content analysis."
"Theme 1: Recognized Potential"
"All five decision makers liked the idea of floating solar arrays, although 3 of them had not heard about floating solar arrays before discussing it at the interview. Company D had been pursuing sustainable energy projects in the past, so this was interesting for them. The reason they were not pursuing this was because they had not known it existed. The 2 who knew of floating solar array projects in other states had considered pursuing them themselves, or with a commercial partner:"
"* Company A had been approached by one alternative energy supplier that was interested in a joint venture,"
"* Company B even had a contract lined up to install solar on their water treatment plant ponds, and had found a partner who specialized in this."
"Theme 2: Safety Concerns"
"The biggest concerns were on temperature and impact on the water quality. They noticed that seasonal changes and freeze and thaw could be challenges that need to be overcome in the design process of a floating solar array."
"* Company A repeatedly noted they did not want this to affect water quality testing when the Department of Public Health had heightened scrutiny about potential health risks."
"* Company B's joint venture was killed by the DPH, who refused to be the first in New England to study the water quality impact of floating solar arrays."
"* Company C noted their consideration of a floating solar array, but only after the Department of Public Health approved these types of projects in the state."
"* Company D wanted not only the approval of DPH, but also access to the records of already established floating solar arrays in other states on water quality impact."
"* Company E expressed concerns in the safety and public health, and may be open to the idea of partnering with someone to tackle their concerns."
"Theme 3: Return on Investment"
"All of the companies expressed concern over pursuing this kind of a project themselves. They had mentioned partnerships with universities in the past, and were open to more. Even with an effective managing partner or strategic ally, such as a university, they had concerns over:"
"* Pursuing a business not related to their core."
"* Lack of expertise and learning curve advantages - too much research needed"
"* Undefined benefit from the financial returns"
"* Undefined control over the energy output"
"* Guidance, rules, and legal advice of this partnership must come from DPH."
"Opinions varied as to the nature of this partnership, with company A preferring to be a limited collaborator (similar to a royalty deal), and company D who wanted to be involved in a strategic alliance with a group of engineers, lawyers, and workers that would handle regulatory issues, and water quality impact research."
"Theme 4: Complicated, Multi-stakeholder Approval"
"Companies noted that to be involved in a project like this, they would want to have shareholders receives some benefits as well. This partnership would need to have the managing organization to provide maintenance, testing, and sharing of revenue. Some companies required approval by the board, others by government agencies as well."
"IMPLICATIONS"
"However, the issue of multi-stakeholder approval goes beyond economics and logistics to embrace public relations and external stakeholder satisfaction. The greatest concerns dealt with getting approval by the Public Health Department of Connecticut. These companies and the regulatory agencies are concerned with how floating photovoltaic panels could be perceived as a potential source of contamination with adverse effects on the public. In this ""post-truth"" society mere suspicions can generate scandal and controversy, such as the antivaxxer public interest groups and their legislative agendas. The idea of an economically driven organization introducing large numbers of solar panels made from artificial materials with reassurances that they are safe presents too tempting a target."
"Overall, the water authorities and water companies had seemed interested in floating solar arrays and the opportunity of establishing them in Connecticut, because of their profit potential. Easton Reservoir in Easton Connecticut is about 21 million square feet in surface area. If a floating solar array could be installed on only .001 percent of the surface area, using a price per watt of 3.57 dollars for each solar panel (CT Greenbank, 2019) and 260 watts produced by each solar panel, we estimate the site could house approximately 1,200 solar panels at 320 kilowatts for peak hours and generate a little over 1,142,000 dollars in revenue. It is important to note, that before a business actually starts one of these projects, a cost-benefit analysis should be conducted. Additionally, a cost-benefit analysis should be looked at for future articles and research, yet is not the purpose of this article. In total, Connecticut has approximately 2,000 lakes and reservoirs (DEEP CT, n.d.), while the companies in our sample totaled 57 reservoirs. We acknowledge not all the reservoirs in the state would be able to house these systems. Additionally, creating supportive structures for lakes that do not ban recreation could be of use, but would require policy changes and talks with DEEP and DPH as well. Installing only one of these floating solar systems could provide a company with a large amount of revenue, however their priority is on their core business - and not ground and solar arrays. The economic issues of ownership, profit-sharing and logistics with floating arrays can be overcome with a carefully constructed strategic alliance(s) or a joint venture. These arrangements would mitigate perceptions of the project as a risky, expensive, and timeconsuming endeavor. The seemingly insurmountable barrier is the crisis of public distrust and the context of a highly contentious and litigious society."
"This is where social responsibility may be of service. Generally, there are two recognized forms of entrepreneurship, social entrepreneurship (not for profit) and commercial entrepreneurship (for profit). Changing the nature of the strategic alliance or joint venture from commercial (economic) to social redefines the issue of public perception and trust. Social entrepreneurship is designed to improve society, or some portion of it, while generating some economic return (Austin, Stevenson, & WeiSkillern, 2006)."
"The citizen sector has discovered what the business sector learned long ago: There is nothing as powerful as a new idea in the hands of a first-class entrepreneur. Social entrepreneurs are individuals with innovative solutions to society's most pressing social problems. They desire to improve society without regard to profit motives. They are ambitious and persistent, tackling major social issues and offering new ideas for wide-scale change. Rather than leaving societal needs to the government or business sectors, social entrepreneurs find what is not working and solve the problem by changing the system, spreading the solution, and persuading entire societies to move in (Ashoka, 2016, p. 1)."
"The recommendations and reassurances from a ""green"" socially responsible organization concerning intent, safety and mutually beneficial outcomes carry much more weight and public goodwill. Further, that partners involved temper their profit motive for the very real value of free marketing and improved public image. The costs of components such as impact studies become more reasonable. Access to volunteer services to help secure socially conscious goals becomes a possibility from community and campus interest groups. This will mitigate the currently exaggerated perceptions of risk of external stakeholders such as DPH."
"Further suggestions include systematically gathering data on successful, established floating solar arrays in other states and around the world. This would include both economic outcomes and ecological impact studies to supplement any regional studies in Southern New England. Some of the companies noted that this venture would need to start small and slowly. A pilot program with installing a small floating solar array on a reservoir in the state could be used to test the viability and success of these systems. There could be an opportunity to partner with universities to conduct zero ecological impact studies with this trial array as science and business internships. Then the data could speak for itself."
"Solar energy is the most abundant source of energy on earth and a modern technology referred to as crystalline silicon photovoltaic systems (C-Si-PV, abbreviated to PV) is used to convert solar energy to electricity. The basic element of the technology is the PV cell, a semiconductor device which does the conversion. When connected, PV cells form a PV module (panel), which, when integrated with additional accessories, create PV systems which can produce megawatts (MW - million watts) of electric power. OECD's International Energy Agency (IEA) predicts PV technology to supply over 10 percent of global electric power ([15] Technology Roadmap, 2010). The G-8 summit, in 2008 in Aomori, Japan, adopted a common policy to provide concerted public support and incentive systems to make PV technology more efficient, because solar power holds the promise to address global challenges of energy security, climate change, and sustainable development. In the midst of concerted and unified global efforts, however, cross-national disputes arise, as in the case of US-China dispute. In October 2011, seven US solar manufacturers filed petition with Department of Commerce (DOC) seeking action against the Chinese PV industry. The seven companies were led by an affiliate of a German company named Solar World AG who had filed a similar complaint with the German government and the EU in 2009, but was turned down in Europe ([16] USITC, 2011). The countervailing duty (CVD) petition claimed producers in China received unfair government subsidies. In December 2011, DOC imposed countervailing (CVD) duties on Chinese companies ([4] Bradsher, 2011)."
"Solar industry"
"Global demand for PV systems has been growing at 40 percent a year and in 2010 there were 23,000 MW of PV installations worldwide, generating the equivalent of 23 nuclear power plants. The rapid growth has been spurred by numerous government subsidy programs. A famous such program is known as feed-in-tariff (FIT), which guarantees fixed prices for solar energy producers and is used in over 60 countries worldwide including the USA, where solar PV systems are projected to grow to 50,000 MW and supply 8 percent of the nation's electricity by the year 2025 ([14] Study, 2008). The US Government also supports solar energy by subsidized loans, tax credits, land grants, and, on a state-by-state basis, mandates the use of solar electric power. An example is the state of California which recently enacted legislation requiring utility companies to obtain a minimum of 33 percent of their electric power from renewable energy ([2] Baker, 2011). Solar power in the USA has been growing at about 40 percent a year, and the cost per kilowatt-hour of solar PV systems has been declining, in part due to declining cost of components."
"Globally, the largest country installer of PV systems is Germany with a capacity of 10,000 MW. Europe's share of the global PV market was about 73 percent in 2010, as Figure 1 [Figure omitted. See Article Image.] shows. The US share was 6 percent and growing, China and Korea 2 percent each and growing rapidly, and the rest of the world 9 percent."
"Demand"
"Between 2010 and 2011, as the data in Table I [Figure omitted. See Article Image.] shows, world demand grew by 69.3 percent, and the rate of growth for the regions in the world ranged from 941 percent in the UK, 257 in Italy, 224 in China, 211 in Israel, 144 in France, 66.7 in the USA, 29.9 in Japan, and so on. Even Greece, the country facing a dismal economic outlook, increased its capacity by an impressive 167 percent. Enticed by such phenomenal demands, new producers entered the industry and existing producers expanded by means of added capacity, mergers and acquisitions. In China, many companies entered the industry anew in the middle of the decade contributing to the significant increase in China's output, both in absolute as well as relative terms."
"The size of PV market in Europe did not go unnoticed by US producers who have concentrated their production and marketing strategies to serve the European export market. An executive at one US company involved in the case put it this way, ""demand outside the USA is the critical driver of success in the (US) industry"" ([16] USITC, 2011). Demand in Europe, however, is beginning to decline. Beginning in March 2012, Germany scaled back its subsidy program by 29 percent and plans to continue cutting. Other European countries like the UK, France, Spain, and Italy have also begun scaling back their subsidies due to financial constraints facing European governments. Demand in the USA, however, has been growing steadily due to government mandates and a national policy of increasing reliance on renewable energy. As of 2011, the USA has under construction some 77 utility-scale projects with a total capacity of 13,200 MW. Suddenly, US producers' export market in Europe is stagnating and domestic market in the USA is expanding. Arguably, that may have caused US producers to lobby the government to protect the domestic market against foreign imports."
"Production"
"Spurred by remarkable demand and government support programs, production of PV systems has been growing spectacularly. Global output was 277 MW in 2000 and rose to 24,000 MW in 2010 (1,000 MW is equal to a gigawatt, GW), an increase of 6,376 percent. As the data in Table II [Figure omitted. See Article Image.] shows, all countries increased their production. In the USA, output in 2010 was 1,486 percent the 2000 level; Germany 8,791 percent; Japan 1,681 percent, and so on. Japan was the world leader between 2000 and 2007. In 2001, Japan produced 46 percent of world output, and the USA produced 27 percent. China produced less than one percent. In the second half of the decade, though, China accelerated its production capacity and replaced Japan as the world leader producing 46 percent of world output in 2010."
"Price"
"PV price in world markets seems to fall 20 percent when production capacity rises 100 percent. Volume doubled between 2002 and 2004, and price fell from 2.20 to $1.80, and between 2007 and 2009 volume more than doubled and price fell by almost 40 percent. After 2008, price declined faster and reached $1.00 in 2011 ([17] World Solar, 2012). Considering that China's output was less than 7 percent of world PV production until the middle of the decade, it is doubtful that China was the driver behind the price decline in world markets. In his address before USITC, economist [6] Button (2011) stated that:"
"[...] consistent with the history of wide range of semiconductor type products, the price of PV modules has been declining progressively for many years, long before Chinese producers entered the PV market."
"Studies at George Washington University concluded that once Chinese producers began to achieve economies of scale, their prices for PV modules became more efficient and gradually became identical to world prices, not lower ([3] Bayaliyev et al. , 2011). The decline in price of PV produced in China can better be explained by pointing to classic competitive imperatives: the fall in the price of production inputs especially polysilicon, erosion of barriers to entry to the market resulting in an industry with fierce price rivalry, cost efficiencies resulting from economies of scale and industry oversupply."
"US policy"
"US policy toward solar energy is one of long term and multi-faceted support, as manifested by numerous policies and programs such as the Solar America Initiative (SAI) to make solar energy cost efficient and competitive with conventional forms of electricity (grid parity), and the Department of Energy's (DOE) Sun Shot Initiative and Solar Energy Technology Program (SETP) to provide financial and other forms of assistance to industry in the following areas: market transformation, to address marketplace barriers and create opportunity for market expansion; device and process proof of concept, to support R&D to develop more efficient devices and processes; component prototype and pilot scale production, to support R&D to generate prototype PV components; and, system development and manufacturing, to support industry and university collaboration to develop solar technologies ([13] Solar Power, 2012). As recently as June 2012, DOE announced awarding $56 million to support advanced solar power technologies ([7] Energy Department, 2012)."
"The US Energy Information Administration (EIA) published a report in August, 2011 titled Direct Federal Financial Interventions and Subsidies in Energy ([1] Analysis, 2011). EIA identifies five subsidy and support programs for energy industries: direct cash expenditures to producers and consumers; tax subsidies to reduce federal tax liability for producers and consumers; R&D expenditures primarily to producers; loans and loan guarantees; and electricity expansion programs for certain geographic regions in the country. According to EIA, the value of direct federal financial subsidies in energy markets doubled between 2007 and 2010, growing from $17.9 billion to $37.2 billion. With regard to solar power, EIA identifies key expenditures and subsidies, summarized in Table III [Figure omitted. See Article Image.]."
"Another government support program is the dedication of vast areas of federal lands for solar power projects. In 2012, the Bureau of Land Management is dedicating solar energy zones, the combined areas of which come up to 98 million acres in many states for the long term goal of facilitating the generation of up to 10 million MW ([11] Renewable Energy, 2012). Table IV [Figure omitted. See Article Image.] shows a sample of the zones."
"In addition to all federal support programs, governments at many state and even municipality levels give support and subsidy to solar producers and users. States like California, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Louisiana, Hawaii, Michigan and many others have diverse support and subsidy programs. Government subsidies to solar industry are popular in America. According to a 2011 survey of public opinion, nine out of ten Americans support the development and use of solar technology, and eight out of ten people say that the federal government should support solar manufacturing in the USA and should give federal subsidies for solar energy ([9] Leone, 2011)."
"Analysis and conclusion"
"The CVD petition that started this trade dispute was filed by a local affiliate to a German company and six anonymous US companies, claiming material ""injury"" from Chinese imports. In response, a much larger number of companies in the US solar industry, including the over 100 companies represented by the coalition of affordable solar energy (CASE), spoke up against the petition. CASE made the argument that companies in the industries of selling, installing, distributing and servicing PV panels, and employing thousands of workers, would get hurt and possibly go out of business if the government were to impose punitive duties on Chinese products. It turns out that the US solar industry employs about 100,000 workers of which 57 percent are in the installation business, 21 percent are in sales and distribution, and only 14 percent in manufacturing ([10] Nash-Hoff, 2012). Demand for PV systems continues to be price sensitive, and any increase in price due to punitive tariffs could dampen demand and hurt the business of the US companies employing 86 percent of the industry's workforce. A recent study published in January of 2012 predicted that tariffs on imported PV products from China will result in as many as 50,000 lost jobs in the USA. Furthermore, retaliatory tariffs placed on US exports of polysilicon to China would put another 11,000 American jobs at risk in the first year alone ([5] Brattle Group, 2012)."
"As for the world view of the industry and financial support, the world community considers solar energy to be a promising solution to important environmental and economic challenges that is worthy of public support. In a recent publication by the IEA of the OECD, IEA stated that:"
"[...] development of affordable, inexhaustible and clean solar energy technologies will have huge long-term benefits. It will increase countries' energy security through reliance on an indigenous, inexhaustible and mostly import-independent resource, enhance sustainability, reduce pollution, lower the costs of mitigating climate change, and keep fossil fuel prices lower than otherwise. These advantages are global. Hence the additional costs of the incentives for early deployment should be considered learning investments ([12] Solar Energy, 2011)."
"IEA estimates that by 2050, PV will provide 11 percent of global electricity production and avoid 2.3 gigatonnes of CO2 emissions per year (Gigatonne is equal to ten billion tons). IEA advocates the continuation of government support until PV achieves grid parity, i.e. competitiveness with electricity grid retail prices, estimated to occur in 2020. Once grid parity is achieved, IEA endorses progressive phase-out of the majority of economic incentives, but continued support for R&D to advance the technology and reduce cost ([15] Technology Roadmap, 2010)."
"As for government subsidies of solar industry, the US Government has a strong policy of advocating and supporting solar energy. The Economic Report of the President in 2010 boasts of government subsidies of tens of billions of dollars for production and generous tax credits for consumption of PV systems ([8] Ikenson, 2012). Even the USITC, the government agency that investigated the CVD petition, made reference to the environment-friendly government incentive measures, and other policies, including those that stem from national obligations under international environmental agreements (such as the Kyoto Protocol), have contributed to the growth of certain segments of the industry of producing electricity from renewable energy, especially solar and wind ([16] USITC, 2011). In this global environment of worldwide and US Government support for solar energy by means of subsidies and other financial and non-financial incentives, it is an occasion for the DOC to reconsider the imposition of CVD tariffs."
""
"Over the last half-century-plus, the US has signed a great many anti-US trade deals."
"What would appear to be antithetical to…everything? Makes perfect sense once one learns who funds politicians’ campaigns - and hires ex-politicians."
"Then-candidate Donald Trump was rich enough to end-run for president - around this vicious anti-US cabal. So he could campaign on the emperor being naked - and promise US trade deals that made some semblance of sense for the US."
"And then Trump won. And the trade reforms Trump emplaced - are all much better for the US."
"Most unfortunately, Trump’s addled, anti-US successor Joe Biden is now charged with ensuring they continue to benefit the US."
"Meanwhile, everyone’s attempts to rip-off the US live on."
"Since “green energy” is itself, in its entirety a rip-off - this is hardly surprising…."
"US Govt Asked to Review Chinese Solar Companies Allegedly Circumventing Antidumping Duties:"
"“A new group called the American Solar Manufacturers Against Chinese Circumvention (A-SMACC), represented by D.C. law firm Wiley, has filed a petition with the Department of Commerce, asking the department to investigate Chinese silicon solar panel manufacturing companies working in Malaysia, Thailand and Vietnam as a way to avoid antidumping and countervailing (AD/CV) duties.”"
"Why are the Communist Chinese being charged extra duties?"
"China Dominates the Solar Industry:"
"“Chinese entrepreneurs started making their own solar products, destined for places like Europe, where governments were subsidizing the installation of solar power. They benefited from the same strategies that made China so successful at manufacturing in general…."
"“Building up the solar manufacturing industry – at many points along the supply chain – became a national priority. The Chinese government funded research labs at solar companies and promoted upstream production of polysilicon, one of the key raw materials for solar panels."
"“Also, according to Chen Gang, ‘the government gives a lot of subsidies to the energy, because this industry needs a lot of energy, and also cheap land, and bank loans. They all help Chinese industry to gain competitiveness.’ Much of the support came from local governments, about which he says little is known.…"
"“Some government support is alleged to have been more covert."
"“In 2014, a grand jury indicted five hackers working for China’s military with hacking the solar technology of U.S. companies and then sharing it with Chinese companies."
"“In 2020, prosecutors charged another group of hackers with working with China’s Ministry of State Security to steal industrial intellectual property, including around solar."
"“Widmer of First Solar said the government support, in all its forms, helped Chinese companies elbow out the competition."
"“‘They subsidize industries, highly motivate them to create overcapacity, which then creates pricing power. They export that product into international markets with predatory pricing behavior and squash all competition,’ he said.”"
"None of that smacks of free trade, does it. Well then you’ll love this…."
"China Helped Make Solar Power Cheap Through Subsidies, Coal And Allegedly, Forced Labor"
"I would have skipped the word “allegedly” - but it ain’t my article….:"
"“In recent years Chinese manufacturers have come to dominate world output in solar panels and components. The conventional wisdom within the renewable energy sector, until recently, was that China had taken over the market because its companies were more efficient, with better automation and more reliable supply chains."
"“But events over the last few months make clear that there have been some other factors working in China’s favor: cheap coal, heavy Chinese government subsidies allowing for the dumping of solar panels on foreign markets, and the use of forced labor in conditions described as ‘genocide’ and ‘slavery.’”"
"The slavery is real - and an abomination."
"So too is the irony of China using cheap, real energy coal - to make expensive, “green energy” solar panels cheaper."
"And then China further subsidizes the heck out of the panels - to further undercut everyone everywhere else."
"In response to all of this fake “free trade” behavior - we impose extra import duties."
"Which China then circumvents - by running their slave-labor, coal-fired, “green energy” solar panels through nearby countries they can bully into letting them do whatever they wish."
"The Biden Administration is being asked to impose the China tariffs on these Chinese products - regardless of what pass-through countries they use to get them here. Which the law requires they do:"
"“If Commerce finds that importers are avoiding duties by rerouting their solar panels through the Southeast Asian nations, then by law the department must impose duties.”"
"But adherence to the law is not something to which the Biden Administration has demonstrated a whole lot of fealty."
"And how concerned are the US “green energy” people about all of this slave-labor, coal-fired “green energy” coming from Communist China? A whole lot - but for all the wrong reasons...:"
"“(S)olar project developers in the U.S. say it will force them to renegotiate prices or abandon projects altogether - hampering Biden’s goal to eliminate carbon emissions from electricity production by 2035."
"“If the new duties on panels are approved, developers say, they could slash the rollout of solar projects in the U.S. by nearly a third over the next two years."
"“The new tariffs would be ‘absolute industry killers,’ warned Ben Catt, CEO of Pine Gate Renewables, a North Carolina-based solar project developer. ‘If you were to put those tariffs on any of the projects we are doing right now, I just think the pricing structure gets thrown out the window.’”"
"If your entire “green energy” industry REQUIRES massive government subsidies, lots of coal and a heaping helping of slave labor - to even exist?"
"It isn’t a very good business model. And I use “good” - in every sense of the word."
"This study investigates the role of international trade in mitigating carbon dioxide emission as a nation economically advances. This study disaggregated the international trade into total exports and total imports. A multivariate model framework was estimated for the time series data for the period of 1970–2014. The quantile regression detected all the essential relationship, which hitherto, the traditional ordinary least squares could not capture. A cointegration relationship was confirmed using the Johansen cointegration model. The findings of the Granger causality revealed the presence of a uni-directional Granger causality running from energy consumption to economic growth; from import to economic growth; from imports to exports; and from urbanisation to economic growth, exports and imports. Our study established the presence of long-run relationships amongst carbon dioxide emission, economic growth, energy consumption, imports, exports and urbanisation. A bootstrap method was further utilised to reassess the evidence of the Granger causality, of which the results affirmed the Granger causality in the long run. This study confirmed a long-run N-shaped relationship between economic growth and carbon emission, under the estimated cubic environmental Kuznet curve framework, from the perspective of China. The recommendation therefore is that China as export leader should transform its trade growth mode by reducing the level of carbon dioxide emission and strengthening its international cooperation as it embraces more environmental protectionisms."
"In recent years, several emerging economies including China have witnessed massive growth in social and economic development due to the comprehensive trade and economic reforms undertaken (Michieka et al. 2013). The massive economic growth, consequently, leads to an upsurge in demand for energy (Al-mulali et al. 2015). Most of the energy used, however, is the fossil fuel, which poses enormous environmental degradation problem such as pollution. China happens to be amongst the top emitters of carbon dioxide in the World (US Environmental Protection Agency 2014). Researchers over the years have modelled the link between environmental pollution and economic growth. ."
"The commencement of the New Silk Road Economic Belt by the Government of China, recently, is an unprecedented huge step in the history of China to further promote trade and capital network amongst neighbouring countries towards the realisation of the ‘great opening-up strategy’ of China. The following questions therefore arise as the country embrace massive economic development: what should be done not to endanger the environment? and the role international trade should play in mitigating environmental pollution as capital and technology are being exchanged amongst neighbouring countries."
"There is therefore the need for trade to be disaggregated into export and import to explicate the distinct and very essential contribution of the individual total export and total imports to the level of carbon dioxide emissions from the perspective of the emerging economy, China."
"There is extant literature focussing on energy consumption in the environment-energy-economic growth literature (Al-mulali et al. 2015; Atici 2009; Azam et al. 2016; Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Halicioglu 2009; Hossain 2011; Jalil and Feridun 2011; Kasman and Duman 2015; Li et al. 2016; Lorente and Álvarez-Herranz 2016; Nasir and Rehman 2011; Omri 2013; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2013a, b, 2014)."
"Most of these available literature tend to confirm the existence of the environmental Kuznets curve (Atici 2009; Jalil and Feridun 2011; Jayanthakumaran et al. 2012; Kasman and Duman 2015; Li et al. 2016; Nasir and Rehman 2011) or deny the validity of environmental Kuznet curve (EKC) (Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Halicioglu 2009; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015), with some others providing the causality and the effect of economic growth on CO2 emissions. Most researchers have examined the energy-environmental relationship using diverse variables. Paramount amongst the set of variables utilised in recent studies are the following: the CO2 emissions, the energy consumption, the real income, the square real income and trade (Atici 2009; Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Halicioglu 2009; Jayanthakumaran et al. 2012; Kasman and Duman 2015; Li et al. 2016; Nasir and Rehman 2011; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2014). The above-mentioned set of variables has been extensively used by many researchers with much focussed on developed countries (Atici 2009; Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Halicioglu 2009; Kasman and Duman 2015) whilst few studies on emerging economies (Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Li et al. 2016; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2014) either on panel level (Al-mulali et al. 2015; Atici 2009; Kasman and Duman 2015) or at country level (Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Halicioglu 2009; Li et al. 2016; Nasir and Rehman 2011; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2014) utilising varied methodologies such as unit root test (augmented Dicker-Fuller (ADF), Phillips-Perron (PP), Zivot-Andrews), ordinary least squares (OLS), Johansen cointegration, GMM, ARDL and Granger causality."
"Some recent studies have additionally included urbanisation (Al-mulali et al. 2015; Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Jalil and Feridun 2011; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015) and assert that urbanisation positively contributes to the rise in carbon dioxide emissions in the long run."
"However, in investigating the role of trade and its effect in the environment-energy-economic growth nexus, most of the studies aggregated trade and computed it in one of the following three major categories: as sum total of export and imports, as a percent of export and imports to the total GDP or as sum of real exports and imports over real gross national product (GNP). The following researchers (Al-mulali et al. 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2013a, b) aggregated trade by summing total exports and imports. Similarly, some researchers (Atici 2009; Dogan and Turkekul 2016; Farhani and Ozturk 2015; Hossain 2011; Jalil and Feridun 2011; Jayanthakumaran et al. 2012; Kasman and Duman 2015; Li et al. 2016; Nasir and Rehman 2011; Omri 2013; Ozturk and Al-Mulali 2015; Shahbaz et al. 2014) aggregated trade by computing it as the ratio of exports plus imports to GDP. In the same vein, Halicioglu (2009) aggregated trade as total value of exports and imports as a share of real GNP."
"The use of aggregate trade has failed thus to identify and capture the distinct and very essential role of the respective components of trade: total export and total imports, on the level of carbon emissions. Trade is often synonymously also referred to as trade openness, openness and foreign trade in most of the studies in the environment-energy-economic growth nexus."
"In order to fill the aforementioned gap in the literature, this study disaggregated trade into imports and export. This study therefore investigates the influence of real income, real income square, real income cube, energy consumption, imports, export and urbanisation on the level of carbon dioxide emissions."
"In recent years, China’s trend of trade amongst neighbouring countries has changed fundamentally. China’s export has improved drastically from commodity to manufactured goods, textile products and electronic goods (China Embassy Report 2011). China’s trade ranks high globally. By 2010, China had become the world’s largest exporter of goods (China Embassy Report 2011). In 2010, the total value of China’s export was 1.5778 trillion US dollars and total value of its import was 1.3962 trillion US dollars (China Embassy Report 2011). China’s remarkable trade pattern can be attributed to the country’s opening-up strategy reforms and joining trade schemes such as World Trade Organisation (WTO) and the China-Association of South East Asian Nations (ASEAN) Free Trade Agreements (Michieka et al. 2013)."
"Now, with the onset of the New Silk Road Economic Belt, it is envisaged that China and its neighbouring countries will reap hugely from trade amongst themselves as they embrace massive advances in economic growth. The fear, however, is the environmental effects such economic growth can have on the environment."
"Hence, the purpose of this study is to investigate the role international trade plays in mitigating carbon dioxide emissions even as the economy advances from the perspective of emerging economy, China. This study differs from earlier research for the following three reasons: firstly, unlike most studies, this study captures the distinct separate role of imports and exports (international trade) on a set of variables used in recent studies in the energy-economic growth-environment pollution nexus in order to reveal their distinct impact on China, mostly ignored when aggregate trade is rather utilised. Secondly, in most studies, the predominant methodologies used are the conventional econometric methods, which are ADF, PP unit root test, OLS and Granger causality. This present study further extends the frontiers of present knowledge by empanelling and testing an ensemble of more sophisticated analytical and up-to-date econometric models such as the cubic environmental Kuznet curve with interaction effect, dynamic ordinary least squares (DOLS), covariate augmented Dicker-Fuller (CADF) and bootstrap causality test. The results are then compared with the predominant conventional models in order to examine their respective statistical powers and subsequent robustness of inference. Thirdly, this study covers a long span of period for better and thorough analyses and discussions."
"This study is relevant as it provides insight on how the separate components of international trade affect carbon dioxide emissions and the economy of emerging economies like China. In addition, understanding the key role of international trade as a tool for mitigating carbon dioxide emission is critical for developing policies on trade and for trade reforms."
"The remainder of the study is organised as follows. The “Literature review” section reviews related literature, whilst the “Data and method” section presents the econometric approach used in this study. The “Empirical results” section presents the empirical results and discussion of this study. The “Conclusion and possible policy recommendations” section offers the conclusion and policy recommendations."
"The industry coalition that initiated the investigation into China-based solar PV manufacturing was centred on solar module manufacturers without ties to China. The German company SolarWorld established EU ProSun, which included over 20, mostly anonymous, producers . On 25 July 2012, EU ProSun filed a complaint with the EC that Chinese importers were selling solar modules and key components (i.e. cells and wafers) under market value.In response, the EC launched an anti-dumping investigation on 6 September 2012  Shortly thereafter, on 25 September 2012, EU ProSun filed a complaint about illegal subsidies to Chinese solar manufacturers, which led the EC to initiate an official anti-subsidy investigation on 8 November 2012. According to Milan Nitzschke, head of the group, it had 40 supporters, of which 25 participated in the complaint; 5 of those are Germany-based In contrast, the Alliance for Affordable Solar Energy (AFASE) was an industry coalition vocally opposed to the imposition of trade sanctions against China. It was founded in March 2012, and initially represented more than 70 companies. By the time it merged with the Sustainable Energy Trade Initiative (SETI Alliance), a public-private group promoting free trade in clean technologies, in December 2013, the alliance had more than 800 supporters. AFASE mostly represented the interests of downstream firms that had the opportunity to use Chinese products when installing solar panels: 190 of our sample of 275 firms, or 72 per cent out of a total membership of 856 if we extrapolate from the sample to the population, are downstream firms. A second type of firm in this industry coalition was wholesalers of solar equipment and manufacturers that sold peripheral equipment for the installation of PV panels such as mounting systems. In the early stage, the organisation received strong support from Chinese manufacturers including Trina, Yingli und Suntech A second industry coalition opposed to the imposition of trade sanctions was VDMA PV, the PV branch of the German Engineering Association. This group was incorporated into the solar GSC by selling tools and machines to Chinese solar cell and module manufacturers. Although its position was the same as AFASE, it only occasionally cooperated directly with them, as its mandate was limited to speaking for the specific segment. In addition, the polysilicon producer Wacker Chemie lobbied individually against tariffs . An attempt to unite the various groups and companies opposing tariffs failed . The fragmentation within industry thus led to the failure of industry-wide collective action and to the failure of collective action among the groups opposing trade protection. Instead, it created intra-industry competition for influence over trade policy. As discussed, EPIA, the sectoral umbrella trade association, remained neutral in the dispute as a result of conflicting positions of its members.A second effect of this division was to fragment the information provided to the EC, increasing ambiguity regarding the costs and benefits to the European economy of imposing trade remedies. Evidence shows that the proponents and the various opponents of trade protection contested which segments of the value chain generated more economic value and the higher number of jobs in written submissions. EU ProSun and AFASE each commissioned expert studies, which bolstered their respective positionsThe study supporting AFASE’s position suggested that a 60 per cent tariff on Chinese solar panels could cost 242,000 European jobs over a three-year period. The loss in revenue could amount to 4.7–10.2 billion euro over the three-year period The study commissioned by EU ProSun, on the other hand, rejected those numbers on methodological grounds. In particular, it called into question the baseline assumption on the total number of jobs in the European solar sector in the AFASE study. In addition, it pointed to the effects of tariffs on employment in the US solar industry. The year before, the US government set tariffs on Chinese solar imports. An industry study had projected significant job losses for the US solar sector. However, the report provided by EU ProSun argued that solar jobs grew after tariffs had been put in place VDMA and Wacker Chemie separately provided information on the economic contribution of their respective members. VDMA put the total revenues of its members in the PV sector at 1.4 billion euro  Wacker Chemie said that the group’s China sales of 1.03 billion euro accounted for one fifth of the group’s total revenue Eight upstream producers provided information directly to the Commission, suggesting that in total they represented 4200 jobs These information battles around economic value divided manufacturers and sent ambivalent signals to policy-makers about what course of action was in the Union’s economic interest."
"The industry coalitions that emerged in the trade dispute were thus divided over how to respond to rising Chinese solar photovoltaics imports. Also, the opposition to tariffs was split into three groups, failing to organise as a single voice. This provided the EC with discretion in trade policy choice. Commission officials could ‘shop’ among industry interests for best match with their own preferences. The EC decided to support the imposition of trade barriers against Chinese imports."
"Policy-maker interests"
"The institutional setting within which European decision-making occurs in anti-dumping cases offers considerable delegation to the EC, independently from the preferences of member states (Young and Peterson The EC has exclusive, as opposed to shared, competence in trade policy. It thus conducts trade policy on behalf of the member states. Why did the EC decide in favour of trade protection to module manufacturers in the form of provisional tariffs, despite divisions and the provision of ambiguous information from industry? Evidence suggests that the decision to impose import duties occurred because it matched the preferences of policy-makers in the EC. This is despite the fact that the technical staff in DG Trade and the Director-General of DG Trade in the EC, Jean-Luc Demarty, did not favour taking up the solar PV case.Interview data, including from interviews with EU officials, suggest the goal of Trade Commissioner Karel De Gucht was to bring a major case against China to gain bargaining leverage De Gucht had sought opportunities for a push against China since entering office. His goal was to level the playing field for European firms in competition with Chinese companies  In a memo discussing the provisional solar tariffs De Gucht related his decision on solar PV to the Commission being able to see the ‘big picture’  This bigger picture was the use of export credits and other state support to drive foreign sales of Chinese manufacturers  As an EU diplomat said, ‘They see it as leverage with the Chinese. I think they were frustrated for many years that they didn’t have any’ (in Chaffin ). Already in March 2012, one year before the decision on the solar case, Vanheukelen, head of the cabinet of De Gucht, said at a meeting of the European Policy Centre: ‘We should use all the tools we have at our disposal to tackle barriers that distort the market. We may take to court countries that we don’t think are playing fairly’ . Evidence thus suggests that De Gucht chose to pursue the solar trade case, despite the division of industry and fragmented information. Indeed, the Commission itself commissioned data from a firm that had close ties to SolarWorld, leading to controversy over the data underlying the Commission’s assessmentIt is plausible that the EC chose the solar case, in particular, because of its high salience.Apart from being a consumer product and a large industry with a trade value of 21 billion euro , the EU solar PV industry was understood to be well known among the public because of policy debates on climate change and the feed-in tariff.Interviewees suggested that only telecommunications, which was a likely candidate for a trade case, rivalled the solar PV industry in terms of political salience.The high salience of the solar PV industry in the eye of the European public thus offered the Commission an opportunity to leverage the solar case in support of its broader China trade agenda: ‘For Brussels, the solar case has always been about more than just the future of the solar industry. The EU has targeted the perceived “state capitalist system” in China”  30). Against this backdrop, the EC established provisional anti-dumping tariffs in June 2014, despite opposition from 17 EU member statesTo summarise, divisions among firms operating in the solar industry, which reflected differences in their participation in global supply chains that incorporated Chinese production, fragmented support for the imposition of trade remedies. It also led to different industry coalitions that emerged to provide competing information to the EC regarding the economic effects of trade protection for the European economy. Rather than rejecting the imposition of trade remedies, however, the Commission ‘shopped’ among these different interests for the position that was aligned with their own interest. The choice to provide protection may have been informed by the high degree of public salience of the solar industry among the public."
"The broad objective of this study is to analyze areas in which the climate change agenda intersects with multilateral trade obligations. The study identifies the key issues at stake, as well as possible actions -- at the national and multilateral levels -- that could help developing countries strengthen their capacities to respond to emerging conflicts between international trade and global climate regimes while taking advantage of new opportunities. The study also attempts to respond to the need for more sector-specific analysis. Chapter two contributes to the literature by exploring the economic, environmental, and political rationale underlying the potential tension between implementation of the Kyoto Protocol and the existing World Trade Organization (WTO) principles. The chapter further identifies areas where priorities for proactive policy initiatives could minimize potential damage to both trade and global environmental regimes. Chapter three explores and identifies key barriers and opportunities to spur the transfer and diffusion of climate-friendly and clean-energy technologies in developing countries. It further identifies policies and institutional changes that could lead to the removal of barriers and increased market penetration of climate-friendly technology. Chapter four examines and builds on the different approaches that have emerged in the negotiations surrounding trade in environmental goods and services, and it proposes a framework for integrating climate objectives in the discussions. Chapter five presents the conclusions and provides a framework for integrating and streamlining the global environment within the global trading system."
"Renewable energy technologies play an increasingly important role in global energy systems  An important reason for this is governments’ use of green industrial policy, including financial support for the development and deployment of clean technologies  Since the 2008 financial crisis, in particular, governments implemented sectoral growth policies, with a significant share of the fiscal spending targeting renewable energy industries Green industrial policy is designed to increase the competitiveness of renewable sources of energy against fossil fuels.A second goal is to promote national competitiveness in new growth sectors  As governments compete for market share in renewable energy industries, a global subsidy race has emerged. This has led to a series of bilateral and multilateral trade disputes in renewable energy industries, notably in the solar photovoltaic and wind industriesThe solar trade conflict between the European Union (EU) and China, in which the European Commission (EC) imposed a minimum price and import quotas on imports of solar cells and modules from China, is one of the most significant renewable energy trade disputes to have emerged. The decision by the EC to pursue trade sanctions is puzzling for a number of reasons. Theory commonly assumes that the demands of producers dominate consumer interests, in part because industry faces fewer coordination costs than consumersYet in the solar trade case, the penalty was imposed despite the majority of solar producers rejecting tariffs, claiming it would undermine competitiveness. Further, the structure of EU trade law requires trade policy-makers to consider the broad effects of any trade measure under consideration, in contrast to US trade law, which privileges applicants for trade relief  The decision also runs counter to key policy preferences of the EC: liberalising trade and investment in energy markets and reducing the cost of renewable energy to mitigate climate change.How can we explain the decision of the EC to impose trade restraints against Chinese solar photovoltaic manufacturers? We propose that trade policy outcomes in the European solar photovoltaic industry reflect the political effects of an important new feature of the global organisation of production on the balance of negotiating power between business and policy-makers: the emergence of global supply chains (GSCs). GSCs are characterised by the spatial dispersion of production globally, and substantial outsourcing to third-party suppliers  We argue that GSCs can have important implications for policy outcomes by limiting the structural power of business that is identified as a core feature of economic globalisation Specifically, we suggest that the increased heterogeneity in the characteristics of producers – through the rise of firms that specialise in distinct segments of production – can reduce the ability of business to organise collectively In addition, we propose that intra-industry heterogeneity can lead firms to supply different information regarding the economic implications of policy choices to policy-makers, thus undermining the informational advantage that is a key source of business power.In the case of solar photovoltaics, we suggest that divisions among business over the benefits of trade protectionism, and conflicted information on what is in Europe’s economic interest, created an opportunity for the EU Trade Commission to select an industry position that matched its preferred policy outcome. Industry divisions thus enabled policy-makers to engage in ‘interest shopping’, by adopting a position that matched their preferred policy outcome. As we show, the EC’s response contrasts with that of the German government, where the solar industry in Germany was similarly divided but the government chose to lobby against the imposition of trade sanctions on Chinese importers. This adds further evidence suggesting that policy-makers had the freedom to choose positions adopted by sections of industry that matched their preferred outcomes.Our argument contributes to theory and policy. Theoretically, we advance the understanding of the effects of changes in the global organisation of production on the structural power of business. Conventional wisdom holds that the lowering of barriers to investment across national borders has increased the negotiating power of business against governments by providing a credible threat of exit  through GSCs can have the opposite effect, increasing intra-industry heterogeneity. Intra-industry heterogeneity undermines collective action, and increases the ambiguity of information over the distributional implications of policy choices. Both effects, we propose, serve to weaken the structural power of business relative to policy-makers.In policy terms, we identify a new trade-off in which the protection of domestic producers competes with the promotion of open trade in low-carbon energy technologies that can help mitigate climate change. By increasing the price of solar products, such trade barriers have the potential to slow the diffusion of renewable energies, a key technology to mitigate climate change. Our findings support a case for a more considered treatment of trade cases in green technologies as these industries grow in scale The article proceeds as follows. First, we discuss the effects of the rise of global supply chains on trade politics, with a focus on the balance of power between the interests of firms and those of policy-makers. Second, we examine two cases: (1) the EU’s decision to pursue trade remedies against Chinese manufacturers; (2) Germany’s opposition to trade remedies. We conclude by flagging the implications of our findings for the political economy of trade literature and for the policy debate on green industries.The globalisation of production and business power in trade politicsTheory and evidence suggest a conditional relationship between business power and policy outcomes Industries with higher levels of market concentration are expected to be politically influential, for example, given the lower costs to collective action they face compared to firms operating in less concentrated industries  A growing number of studies refocus attention on factors that increase or weaken the structural power of business relative to governments. The threat of disinvestment from a political jurisdiction is identified as a particularly important source of power for business relative to governments Increased opportunities for firms to invest across national borders, one characteristic of economic globalisation, is thus argued to increase the structural power of business.The relationship between changes in the organisation of production and the power of business extends to the study of trade politics. Research shows that the presence of multinational corporations (MNCs) is associated with open trade because of their changed preferences as a result of internationalisation Producers that are larger, more concentrated, and that operate in globalised industries, should thus be more likely to have their policy preferences reflected in policy decisions.Against this, studies emphasise how the continued agency of policy-makers conditions the structural power of business  Classic models of political economy balance general welfare against the lobbying contributions of organised industry, implying policy outcomes are not a simple function of the interests of business Politicians and policy-makers are also argued to matter because they are able to interpret and mediate demands from business, rather than simply reflect these demands in policy This paper advances this line of thought. We suggest that the globalisation of production can undermine rather than strengthen the structural power of business, thus increasing the agency of policy-makers. In particular, we propose that characterisations of the relationship between economic globalisation and business power underemphasise the political implications of GSCs, which are an increasingly important governance mechanism for global production The growing role of GSCs is linked with a number of outcomes of interest in political economy, such as the relationship of GSCs to multilateral economic institutions Scholars have also begun to analyse the rising importance of GSCs in the markets for renewable technologiesThe implications of the rise in GSCs for the structural power of business, on the other hand, remain understudied, despite the fact that data show international trade is increasingly governed by GSCs Global supply chains and business power in trade politicsIn this paper we propose that GSCs can have important implications for trade policy by weakening the power of business relative to governments. Specifically, we propose that GSCs can weaken the structural power of business in trade policy-making through two mechanisms: (1) the fragmentation of industry and (2) the fragmentation of information supplied by business to policy-makers.The first mechanism relates to how the increasing fragmentation of industry interests creates challenges to collective action among firms. Scholars already identify that differences between firms within industries can lead trade policies to have different effects on them. A key source of division within industries identified as having particular relevance for trade policy outcomes is between vertically integrated multinational firms, that are supportive of open trade, and domestic producers that are import-competing This constellation of firm interests is often associated with non-protectionist policy outcomes. MNCs hold greater economic power and face lower barriers to collective action than smaller domestic producers.We propose that GSCs can introduce a second source of fragmentation in the characteristics of firms operating within industries because they enable firms to specialise in specific stages of the supply chainNext to multinational firms and domestic producers, various types of vertically specialised firms engage in global trade as a result of the rise of GSCs. Firms are likely to support or oppose trade policy depending on their position in GSCs  The rise of GSCs thus can increase both the heterogeneity of firm characteristics, and the number of firms engaged in trade within an industry, compared to a scenario in which MNCs dominate trade. This shift in industry composition can create barriers to collective action, thus weakening the influence of the industry as a whole.Aside from the implications for collective action in trade policy, there is a second mechanism through which global supply chains can be expected to weaken the structural power of industry: by increasing the ambiguity in the information provided to policy-makers by business, thus making it unclear what the optimal policy outcome is. Control over private information of relevance to policy-makers is identified as an important source of business power  Policy-makers require technical information in order to implement successful policies. They are also often time and resource constrained, forcing them to rely on industry as a source of policy-relevant information.When industry is unified, the information it provides to policy-makers on the distributive effects of a policy choice will tend to be unambiguous, which increases the chances that its preferred policy is adopted. When business interests are divided, on the other hand, the information policy-makers receive will be ambiguous. In the case of trade policy, for example, industry coalitions that support trade protection are likely to emphasise the scale of economic harm being incurred, while those that oppose protection will instead focus on both the costs of imposing protection on the industry itself, and the potential effects of retaliation on other industries. Major divisions within the industry thus heighten the competition between business factions in making policy-makers believe what is the general economic interest Evidence shows that the structure of GSCs varies, depending on the ability of firms to codify information used in the manufacture of final products, transaction costs, and other factors. GSCs can be categorised according to the extent of control exercised by a lead firm. One type of GSCs is managed by a vertically integrated MNC, which internalises most productive functions through the use of subsidiaries and affiliates  Other forms of GSC governance, such as examined here, consist of firms that specialise in particular stages of production. These vertically specialised firms sell intermediate products to downstream producers that import inputs and to downstream users.We thus propose that this form of GSC has political implications: the increase in the heterogeneity and number of firms raises the costs of engaging in collective action, and increases the complexity and ambiguity of information provided to policy-makers. We further argue that taking into account the effect of GSCs on business power helps explain the empirical puzzle that motivates this paper. Conventional explanations of the sources of protection suggest that unified and concentrated industries are more likely to achieve their preferred policy outcomes, not least because policy-makers are proposed to have an incentive support policies that are linked to the interests of the economically powerful We suggest that intra-industry divisions – resulting from the emergence of GSCs – have an important effect on the balance of negotiating power between business and policy-makers in trade politics. In particular, GSCs in solar photovoltaics weakened the negotiating power of industry relative to European policy-makers, thus accentuating the importance of executive politics in the policy-makingThis enables policy-makers to engage in ‘interest shopping’ by selecting those economic interests that are aligned most closely with their pre-existing preference.Data and methodsIn the empirical section, we examine the trade policy decision of the EC, and introduce comparative data from Germany. We introduce evidence to support the contention that divided interests among solar firms, coupled with independent policy-maker support for trade remedies, led to the Commission to support tariffs. In contrast, policy-makers in Germany supported open trade in the EU–China solar case.The two cases are important in their own right: Europe, and Germany within it, is a crucial market for solar PV, which is the largest renewable energy source in Europe in terms of installed capacity. A comparison of the EC and German government’s responses are also useful because the makeup of the solar photovoltaic industry is similar across both jurisdictions, yet evidence shows they reached different policy conclusions on the merits of pursuing trade sanctions against China. The reason for this difference, we propose, lies in the political choices made by policy-makers as they received conflicting information from industry regarding the effect of adopting retaliatory trade measures.Our evidence suggests that while the solar PV industry was divided in Germany, German policy-makers had no interest to bring a major trade case against China; the high level of trade with China meant German policy-makers did not want to risk fallout from seeking trade remedies against solar manufacturers based in China. At the EU level, the German position ultimately contributed to the settlement between the EU and China. While Germany does not adopt its own trade policy, we treat it as a distinct case. The German government formulated a position on European trade policy, which we consider the dependent variable. The variation in policy-maker preference between the Germany and the EU cases offers a most similar comparison.We are interested in the policy preferences of both business and European policy-makers. Data to identify firm and policy-maker preferences are drawn from statements issued by industry associations and individual firms, press releases, industry journal publications, and secondary sources. The authors also conducted 16 semi-structured interviews with senior executives, senior policy-makers, and experts between 2014 and 2015 We use two methods to examine the explanatory power of our argument: comparative analysis and process-tracing We begin by discussing business interests, before moving on to consider policy-maker interests. In the next section, we describe the preferences of industry groups and the EU trade commissioner. We then contrast the position of the EU with that of the German government, which opposed the use of trade remedies.Case 1: the European Commission and support for tariffsSolar photovoltaics makes up the second-largest share of non-hydro renewable electricity capacity in Europe. The cumulative share of solar photovoltaics capacity in the 28 European countries was 8.3 per cent in 2013  This has increased the importance of the solar photovoltaic industry to the European economy. The entry of Chinese manufacturers into the solar panel industry, however, transformed the distribution of production in the solar market7). Europe – predominantly Germany – Japan, and the US provided 90 per cent of global module production in 2005. By 2012, Chinese manufacturers captured 60 per cent of the global module market A variety of trade policy instruments are available to governments in choosing to sanction trading partners, including anti-dumping duties, quantitative restrictions, and tariffs 15). In the case discussed here, the EC chose to pursue both anti-dumping and anti-subsidy investigations against a number of Chinese module manufacturers. It first imposed provisional import duties, before negotiating a settlement that included a price floor, and voluntary export restraints from China. On 4 June 2013, the EC announced provisional import duties of 11.8 per cent, raised to 47.6 per cent for the majority of firms if parties did not achieve an agreement by 6 August (European Commission  Following the announcement of provisional measures, the EC and the Chinese Ministry on Commerce, together with the Chinese Chamber of Commerce, negotiated a ‘price undertaking’, in which 90 Chinese exporters, representing approximately 60 per cent of the EU market in 2012, committed to ensuring that prices did not fall before a predetermined level. The Chinese companies that agreed to the negotiated settlement could also export up to seven gigawatts at the predetermined minimum price or above before having duties imposed Industry demands: divided industry and fragmented informationWe propose that global supply chains affect industry influence through two channels: increased industry divisions, and increased fragmentation and thus ambiguity of information provided to policy-makers. With regard to the first, data show that the European solar industry was deeply divided over how to respond to Chinese solar imports. It also shows that these divisions reflected the ways in which firms participated in global supply chains that incorporate China. Intra-industry disagreement paralysed the major industry body, the European Photovoltaic Industry Association (EPIA), which adopted a neutral position in the trade dispute.As the voice of the global solar photovoltaic industry in Europe, EPIA has maintained a neutral position in this case (and in other pending trade cases affecting the sector). This decision to impose provisional duties intervenes in a context of shifting market dynamics and production overcapacity, which led to an intense global competition. In contrast, a series of ad hoc business alliances and trade coalitions emerged to lobby for different business interests within the solar PV industry. Three coalitions were particularly important, and represented how individual firms were incorporated into global supply chains  The EC’s investigation included consultations with each of these groups, as recorded in the Commission’s report on the investigation "
"Swiss solar manufacturer Meyer Burger Technology AG said it plans to open a U.S. factory to put the company in closer proximity to customers in one of the world's biggest markets and to help cut the country's reliance on equipment makers in Asia."
"Meyer Burger said Sept. 28 that it is in discussions with officials in several states to open a 400-MW solar module plant by the end of 2022. The move is part of a strategy to localize manufacturing in order to reduce transportation emissions and avoid supply-chain disruptions, the company said."
"""We are encouraged by bipartisan support for domestic manufacturing of solar infrastructure to secure true energy independence and control of our future,"" Ardes Johnson, president of Meyer Burger Americas, said in a statement. ""It is critical for the U.S. to develop its domestic supply chain and de-risk itself from heavy dependence on Asia."""
"Meyer Burger made the announcement as America's solar industry is once again locked in a battle over trade policy. Manufacturers are pushing Washington to expand import tariffs to boost domestic production, while project developers warn that tightening trade restrictions would slow the market by raising costs and limiting equipment supplies."
"The fight is seen as a test of whether the Biden administration can simultaneously grow U.S. green energy manufacturing while accelerating solar deployments to limit climate change."
"""We are seeing the start of a renaissance in solar manufacturing, with numerous companies investing in new factories and equipment here in the United States. However, these new companies and new investments should not have to compete with dumped and subsidized product,"" Timothy Brightbill, a partner at Wiley Rein LLP, said in an email."
"""The United States needs a comprehensive strategy to increase domestic production throughout the solar supply chain,"" said Brightbill, who represents a group of unnamed companies that have asked the U.S. Commerce Department to extend tariffs on Chinese solar products to cells and panels from Thailand, Vietnam and Malaysia. ""This should include domestic production incentives as well as trade remedies."""
"Project developers said just the threat of additional tariffs, which could be imposed as soon as this week if the Commerce Department opens an investigation, is already creating equipment shortages."
"""We welcome all new domestic production and are working to pass supportive policies to help these and other companies thrive,"" said Justin Baca, vice president of markets and research at the Solar Energy Industries Association, which opposes tariffs. ""That said, this and other recent announcements only represent a small fraction of domestic demand, and we have already accounted for them in our analysis of module shortages over the next couple years."""
"U.S. President Joe Biden is trying to boost domestic green-energy manufacturing while accelerating the development of solar projects like the Solar Star plant in California.Source: SunPower Corp."
"Adding to the concerns of project developers, manufacturers asked the U.S. International Trade Commission to recommend that U.S. President Joe Biden extend another set of tariffs imposed in 2018 on most imported solar cells and panels. U.S. Customs and Border Protection has also been detaining solar panels linked to alleged labor abuses in China."
"China denies allegations of forced labor. The Chinese Embassy in Washington did not immediately respond to a message seeking comment Sept. 29."
"Those trade pressures are leading manufacturers to consider adjusting their strategies toward America's solar market."
"Marco Levi, CEO of Ferroglobe PLC, a UK producer of the raw material silicon metal, one key ingredient in solar panels, told analysts in August that there are ""strong indications"" that demand from the U.S. solar market is rising following Washington's crackdown on alleged human rights abuses by a major Chinese supplier."
"""[One] key request of the main customers is secure volume for the foreseeable future ... in particular in the U.S.,"" Levi said. Ferroglobe said Sept. 29 that one of its subsidiaries, Globe Metallurgical Inc., is considering restarting its silicon metal plant in Alabama ""in light of favorable market conditions in North America heading into 2022."""
"After some of its equipment was detained by CBP, China's JinkoSolar Holding Co. Ltd. said it is building a supply chain outside of its home market in order to maintain access to the U.S., including investing $500 million in a silicon ingot and wafer factory in Vietnam."
"""This facility enables the use of raw material inputs from a variety of countries, thus increasing the amount of local content used in our modules, and especially in the modules produced in the Jacksonville, Florida facility,"" Nigel Cockroft, general manager of JinkoSolar (U.S.) Inc., said in a Sept. 27 news release."
"However, a law Beijing recently passed prohibiting compliance with foreign sanctions could complicate efforts by Chinese manufacturers to shift their supply chains in response to U.S. pressure."
"""Recent announcements about people expanding and moving further upstream capacity to Southeast Asia and looking for upstream supply from Europe, that would be permitted only on the margins,"" said Nathan Picarsic, a co-founder of Horizon Advisory, a geopolitical consultancy. ""Our sense is that the Chinese government does not want to relinquish the leverage they have upstream."""
"Market observers also said U.S. factories are too small to compete with overseas suppliers."
"""We can't just make a 400-MW facility when China's making facilities of 10 GW, 15 GW,"" said Thomas Prusa, an economics professor at Rutgers University who specializes in international trade. ""We're making these facilities that are much more on a 2013 scale. And that's a real problem."""
"Meyer Burger said the factory it is planning to open in the U.S. could be expanded to ""multiple gigawatts"" of capacity after it is up and running."
"The U.S. was the birthplace of solar manufacturing, said Meyer Burger CEO Gunter Erfurt. ""Now it is time to return to the industry's roots and help end dependency on offshore imports,"" Erfurt said."
"China on Monday lambasted a World Trade Organization dispute ruling that rejected its complaint against a U.S. safeguard measure on Chinese imports of solar panel components, arguing the ruling has ""systematically harmful implications."""
"The U.S., however, dismissed those arguments, telling China during Monday's Dispute Settlement Body meeting it should ""focus on what matters"" -- namely, that Beijing's ""massive non-market excess capacity"" decimated the U.S. industry and the WTO continues to largely fail in constraining the economic powerhouse."
"The U.S. in 2018 imposed solar safeguard measures on Chinese imports of certain crystalline silicon photovoltaic cells after the U.S. International Trade Commission determined such imports could harm the U.S. industry. China that same year challenged those measures at the WTO."
"The dispute panel issued its ruling earlier this month, saying the U.S. measures did not violate WTO rules. China last week appealed the panel report, which means the case will remain pending with a nonfunctioning Appellate Body. According to China, the report marks the first time the WTO has found a challenged safeguard measure not to violate the organization's rules."
"""However, the panel report of DS562 has severely deviated from all these jurisprudences and substantially lowered the threshold of imposing safeguard measures,"" China argued, according to a copy of its remarks. ""The erroneous and dangerous signal sent by this panel report to WTO members will lead to the abuse of safeguard measures and thus seriously undermine the rules-based multilateral trading system."""
"Specifically, China alleged that the panel report contained ""serious legal errors"": A ""gross misreading"" of the requirements to impose a safeguard and a ""major misunderstanding"" of the panel's role in scrutinizing trade remedies."
"On the first, China argued the panel ""lowered the legal standards for safeguard measures"" by dismissing Beijing's argument that the U.S. did not have ""compelling"" evidence of a causal link between the imports and harm to the domestic industry."
"On the second, the panel irresponsibly ""deferred"" to the ITC report, China insisted, and thus failed to conduct an objective assessment -- a part of its mandate under the Dispute Settlement Understanding. Beijing also took issue with what it said was the panel's decision to allow the U.S. to update its ITC report through ""impermissible post-hoc justifications."""
"""It is of systemic importance that the principle of security and predictability shall be upheld through ensuring the quality of panel reports,"" China concluded. ""By sharply deviating from the WTO disciplines and the established jurisprudence, the Panel has not only upset this fundamental objective, but also undermined the trust of all Members in the dispute settlement mechanism and created irreversible damage to the multilateral trading system."""
"The U.S. welcomed its dispute win but argued that victory came at a ""very high cost."""
"""A thriving U.S. industry was essentially crushed by China's massive non-market excess capacity -- and this formed the factual basis for the U.S. safeguard action,"" the U.S. said during the DSB meeting, according to a copy of its remarks. ""So while we welcome the panel report findings, this dispute demonstrates, perversely, that WTO rules do not effectively constrain China's damaging non-market behavior."""
"The U.S. also accused China of attempting ""to use the WTO dispute settlement system as a vehicle to create new rules that would limit a Member's ability to defend itself from China's non-market practices."""
"The panel wasn't wrong, the U.S. argued -- it was China that ""committed fundamental errors"" in this dispute. Beijing's interpretation is ""inconsistent"" with the text of the agreements, the U.S. added."
"In addition to faulting Beijing for its nonmarket practices, which it said led to global excess solar cell supply, the U.S. charged that China is ""undercut[ing] U.S. antidumping and countervailing measures"" by moving its operations to other countries."
"In response, China insisted it had not appealed the ruling to delay the adoption of the report but to ensure past jurisprudence was respected, according to a Geneva-based trade official familiar with the meeting. This response was not in the copy of China's remarks."
"But even as pending appeals pile up, the Biden administration did not say anything new this month on the Appellate Body. The U.S., once again, maintained that its systemic concerns have not been addressed and said it would discuss these issues ""at the appropriate time."""
"China did raise on additional issue during the DSB meeting, highlighting the WTO Secretariat's role in helping members pick panelists in dispute settlement proceedings."
"""We appreciate the support provided by the Secretariat in providing the slate of candidates for the panel. At the same time, given our recent experience, we would like to take this opportunity to emphasize the importance of due process, due diligence and due respect obligations the Members expect the Secretariat to shoulder when carrying out its assistance in the panel stage, especially in the composition of the panel,"" China said."
"Whether its ""recent experience"" was related to the solar safeguard case or something else was not clear from China's remarks. ""We believe that the more professional and neutral the Secretariat's service is, the more confident Members will have in the dispute settlement system and the multilateral trading system as a whole,"" China added."
"Other members did not respond to this statement from Beijing, according to the Geneva official."
"The investigation was requested by Auxin Solar Inc., a California manufacturer that accused Chinese producers of crystalline silicon solar cells and modules of assembling products in Malaysia, Thailand, Vietnam and Cambodia from parts and components made in China in order to avoid paying antidumping and countervailing duties that the Obama administration first imposed in 2012. ""Information provided by Auxin indicates that multiple companies in Cambodia, Malaysia, Thailand and Vietnam, rather than a single company, have the facilities necessary to conduct the processing in question and that subsidiaries of Chinese companies that are located in these countries source numerous solar cell and panel inputs from China,"" the Commerce Department said in a case memorandum released March 28. Representatives for the U.S. solar industry, which had largely opposed Auxin's petition, said the government's investigation will create additional challenges for a market that is already struggling with inflation and trade disruptions. Because the proposed tariffs may be applied retroactively, just initiating an investigation could jeopardize 14 GW of planned deployments, the Solar Energy Industries Association trade group, or SEIA, said in a March 7 letter to Commerce Secretary Gina Raimondo.The investigation was requested by Auxin Solar Inc., a California manufacturer that accused Chinese producers of crystalline silicon solar cells and modules of assembling products in Malaysia, Thailand, Vietnam and Cambodia from parts and components made in China in order to avoid paying antidumping and countervailing duties that the Obama administration first imposed in 2012."
"The Commerce Department said Auxin provided the government with ""reasonably available information"" to justify circumvention inquiries on a countrywide basis."
"""Information provided by Auxin indicates that multiple companies in Cambodia, Malaysia, Thailand and Vietnam, rather than a single company, have the facilities necessary to conduct the processing in question and that subsidiaries of Chinese companies that are located in these countries source numerous solar cell and panel inputs from China,"" the Commerce Department said in a case memorandum released March 28."
"Liu Pengyu, a spokesperson for the Chinese Embassy in Washington, said in a statement that Beijing hopes the U.S. ""will take concrete actions to jointly address climate change, promote global free trade, maintain the rules-based multilateral trading system, facilitate free trade in new energy products, and contribute to the global development of a low greenhouse gas emission economy and the promotion of the common well-being of all mankind."""
"Representatives for the U.S. solar industry, which had largely opposed Auxin's petition, said the government's investigation will create additional challenges for a market that is already struggling with inflation and trade disruptions. Because the proposed tariffs may be applied retroactively, just initiating an investigation could jeopardize 14 GW of planned deployments, the Solar Energy Industries Association trade group, or SEIA, said in a March 7 letter to Commerce Secretary Gina Raimondo."
"The four countries in Southeast Asia that are targeted for tariffs accounted for more than 85% of U.S. solar panel imports during the fourth quarter of 2021."
"""Today's decision responds to the self-interests of one company and will lead to more market volatility and job losses,"" SEIA President and CEO Abigail Ross Hopper said in a statement, adding that the tariffs under consideration range from up to 50% to 250%."
"""President Biden has been clear that the best way to grow domestic manufacturing is to create a policy environment that encourages private investment,"" Hopper said. ""This decision directly contradicts that goal — more tariffs are not the answer."""
"The Edison Electric Institute, or EEI, a trade group for U.S. investor-owned utilities, also criticized the Commerce Department's decision."
"""The initiation of these inquiries will have a harmful and disruptive impact on the solar supply chain, resulting in increased costs, project delays and job losses,"" EEI President Tom Kuhn said in a statement. ""Ultimately, this will impede the nation's clean energy transition and increase costs for electricity customers."""
"The Commerce Department announced its decision as the solar industry continues to push Congress for tax incentives to support green energy manufacturing."
"""In order to reach the Biden Administration's clean energy goals, we must put an end to harmful trade barriers,"" George Hershman, CEO of SOLV Energy LLC and chair of SEIA's board of directors, said in a statement."
"""Instead, we need Congress to pass clean energy tax credits that will grow domestic manufacturing and deployment, create more jobs and protect our energy security."""
"Auxin CEO Mamun Rashid said the Commerce Department investigation will focus on business practices that Chinese companies have used to continue selling equipment in the U.S. at below-market value."
"""For years, Chinese solar producers have refused to fairly price their products in the U.S. and have gone to significant lengths to continue undercutting American manufacturers and workers by establishing circumventing operations in countries not covered by those duties,"" Rashid said in a statement. ""Fair trade and enforcement of our trade laws are essential to rebuilding the American solar supply chain and making Solar in America again."""
"We've got breaking news this morning from the retail industry, we are awaiting earnings from Lowe's, they're due out any moment, it should give us another read on retail, the consumer, signs of the state of the housing market as well, following Home Depot's numbers, yesterday. We will have the numbers, full analysis, as soon as they hit the tape. We'll tell you if it's impacting markets as well."
"Then, in about 30 minute's time, we will get the numbers from retail giant, Target, a look at the strength of the American consumer, what it could mean to possible rate cuts in the near future."
"President Trump is looking to bolster the economy, the president pushing off fears of a recession, but also saying that he's looking at a payroll tax cut and changes to capital gain's taxes as well, what it could mean for your wallet, coming up."
"We are focused on the Federal Reserve, we've got the minutes from the last Federal Reserve meeting out later today, and the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco president, Mary Daly is saying a recession is not eminent. This as investors look for any hints of a rate cut, as the Fed prepares to meet in Jackson Hall. We'll bring you those minutes when we get them."
"Futures this morning, pointing to a gain at the start of trading, we've got a rally underway, Dow Futures up 150 points, right now, two-thirds of 1 percent, S&P Futures up 19, and the NASDAQ Futures higher by 62. MORNINGS WITH MARIA begins right now."
"And we've got a big show this morning, joining the conversation this morning, PWC partner, Mitch Roschelle is here, and the Wall Street Journal's wealth management reporter, host of the Secrets of Wealthy Women podcast, Veronica Dagher, great to see you guys, thank you so much for being here."
"MITCH ROSCHELLE, PARTNER, PWC: Good morning."
"BARTIROMO: We are -- we are waiting -- here we go, we got Lowe's numbers coming out right here, it's beat on revenue. Let's get right to Ashley Webster, he's got the numbers. Ashley."
"ASHLEY WEBSTER, FOX BUSINESS NETWORK, BUSINESS NEWS JOURNALIST: Yes, good morning, Maria. Let's get right to it. On the earnings per share, coming in at $2.15, that beats the estimate of $2.01. On the revenue side, ekes out a slight beat at $20.99 billion, the estimate was for $20.94 billion."
"Digging in, second quarter same-store sales up, 2.3 percent. Of course, it's always important to look at the outlet, full year. Total sales coming in at two percent, full year, comp sales at three percent, that's exactly the same forecast that Lowe's gave in the first quarter. They say they are actively hiring full and part-time associates at stores distribution centers. Of course, we want to hear what they say about tariffs."
"Yesterday, Home Depot said that they did lower their outlook on tariff worries, Lowe's just saying here, despite lumber deflation and difficult weather, they are happy to deliver these comparable sales gains in all 15 geographic regions of the United States, that's according to Lowe's."
"So, all in all, a beat on the top and bottom line, basically in line with what was expected. U.S. comp sales were up 3.2 percent as well, in the second quarter. Guys, back to you."
"BARTIROMO: All right, Ashley, thanks very much. That stock is --"
"WEBSTER: Yes."
"BARTIROMO: -- on the move this morning, Ashley, you've got the gain of three and a quarter percent right now. Joining us right now for a reaction to the Lowe's earnings is Telsey Advisory Group senior managing director and assistant director of research, Joseph Feldman, and it's good to have you on the program, Joseph, thanks very much for being here, your quick reaction to Lowe's quarter?"
"JOSEPH FELDMAN, SENIOR MANAGING DIRECTOR, TELSEY ADVISORY (via telephone): Yes, very solid results, actually, a little better-than-expected, so we are really quite pleased."
"I think the Lowe's had to put up with the numbers after the first quarter miss that they had and the guide down from last quarter so -- to do what they did today, was exactly what they needed to, to get people confident in the stock again."
"BARTIROMO: The comp store sales are better-than-expected, Mitch, 2.3 percent, better than the estimate of 1.9 percent, and the numbers on the earnings and revenue beating estimates."
"ROSCHELLE: And their guidance was more robust than you had Home Depot yesterday that was a little timid with their guidance for the rest of the year, so I'm curious, Joseph, if there's a difference in their business that one has a better guidance or one is just more optimistic than the other, versus Home Depot yesterday?"
"FELDMAN: Yes, you know, I think Home Depot took an optimistic approach to the year, and I think they realized how things started to slow down a little bit more this year, and with tariff pressure and lumber price deflation that they had to adjust their number. Lowe's took a little more conservative approach especially after that first quarter, when they did -- reset the bar lower."
"So, today's results, you know, it's actually quite similar when you look at the same-store sales amounts that they're forecasting, so pretty good results from the home improvement space, in general."
"VERONICA DAGHER, WEALTH MANAGEMENT REPORTER, WALL STREET JOURNAL: Joseph, are you seeing -- I mean, does this basically show that the consumer is still very strong?"
"FELDMAN: You know, we think the consumer is pretty robust, very strong, might be a stretch, I feel like, you know, we are seeing knee-based retail do well, you know, we saw that from Wal-Mart last week, Home Depot, Lowe's, we've even seen some of the other discount-oriented retailers do well, groceries done well."
"But the more digressionary areas of retail have not done as well lately. So, it's something to watch as we head into the last half of the year."
"BARTIROMO: So, bottom line, Joseph, are you expecting a recession on the horizon any time soon? This is obviously the worry of the markets, we got interest rates continuing at record low levels."
"FELDMAN: We're not so concerned in the near term, like the next six months or so, I think you get through the holiday season, OK. I think our concern is as you get into next year and the lingering effect of tariffs if they do stay in place and what that impact has on the consumer and how that will shape spending. So, we're a little more worried about 2020 than we are about 2019."
"BARTIROMO: All right. We will see about that. Joseph, it's good to have you this morning, thanks so much."
"FELDMAN: Thanks."
"BARTIROMO: Stock is up five percent right now on Lowe's. We are looking at money moving into the stock, because there's been such upset over the potential of a recession, Mitch, and look, what you just heard, Joseph said, this is basically what most people say. We don't know. We're speculating. It could be 2020, it could be 2021."
"ROSCHELLE: As everybody tries to talk themselves into a recession --"
"BARTIROMO: Exactly."
"ROSCHELLE: And you get data points that suggests quite the opposite. The market reacts positively because maybe there's not a recession looming."
"BARTIROMO: So, we got this bounce to five percent, right now, Veronica."
"DAGHER: Right. And so, as an investor, this just goes to show you shouldn't time the market, because if you're listening to the people who are saying recession, recession, and then you got a data point like this, and we could have a -- very well have an update in the market. You know, you miss out."
"BARTIROMO: Maybe this volatility we saw last week with the 800-point selloffs here and there, maybe also has to do with the fact that it's light volume and it's the end of the summer."
"DAGHER: Summer."
"BARTIROMO: Right? I mean, there you go. Markets this morning are looking to bounce back, we've got a pretty good rally underway after a broad selloff yesterday, snapping three days of gains yesterday, but look where we are today. Dow Futures up 152 points, S&P Futures up 20 points, NASDAQ Futures up 61."
"We are watching, of course, what comes out of the White House, the president signaled future boost to the economy yesterday, in the form of tax cuts. The president spoke at the White House, watch."
"(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)"
"DONALD TRUMP, PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES: We are talking about indexing and we are always looking at the capital gains tax, payroll tax, we're looking at -- I would love to do something on capital gains, we're talking about that, it's a big deal, goes through Congress."
"Payroll tax is something that we think about and a lot of people would like to see that, and that very much affects the workers of our country."
"(END VIDEO CLIP)"
"BARTIROMO: We should point out that this is the top story in the Journal that the president is weighing all of these options to spur the economy and it largely, I think, has to do with the overseas weakness that we are seeing, right?"
"You've got Europe unable to generate any growth, you've got Asia, weakening as well, how do you see it?"
"DAGHER: Right, so I think there's that weakening overseas, people are coming to the U.S. for those returns. You know, I don't know what the likelihood of actually this happening too, I mean, there's a lot of talk. But, I think, in the meantime, I think we need to think about, like, if there are further incentives, right? Further tax cuts, how is that going to play even after December 15th?"
"So, for example, if we don't have a resolution on the trade war, would those tax cuts actually move the needle anyway?"
"BARTIROMO: Good point."
"ROSCHELLE: I think it's stimulus to try to shape people into realizing that there's, you know, light at the end of the tunnel, if you are of the view that were slowing down. The nugget from overnight was Germany selling their 30-year bond for the first time, with the zero yield."
"So, this is a new issuance that German government is selling a bond with a zero yield, right? So, their entire treasury curve is below zero. These problems overseas do have the potential to leech into the United States."
"So, I think the administration is just trying to get ahead of that and stimulate the consumer as much as possible, and with the capital gains cut, to try to stimulate investment, to try to get us robust enough so that we can shake through this."
"BARTIROMO: I think the administration was also talking recently about 100-year bonds, 50-year bonds, right? This is --"
"ROSCHELLE: The president is a real-estate guy, and if you get record low interest rates, you refinance forever."
"BARTIROMO: Yes."
"ROSCHELLE: Like, that's simple math right there."
"BARTIROMO: Well, I mean, look, it's largely China that has people nervous and uncertain, and the commander-in-chief also weighed in on that trade battle with China yesterday, watch this."
"(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)"
"TRUMP: Somebody had to take China on, you know, I read and I see so much, and I read so much, and I see these economists say, oh, give up, give up on China, give up. China has been ripping this country off for 25 years, for longer than that."
"And it's about time whether it's good for our country or bad for our country, short-term, long-term, it's imperative that somebody does this because our country cannot continue to pay China $500 billion a year, because stupid people are running it."
"(END VIDEO CLIP)"
"BARTIROMO: And that, of course, is the trade deficit with China, $500 billion. Veronica, you have to admit, this president has completely changed the conversation around China."
"DAGHER: Right, no one else has really taken this on before, and it's a really difficult issue. There isn't a quick resolution, so I think people in the market who are expecting a quick resolution to this, that this was going to be done in 30 days or 60 days, it's not."
"This is an ongoing theme. Hopefully, we will see some progress by December 15th, but even if we don't, the fact that he took this on, is really impressive."
"BARTIROMO: Well, as far as China is concerned, Mitch, they keep reneging on all the big-ticket items, come on, they want to steal intellectual property, force the transfer of technology, haven't let up on the Fentanyl coming into this country and then the manipulation of its currency."
"ROSCHELLE: And they were supposed to buy soybeans as a sign of good faith and they didn't do that."
"BARTIROMO: Another broken promise."
"ROSCHELLE: Right. And by the way, back to promises, this is something that the president made a promise on the campaign trail and he's fighting hard for it, it's having an impact on our markets, it's having impacts on global economies, but no other administration has really taken this cause on."
"And I think he's using it as a reelection bid, saying, we may have a deal, we may not have a deal, but if you want to resolve this issue with China, vote for me because I will do it."
"BARTIROMO: Could be, all right. We will take a break. We've got Steve Moore coming in. We've got to get his take on all of this as well."
"Meanwhile, rallies underway this morning, Futures indicating 151-point move on the upside, at the opening of trading this morning, after a volatile day yesterday, NASDAQ is up 61. Plus, solar blunder, Wal-Mart is suing Tesla, claiming that its solar panels caught fire at the big-chain stores, all that, after this."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back, Australia is joining forces with the U.S. to protect ships from attacks in the Strait of Hormuz, Cheryl Casone on headlines this morning, Cheryl."
"CHERYL CASONE, FOX BUSINESS NETWORK ANCHOR: That's right, Maria. Australia becoming the third country now to join the American-led effort aimed to keeping Iran from attacking oil tankers and cargo ships in that critical passage."
"Now, Iran is being blamed for attacks on tankers, that had happened in both May and June, more than a third of the world's oil, supply passes through the Strait of Hormuz."
"Well, President Trump slammed Democrats for standing by lawmakers he calls a disaster for Israel."
"(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)"
"TRUMP: I can't belief we are even having this conversation, where has the Democratic Party gone? Where have they gone? Where they are defending these two people over the state of Israel, and I think any Jewish people that vote for a Democrat, I think it chose either a total lack of knowledge or great disloyalty."
"(END VIDEO CLIP)"
"CASONE: Well, the president called out Congresswomen Ilhan Omar and Rashida Tlaib, for questioning U.S. financial aid to Israel. Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu, remember barred the two members of the squad from entering the Jewish state."
"And now, let's talk a little retail, Wal-Mart is suing Tesla, over roof fires that happened at several Wal-Mart stores last year. Wal-Mart is alleging that these fires were caused by Tesla's solar panels. The complainant accuses Tesla of negligence."
"Remember, last week, Tesla offered to rent consumer solar panels for just $50.00 a month. That's a lot cheaper than they were. Taking a look at shares of Tesla, Maria, lower by about half a percent, in the premarket."
"And then, there was this, let's talk about millionaires, the number of 401(k) millionaires keeps growing, that's according to Fidelity. And investors with at least a million dollars and their 401(k) accounts, reached a record high of 196,000 at the end of the second quarter."
"The ranks of IRA millionaires also setting a new high, the average 401(k) balance, also increased, get this, $106,000 up 2 percent, I love when I can say, it is safe to look at your 401(k) this morning."
"BARTIROMO: I love that. And first thing I did when I started working, get the 401(k)."
"CASONE: Oh, you bet."
"BARTIROMO: And I will tell all -- everybody, my nephews, my nieces -- get their job, that is the number one -- so, I think I'm almost at a million, by the way, after 25 years."
"CASONE: Oh, you go girl."
"BARTIROMO: Cheryl, thank you so much. We're going to take a short break, when we come back, the streaming wars, Apple mauling a monthly price for its upcoming T.V. service with billions of dollars set aside for original content, how it stacks up, coming up."
"And then taking the red pill all over again, The Matrix is officially back with the classic cast and original writers, what to expect, straight ahead. Stay with us."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back, the streaming war is heating up, Apple's new streaming service, Apple T.V. Plus, reportedly set to cost $10.00 a month and it will launch in November. The company setting aside $6 billion for original content."
"Joining us right now is CFRA Research media and entertainment analyst, Tuna Amobi, also joining the conversation this morning, former Wall Street Journal editorial board member and Trumponomics co-author, Stephen Moore, great to see you, Steve."
"Thank you so much for being here. We've got a lot --"
"STEPHEN MOORE, CO-AUTHOR, TRUMPONOMICS: Congratulations on having a million dollars on your --"
"BARTIROMO: It's really important to start and get a 401(k) when you start working."
"MOORE: I'm totally with you on that."
"BARTIROMO: And I --"
"MOORE: Invest early. Every high school and college kid I talk to, start investing early, it's the power of compound."
"BARTIROMO: And if you don't do it, then you're giving up your money."
"DAGHER: That's right."
"BARTIROMO: The company will match it. All right, let's talk streaming wars for a second, then I go to get your take on all of this tax talk -- tax cuts. Tuna, what do you think of the new Apple service?"
"TUNA AMOBI, MEDIA AND ENTERTAINMENT ANALYST, CFRA RESEARCH: I think it's phenomenal, you know, the way that the landscape is kind of shaking out, so they kind of spending $6 billion out of the gate, right, just for some perspective."
"It took Netflix 10 years after they launch their streaming service to spend that kind of money. Now, Apple is just spending that money, not just on license and original, but just on originals alone, so it kind of gives you an idea of how the landscape has changed dramatically and how the war has intensified."
"ROSCHELLE: Clearly, they have an installed base that Netflix never had, right? But, my concern is that you had $10.00 a month, a year, you've got $14.99 a month there, you start adding up all those, when does the consumer just say no more, and they stop subscribing to some of the services?"
"AMOBI: So, that's one of the things that, you know, we've called out, unquestionably, to (INAUDIBLE) array of choices for consumer. But, remember, we're coming from, you know, a time where the consumer is cutting the cord, the paid T.V. bundle is essentially disintegrating, so you can argue with that even if you put together all of these streaming offerings from various outlets."
"You're still going to end up paying significantly lower than you're paying right now, if you were subscribed to cable T.V. or satellites --"
"MOORE: You know what I find so fascinating about the story is that we have, you know, these huge companies, like Apple, Google, Facebook, and so on (INAUDIBLE) oh, their monopolies and so on. And there's so much competition now in these areas, I mean, everybody is competing with everyone and now Apple is moving into streaming."
"ROSCHELLE: Right."
"MOORE: Why is there all this talk about monopolies? There's no monopoly, there's competition industries."
"BARTIROMO: It's what we want."
"AMOBI: Yes."
"MOORE: And prices are following, right?"
"AMOBI: Absolutely, I mean, it's a golden age of television. If you have talent, it's a bonanza. I think, you know, the price competition is bound to affect how this new entrance are going to price their services, so it's no longer a monopoly or duopoly, so all of these, I think, bodes well for the consumer."
"BARTIROMO: So, who do you think is going to win out here? Because, I mean, we've got Disney, really, empowered now, after the FOX assets and all of the acquisitions that Disney has done. They've got great assets there. Will Disney win out or is Netflix going to win? What about Apple?"
"AMOBI: At this point, Maria, think the tie is growing, and my sense, if you look at the projections out there, Disney Plus expect to, kind of, approach 100 million subscribers potentially by, you know, year, four or five. I've seen numbers for Apple in that ball park as well."
"And essentially, this isn't a zero sums game, it's not really coming at the expense of anyone particular party, except that the card cutting is happening. But remember, there's multiple subscriptions among the services."
"So, as far as potential winners, those companies that have, you know, the compelling content, you know, I think they're going to stand a very good chance. And my sense, it will include Disney and Netflix, potentially, Apple as well. We'll see how that goes."
"DAGHER: How threatened should Netflix be, be about Apple's original programming?"
"AMOBI: I don't think anyone of the services, frankly, is going to be a Netflix killer. The one thing that, you know, worries me is that, you know, Netflix is starting to lose all of these premier shows, to these streaming offerings. But they've seen that coming for quite some time, and that's why you see they've kind of ramped up their investments in their own content."
"This year, they're going to spend another $15 billion, so essentially, you know, they kind of throw in money and you essentially seen what's going to stick. Netflix, I've got to say, has had a phenomenal success rate, and that's why Wall Street's going to pitch in at this point."
"But, inevitably, there's going to be, you know, hits and misses, and that's when I think it's going to, you know, the challenge that are going to set in."
"BARTIROMO: Because the costs are going up. There's -- the numbers you just mentioned, $15 billion, that's just one company on original content. Are there stocks that you like as a result of this? What are you telling clients in terms of advice to buy?"
"AMOBI: Maria, we're recommending, you know, Disney, partly for their streaming offering, CBS and Viacom just coming off from the merger, I kind of listened to their strategy for combined streaming, I think they've got a chance. What I like is the convergence of advertising and subscription-based model."
"Right now, it just seems like subscription models are dominating, so we like that as well. And, you know, names like discovery, essentially, you need skill to pull off, you know, the streaming, you've got to be all in, and those companies that have content and scale for mergers or organic, I think stand a very good chance."
"BARTIROMO: Tuna, it's great to have you this morning."
"AMOBI: Thanks a lot."
"BARTIROMO: Thanks so much. Tuna Amobi joining us there. Quick break, and then driving away from privacy, Mercedes Benz accused of tracking drivers with delinquent payments using GPS, wait until you hear this one, the details next."
"And then retail in focus, Target is set to report earnings in moments, we've got the numbers and analysis when we come right back. Stay with us."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back, good Wednesday morning, everybody, thanks so much for joining us, I'm Maria Bartiromo, and it is Wednesday, August 21st, your top stories right now, just before 6:30 a.m. on the East Coast."
"We've got more breaking news this morning from the retail sector, we are awaiting earnings from Target, they are due out any minute, stock is up two and a quarter percent, going into the numbers. We will keep a close eye on the strength of the American consumer and the impact tariffs could be having, that's the conversation of the moment."
"Earlier, we heard from Lowe's, reporting a double-beat on earnings and revenue, a rise in same-store sales as well. That stock is up seven and a quarter percent right now, been moving up consistently since the numbers came out."
"Broader market also strong. Futures indicating a gain at the start of trading with the highs of the morning right now. Dow Futures up 165 points, two-thirds of one percent. The S&P is up 20. And the Nasdaq up 64 points almost one percent."
"This after concerns of a trade and recession fears led the markets into a broad sell-off yesterday, following President Trump's remarks. The Dow was down 173 points, the S&P was down 23, and the Nasdaq was lower by 54."
"Global markets this morning have a firmer tone. Take a look at European Indices. The FT-100 up 77 points, the CAC Quarante is up 75, the DAX Index up 127 points this morning, better than one percent."
"Some uncertainty in Italy after the prime minister resigned yesterday. A lot of expectation that Mr. Salvini gets the job next. We'll see about that."
"In eighth -- let's get right to Ashley because the target numbers are out. We want to see they looks like a beat, Ashley, over to you."
"WEBSTER: Yes, indeed, Maria, you are right. On top and bottom, earnings per share coming in at a $1.82. That's $0.20 better than the estimate on revenue of $18.4 billion. The estimate was $18.34."
"Just digging in some of the headlines, second-quarter comp sales grew 3.4 percent. They say driven by a 2.4 percent growth in traffic. Second-quarter comp digital channel sales grew 34 percent. In the last quarter, they've grown 42 percent. So the digital side continues to be strong."
"Let's say same-day fulfillment services. Let's have a look at 4-year guidance. 590 to 620. That's pretty good. The street was looking for 593. So, 590 to 620, that's the EPS adjusted number, is actually means that they've raised the guidance. So, that's a very strong sign indeed for Target. Overall, a pretty good report, Maria."
"BARTIROMO: Sure is. On top of another good report from Lowe's Ashley, thank you."
"WEBSTER: Yes, sure."
"BARTIROMO: This stock is now up better than five percent. Let's talk with the retail analyst Mary Epner. She's reacting here with us. Mary, thanks very much for joining us."
"MARY EPNER, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, MARY EPNER RETAIL ANALYSIS: Thank you for having me."
"(CROSSTALK)"
"BARTIROMO: Your reaction to the numbers this morning, target as well as Lowe's."
"EPNER: Pleasantly surprised by Lowe's. I previously mentioned that I like the way management was going, but I was just concerned with you -- know, the state of the economy that it might be challenged. But that's great to see."
"I was very positive on Target. I love the way their position, their product is great. Especially in a home choice electronics, I think they have huge opportunities as I look forward to fourth-quarter, which is what I'm really concerned about."
"BARTIROMO: So, this flies totally in the face of all of this worry that we've been talking about. About a recession on the horizon, things are slowing down. Looks like the consumer is pretty strong here. Do you expect a recession? And why are you worried about the fourth quarter?"
"EPNER: So, when I say I'm worried about the fourth quarter, I'm not going to get to a recession just yet. I want to make it clear that even if the tariffs are imposed, my understanding it will be is -- it will be the middle of December."
"All of the merchandise for the year will have been in for the most part for all of these stores. So, they won't have been impacted by the tariff. It will only be a small piece of it. So, I'm not as concerned about that."
"I actually -- am really, my biggest thing is Amazon. Amazon Prime had their biggest day ever. You know, I believe it was more than Black Friday and Cyber Monday combined. So, I think that's what the big-box retailers need to be concerned about competing with. Could be lower prices increased, shipping costs. So, overall, I think it's a big win for the consumer."
"I expect it to stay -- you know, the momentum to continue. It's just that I know that stores are going to be forced to compete with Amazon because if they did that much in July, I can't imagine what they have planned for November, December."
"ROSCHELLE: Mary, good morning. Mitch Roschelle. You mentioned Amazon being a threat. But one of the things that was in Target's numbers was their digital channel grew by 34 percent, and it was 42 percent last quarter."
"So, does that suggest that they've figured out their digital strategy and they're able to compete with the Amazon's of this world? Or (INAUDIBLE) not the Amazon's of this world, or just Amazon, period?"
"EPNER: Absolutely, yes. Yes. They are competing very well with them. Again, I just want to put out there that there -- I believe there are going to be a lot of price wars for the holiday period, and Target will have to compete in that. But I think that they will be one of the winners."
"Because even if there is a recession, and I say if, I think that customers will still gravitate towards Lowe's and -- I'm sorry, not Lowe's. Target and Walmart. And they will be -- they will fare OK."
"It's just again, they're going to have to be concerned about lowering prices and improving their shipping."
"BARTIROMO: Mary, it's good to have you. Thanks so much."
"EPNER: Thank you."
"BARTIROMO: We appreciate it. Joining us right now is Lebenthal, Global Advisors president, Dominick Tavella. Dominic, it's great to see you."
"DOMINICK TAVELLA, PRESIDENT, LEBENTHAL, GLOBAL ADVISORS: Good morning."
"BARTIROMO: Thanks so much for joining us. What does this tell you about investing and the broader stock market?"
"TAVELLA: It tells me that a consumer is very healthy, very confident. We're seeing consumer confidence at an all-time high. And as long as the consumer is healthy, strong, confident, and willing to spend money, the economy is on sound putting."
"BARTIROMO: Steve."
"MOORE: Well, you know, the -- first of all, you're exactly right, the consumer is king right now, and we were talking about this up there. I mean, you go on -- I go on flights, they've got these parents with five kids are going here, there, and everywhere. The amusement parks, I mean, people are spending."
"Now, that here is my worry. And, by the way, the reason people are spending is because wages are up. And the reason wages are up is because we get the tax cut. I hope Republicans can connect those dots."
"Now, here is my worry, and I just want to -- you know, you still need businesses to expand, and that was continues to worry me is that it is just --"
"(CROSSTALK)"
"BARTIROMO: The last GDP had business CAPEX down (INAUDIBLE) of a percent."
"MOORE: Was down, and that's my big worry. And my worry is if businesses stop spending, then, you don't get the wage growth. And then, you know, you could see a follow up in this consumer spend."
"I hope I'm wrong about this. But what's your --"
"(CROSSTALK)"
"TAVELLA: And you can have -- no, I think you are correct on that, right? I think businesses have pulled back on their spending because they are worried about this trade war. So, they are holding onto they capital, their cash a little bit tighter. And they're waiting to see what happens. OK?"
"BARTIROMO: Yes."
"TAVELLA: They don't want to commit themselves to the bigger projects, the long-term projects until they know we have some type of resolution on this trade war. Consumer live in, has money in their pocket, they feeling good, they feeling good about job, growth. If they want to change jobs tomorrow, the jobs are there. So, they really --"
"MOORE: I think it's the trade war that's really pick on the back on it."
"TAVELLA: I really (INAUDIBLE) believe CAPEX is being held back."
"BARTIROMO: Because of the uncertainty."
"TAVELLA: Because of uncertainty. I think that could change very quickly."
"BARTIROMO: Yes."
"TAVELLA: But I also believe and been saying for a very long time, this trade thing is going to go on for a very long time."
"ROSCHELLE: But if that's the case, Dominick, and their concern about the trade war, and we think this could go on for listening time."
"At some point, business has got to get off the sidelines and invest. Because if they don't invest today, they don't have a future."
"TAVELLA: You're exactly right. So, look, they're holding back. Hasn't been dramatic cut back in CAPEX, but obviously, it's been -- Maria is absolutely right. It's been a drop in that. At some point, they going to have to commit."
"And if you look at domestic growth, domestic spending, it's been really positive. So, I think that'll come back into the economy. That could be three, six months after before we see some positive turn around there."
"BARTIROMO: So, Steve, what's your take on all of this tax cut talk then? I mean, if things are going so well, why is the president weighing options to spur the economy?"
"Top story in The Journal today. He's measuring -- measures -- including a possible cut in capital gains, and the continued pressing of the Federal Reserve to cut rates by four points."
"MOORE: Well, I think it's exactly what you are just saying. I mean, there's a lot of worry at the White House that maybe this trade war is starting to drain the economy a little bit, and it needs a little bit of another stimulus. And I don't have a problem with that."
"I think that the most likely scenario is that Donald Trump may actually through an executive action not go through Congress, and redefining a capital gain, index those gains for inflation. That would be a big cut for investors, and that could juice some of that exact business spending that we're talking about."
"BARTIROMO: Mitch, you're an expert on taxes, what do you think? I mean, where do we at capital gains right now? You said 24 percent. 21 percent."
"MOORE: It's yes. Because we know, we had the four percent surcharge on Obamacare, were at 20 in that raise (INAUDIBLE)."
"ROSCHELLE: And it really wasn't touch her in the cap -- touch them for job act."
"BARTIROMO: OK. So, it's 244 percent."
"ROSCHELLE: But the thing that concerns me if he tries to do it by executive action is then there's a lawsuit."
"TAVELLA: right."
"And then, the stimulus that you want doesn't happen and it becomes highly politicized because capital gains could get viewed by the electorate as being something that only ""benefits the wealthy."""
"And so, I like the payroll tax cut because I think it's more --"
"MOORE: Let me just say one quick thing on that?"
"ROSCHELL: Yes."
"MOORE: There's $120 million people like Maria Bartiromo have, 401 (k) plans, and IRAs, and he own stocks."
"ROSCHELLE: Yes."
"BARTIROMO: That's right. That's right. And Cheryl just told us, a few mentioned while there are a whole lot of millionaires."
"DAGHER: That's right."
"MOORE: Yes, although 401 (k) of tax differed, but --"
"DAGHER: Right. They're taxpayers, yes."
"BARTIROMO: That's right."
"DAGHER: Right."
"MOORE: Yes, but stock market benefits from them that been --"
"TAVELLA: 100 percent, yes."
"BARTIROMO: Dominic, what does this all mean to you in terms of allocating capital right now?"
"TAVELLA: When we have the leading economic indicators, this positive, we have never had a recession in the next six months. So, I think the next six months, we are very, very stable. We'll going to go through this volatility in terms of tweets from the president, and what the fed chairman says."
"But I think, stability wise, we are fine through the next six months. Nine, 12 months out, we start to worry a little bit. Especially, and I do believe Trump will be more active in imposing greater tariffs on China because China is not going to move off of -- they're not going to move off to stand."
"BARTIROMO: They keep breaking promises."
"TAVELLA: Yes, exactly right."
"BARTIROMO: why should we expect otherwise?"
"TAVELLA: Exactly."
"BARTIROMO: Dominick, it's great to see you this morning."
"TAVELLA: Thank you, Maria."
"BARTIROMO: Thank you so much. Dominick Tavella, there."
"Meanwhile, a government crisis this morning in Italy. Cheryl is on headlines right now. Cheryl."
"CASONE: Yes, some of homeland news here for all of us, Maria. Italian President Sergio Mattarella is scrambling to form a new government after the collapse of current one."
"This all went down yesterday there. The government spiral sort about two weeks ago when Interior Minister Matteo Salvini, who is a leader of the far-right party withdrew his support for the government, hoping to trigger some new elections."
"Now, the country's prime minister resigned yesterday, that put Salvini's plan in jeopardy. Now, politicians from rival parties openly discussing, forming a new coalition to give Italy a more centrist government."
"I want to add Italian stock market actually opened up lower, then it went higher. So, some interesting things happening over in Italy right now, Maria."
"Let's talk about Mercedes-Benz, here at homes. The -- excuse me, raising privacy concerns in the U.K. The company uses car tracking technology to repossessed vehicles if their drivers fall behind on their payments."
"Well, Mercedes reportedly said, the practice has been used in a few exceptional cases and only as last resort. Drivers do agree to be tracked when they finance a car with Mercedes-Benz. One politician though is calling for an investigation into this practice."
"And then, finally, this time to reenter The Matrix, the fourth installment. And the classic sci-fi series has officially been greenlit, Keanu Reeves and Carrie Anne-Moss are going to re-price the roles as Neo and Trinity, along with co-creator Lana Wachowski."
"Producers are reportedly looking to start work on the film maybe early next year. No details yet on the storyline. I still think Keanu Reeves is part of Bill and Ted's Excellent Adventure. But that's just me. He's also an action superstar. I always forget that part."
"BARTIROMO: I'm very troubled by this Mercedes story, Cheryl."
"CASONE: It's weird, right?"
"DAGHER: (INAUDIBLE) baby, yes."
"BARTIROMO: It's weird and it's -- again, indicating that we don't know who is tracking us, and what they're doing, and yes --"
"DAGHER: What's the point too? Like what do they need that information for? I don't get it."
"ROSCHELLE: But how about the insurance companies that can have the ability to track you to figure out if you're a dangerous driver, and then they can raise your premiums."
"BARTIROMO: That's true."
"ROSCHELLE: Right."
"BARTIROMO: Yes, and that's happening, because everything in your car -- I mean, you could -- if now, when there's an accident, they can go to the car and say, were you smoking? Were you on your phone? Were you --"
"(CROSSTALK)"
"ROSCHELLE: But if your phone is in your car, it knows how fast you're going in if you have the app, they can track you."
"BARTIROMO: Yes, exactly. Wow. All right, it's a new world."
"Coming up, strengthening the economy. And President Trump, says he is looking at a payroll tax cut and changes to capital gains tax. Steve Moore is here to talk about it. What it could mean for your wallet? Coming up."
"And then, emoji house for sale. The hot pink paint job on a California house can be yours for a pretty penny. Back in a minute."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back, headlines across America this morning. The Charlotte Observer reporting legislature requires North Carolina sheriffs to comply with ICE requests sending bill to governor. This bill would require law enforcement officials to honor detention requests from ICE officials. Sheriffs from some of North Carolina's biggest counties were elected on the promise of cutting ties with ICE and no longer listen to detention requests."
"The Des Moines Register writing this, severe storms caused thousands to lose power across Des Moines metro as three tornadoes touched down in Iowa; at least one of those tornadoes damaged buildings and knocked out power to over 20,000 people. Despite heavy rain and storms, the National Weather Service says overall damage was minimum."
"And the L.A. Times says hot pink emoji house is eyeing a new owner in Manhattan Beach. The beach house was listed earlier this week for $1.749 million, just two weeks after nearby homeowners objected to paint job at a city council meeting. Some neighbors even think the emojis are meant to mock them because they reported the homeowner for illegal short-term rentals back in May. I can understand neighbors saying: OK, we'll wait about this hot pink emoji house."
"(CROSSTALK)"
"UNIDENTIFIED MALE: So, this is the way you sell house now."
"ROSCHELLE: But painting it pink made sense if there was an Airbnb because sometimes you can't find the Airbnb. So, you just put in the description: pink house with emoji on it. There it is."
"UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Maybe it's mocking me."
"BARTIROMO: How funny? Quick break and then kids and cell phones. The California High School says they're too distracting and their response is causing students anxiety. Wait until you hear this one. Plus, honoring Americas heroes; we will speak to one veteran who's helping others get back on their feet. All that right after this."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back helping our heroes. My next guest is here to tell us about his time in the armed services and how he helps veterans' transition into the world of small business after he started several businesses of his own. Joining us right now is former U.S. Army Ranger and Author of ""Thank You for My Service,"" Mat Best is here. Mat, it is great to have you on the show this morning."
"MAT BEST (RET.), U.S. ARMY RANGER AND AUTHOR: Thank you so much for having me."
"BARTIROMO: First of all, thank you so much for your service."
"BEST: I enjoyed it. That's why I titled the book that way."
"BARTIROMO: Did you really enjoy it, wow?"
"BEST: Absolutely."
"BARTIROMO: Tell us about your experiences."
"BEST: You know, service ranger battalion and as a contractor and again, it was privilege to serve my country and I love it and I think this is the greatest country ever and to be able to participate just a little bit in protecting it is humbling experience for me."
"BARTIROMO: That's so beautiful. We agree. This is the greatest country in the world. So, what kind of benefits did you get from being there with armed services and what did you take from that in terms of when you came back and wanted to get back into business?"
"BEST: Absolutely. I think being in a special operation's unit, you have to create (INAUDIBLE) solve and so much of that translates to the business world where there's so many challenges every day you face that you have to figure out and push through just to complete the objective. And that's why at Black Rifle Coffee, we hire so many veterans because they come from such diverse skill set that really benefits the company in a very advantageous way."
"DAGHER: I've heard that and I know as I mentor somebody who's ex-military as well, retired. And you know, she said it's been difficult to getting the private sector to understand the value of her military experience. So, what do you think is the biggest misunderstanding, private-sector companies have about hiring veterans?"
"BEST: Absolutely. I think there's this awkward trepidation in the civilian sector where they look at (INAUDIBLE) or military resume and they're almost scared about this individual, and that's something I'm very much trying to combat, because I think you have to look in the complete opposite way that this person comes from such an amazing background and skill sets that it's really going to be translate to the civilian sectors."
"MOORE: Is that because of post-traumatic stress syndrome, employers are worried that, you know, some of these veterans might be mentally impaired and things and that may, you know, reduce their ability to do the job? I mean, it almost seems like there's some discrimination against our veterans."
"BEST: I truly believe that and I believe that that's a false construct that we've created here in America and I really want to change that because we have so many amazing veterans that work for us and they're absolutely amazing at their job."
"MOORE: Or even the ones who do suffer from you know, post-traumatic syndrome -- that doesn't impair them necessarily from doing their job."
"BEST: Absolutely not, absolutely not."
"ROSCHELLE: Mat, what advice would you give to the employers out there in terms of developing a strategy to hire and recruit and retain, most importantly, retain veterans?"
"BEST: Just give them a chance to be honest with you, don't be scared that people served. I think you need to look at service as something special and for someone that wanted to serve their country proudly, then they're obviously probably going to want to serve civilian sector just as proudly and be successful in their entrepreneurship or just as a civilian employee."
"BARTIROMO: In your book, ""Thank You for My Service,"" you use humor to tell a story about your time as an army ranger, do find it's easier to communicate, connect with the audience with that kind of storytelling humor, and tell us some of the funny stories?"
"BEST: Absolutely, I think that's why I wrote in such a satirical sense and obviously there's a lot of heavy serious stories in there. But from a guy with my background, I've literally laughed through all kind of the horrors of war. And humor has really helped create the community around serving with everybody. So, yes, I absolutely love to make people laugh and I hope they get a kick out of the book."
"BARTIROMO: So, where are the most accepting companies out there? Tell us who's doing the best job in terms of hiring veterans and making sure that they have opportunities when they come back?"
"BEST: There's a lot of organizations or corporate entities that do it. But the problem a lot of people say they want to support veterans but they don't, and I think that's why I've taken entrepreneurship so head on, is because I know that me and my business partners can make a difference. And you know, top-level executives all the way down, we've created an ecosystem that supports law enforcement, veterans, and EMS, the people that serve our communities in our country."
"BARTIROMO: That's terrific! And when you think about some of the things that are best-suited for a veteran -- I mean, you're coming back with discipline, team work, give us some of those skill sets that are so important for business and can be adaptable from, you know, the field to business?"
"BEST: I think you said it right there, I think veterans are hyper-adaptive because no matter what you're doing overseas the mission comes first and you have to accomplish that and you're presented with many, many challenges and you can't say I can't do it, you have to do it."
"BARTIROMO: Anything surprises you?"
"BEST: In the business?"
"BARTIROMO: No, for your service, when you got there, what surprised you?"
"BEST: You know, I knew I was getting into; my two brothers had served in marine corps and already been to war before I joined. So, I knew what I was getting myself into."
"BARTIROMO: Oh, my goodness. Well, thank you and your family for your incredible service."
"BEST: Thank you."
"BARTIROMO: Great to see you, Mat."
"BEST: I appreciate it."
"BARTIROMO: Thanks so much. The book is ""Thank You for My Service,"" Mat Best, we will see you soon. Still ahead, retails in focus this morning. Target and Lowe's shares surging this morning. Take a look, Lowe's up almost 10 percent, Target up 11, and almost 12 percent after reporting strong earnings. Then bear break-in; take a look at this. This big guy caught on camera raiding the fridge, next hour on MORNINGS WITH MARIA. Stay with us."
"(COMMERCIAL BREAK)"
"BARTIROMO: Welcome back. Good Wednesday morning, everybody. Thank so much for joining us. I'm Maria Bartiromo. And it is Wednesday, August 21st. Your top stories right now just before 7:00 a.m. on the East Coast. Signs of strength in retail"
"March 22--BEIJING (CHINA DAILY/ANN) -- The United States' preliminary decision to impose punitive duties on Chinese imports of solar panels will harm the interests of both sides, and negatively affect the development of the green energy industry in the US as well as cooperation between the two countries in the sector, the Ministry of Commerce said on Wednesday (March 21)."
"The ministry urged the United States to take a prudent attitude when handling the dispute to safeguard the stable and sound growth of bilateral trade, according to a statement on the ministry's website."
"Earlier in the day, the China Chamber of Commerce for Import and Export of Machinery and Electronic Products said the US move is unfair and the support the Chinese government gives to domestic companies does not violate World Trade Organization rules."
"""The decision by the US Commerce Department wasn't made in accordance with the facts,"" read a statement issued by the chamber."
"The chamber said it hopes the US will be fair when it conducts its investigation."
"""Chinese producers of photovoltaic solar panels neither receive illegal governmental subsidies nor dump their products on the US market,"" said the statement."
"The US Commerce Department announced on Tuesday that it will impose tariffs at rates ranging from 2.9 percent to 4.73 percent on Chinese photovoltaic solar panels."
"The decision was called for by SolarWorld Industries America LP, a provider of solar-electric systems, and six other US companies whose names have not been disclosed. They said Chinese companies were selling solar panels in the US at prices lower than the cost of those products and were receiving illegal government subsidies."
"Industry insiders said they were surprised by the tariff rates set by the US and said many companies had expected the rates to range from 20 to 30 percent."
"""The punitive tariffs are lower than we expected, but that doesn't mean that it's right for Chinese producers to be punished,"" said Li Junfeng, secretary-general of the Chinese Renewable Energy Industries Association."
"Li noted that the US decision was preliminary and said he believes solar companies will probably ask for higher punitive tariffs in subsequent legal proceedings."
"""It will still be a long time before a final decision is made,"" he said. ""So Chinese companies need to be prepared. At the same time, we are requiring the US to be clear and transparent about the subsidies it gives to its domestic solar industry."""
"Li said the Chinese government should continue its negotiations with the US to protect the interest of Chinese companies."
"Hong Lei, spokesman for the Foreign Ministry, said on Wednesday that China does not want to see the trade dispute affect bilateral relations."
"All large Chinese solar companies have made official comments about the US decision."
"""As we stated in our testimony to the International Trade Commission, we are not dumping, nor do we believe that we are unfairly subsidized,"" said Robert Petrina, managing director of Yingli Green Energy Americas Inc, the operating subsidiary of Yingli Green Energy in the US."
"""We will continue to fight for affordable solar energy and further growth of the tens of thousands of US solar jobs that we help to create."""
"The company said it remains dedicated to the US solar market regardless of the proceeding's outcome."
"""The important thing to remember is that tariffs are bad for the entire solar industry,"" said Miao Liansheng, chairman and chief executive officer of Yingli Green Energy."
"Trina Solar Ltd and Suntech Power Holdings Co said that they will continue to provide high-quality products and services to the US market."
"Li said the Chinese domestic market for solar panels is growing rapidly. ""The market size was five times as big in 2011 as it was in 2010. We expect the domestic market for solar panels will triple this year."""
"Hundreds of large-scale solar power projects are on hold in the United States. It's a potential threat to President Biden's climate agenda, and it's because of something done by President Biden's administration. The industry is reacting to a federal investigation of potential trade violations involving solar panels bought from Asian suppliers. Maine Public Radio's Fred Bever reports."
"FRED BEVER: Lately, some of Maine's gently rolling hills have been sprouting long rows of solar arrays. Recent state climate policies are driving a renewable energy boom. The procurement manager for this 35-acre project, Leo Azevedo, says even the mowing service avoids fossil fuels."
"LEO AZEVEDO: You might have seen some droppings at the entrance of the site. So we have a local sheep farmer that brings his sheep to graze on the grass."
"BEVER: This array can power around 1,500 homes. And thanks in part to low-cost solar modules sourced from Southeast Asia, that electricity will cost consumers a good deal less than fossil fuel energy sources. But just across the fence, a bigger, even cheaper solar electricity project is on hold."
"AZEVEDO: So right now, most of the panel manufacturers aren't actually taking orders."
"BEVER: That's because the Department of Commerce is investigating whether Chinese panel manufacturers avoided duty requirements by funneling components through affiliates in nearby countries. Azevedo says if Commerce finds violations, it has wide latitude to assess duties retroactive to the investigation's start in April."
"AZEVEDO: Worst-case scenario, you can think about retroactive tariffs of up to 240%. But we really don't know what it is. So it's just too much risk to order panels right now. And that's just the end of it."
"BEVER: In a recent industry survey, most large-scale U.S. solar developers said uncertainty was causing delays and cancellations, putting billions of dollars' worth of carbon-free energy capacity at risk."
"ABIGAIL ROSS HOPPER: The investigation alone is wiping out a decade of solar job growth. It's stunning."
"BEVER: Abigail Ross Hopper of the Solar Energy Industries Association says as many as 100,000 jobs are at stake at a time, she adds, that was supposed to be the green economy's moment in the sun."
"HOPPER: We have a president who believes in climate change and addressing the crisis. We have a House and a Senate that are controlled by Democrats."
"BEVER: The problem's scope is still emerging. An Indiana utility says it has to postpone several solar projects and keep a coal-fired plant running years longer than planned."
"MAMUN RASHID: Yes, doom and gloom scenarios are out there. I've seen all the headlines."
"BEVER: That's Mamun Rashid, CEO of Auxin Solar, the small California panel maker that petitioned the government to level the solar panel playing field. Rashid's since been condemned by many in the industry. But he says fair trade is fair trade."
"RASHID: I think the business models will need to be reassessed and will be reassessed. But no one is going to walk away from hundreds of millions or billion-dollar businesses."
"BEVER: But for now, the sector's recent surge is sputtering. At the Maine solar plant, construction supervisor Adam Farkes gives a wistful look to the untouched site next door."
"ADAM FARKES: It seems a little bit counterproductive to have these goals for climate change. And then at the same time, you're not letting us build anything. We should be building."
"BEVER: Investigators are expected to make a preliminary finding in August. The solar industry and its political allies are calling for a speedier review."
"This chapter examines the EU-China solar panel dispute, the largest trade defense investigation ever done by DG Trade. This chapter first provides background information about the European solar market, European Trade Commissioner Karel de Gucht, and the Option case. This provides useful context to the EU solar panel case. It then assesses which of the BPM, neorealist, or institutionalist models best illuminates the dynamics of issue identification, decision-making, and policy implementation to evaluate existing arguments and cull out scope conditions. I find that, eventually, neorealism explains best what happened concerning decision-making. Institutionalism contributes to a better understanding of all three stages. The Commissioner had an essential role in the issue identification and decision-making stages. The chapter’s conclusion provides a more detailed summary of the case and the theoretical findings drawn from it.The European Solar Market: From Boom to Bust"
"Over the last decade, solar energy has become an increasingly important source of energy, and solar and other renewables are ways to reduce dependence on crude oil and natural gas. The 2009 EU Renewable Energy Directive required the EU to achieve its 20% renewables target by 2020. The European governments had to act to reach this goal, which led to feed-in tariff schemes.1 Thus, the EU created an artificial market leading to more demand for solar and an explosion in Chinese solar targeting the EU market, partly because in 2008, China had named the solar industry a strategic industry. After Italy terminated the feed-in tariffs in 2012, and Germany reduced them, the market slowed down. This led to a collapse in demand and oversupply because the Chinese suppliers tried to sell whatever they could. In 2011, Europe had a global market share of approximately 75–80%. In 2012, this already decreased, and in 2013–2016 Europe’s share was below 10% (SolarPower Europe 2017a; see also Kolk and Curran 2017). German solar companies, including Solar World, experienced severe troubles, and over a dozen firms had to file for insolvency. Exacerbating the pressures flowing competition from Chinese solar manufacturers were including enormous industry overcapacity, weak demand, decreasing government subsidies, and solar prices that plunged by almost half in 2011 and another 24% in 2012 (Financier Worldwide 2013)."
"Trade Commissioner Vows to Take a Tougher Stance on China"
"Early 2010, when the Belgian politician Karel de Gucht assumed office as European Trade Commissioner, he vowed an approving European Parliament to take a tougher stance on China (Financial Times 2012). De Gucht differed from his predecessors Commissioner Peter Mandelson and Catherine Ashton in terms of their policies vis-à-vis China. He believed that Mandelson’s policy was too naïve and too soft.2 He believed that China’s system was different from the European system, something he called state capitalism. De Gucht concluded that there was a vast government subsidies program and that there were threats to shut complaining EU firms out of the Chinese market."
"The Option Case"
"Following a complaint lodged by Belgium-based dongle maker Option, in 2010, DG Trade had launched three parallel investigations against Chinese 3G dongle makers Huawei and ZTE. One on subsidies, one on dumping, and a safeguard request that had to be submitted via the Belgian government. Trade defense investigations are relatively time-consuming. Thus Option’s strategy was to get a safeguard as soon as possible to seek protection. However, approximately one month after the Commission launched its probes, Huawei invested in Option, forcing the Belgian firm to request DG Trade to close the ongoing investigation, which ended the case. There was no case left, much to the dislike of De Gucht. As we will see later on in this case study, the Option case is relevant for a better understanding of the EU-China solar panel dispute."
"Issue Identification: Solar Manufacturers up Against Something not Market-Driven"
"On July 25, 2012, EU ProSun, an industry association representing over 20 European solar companies, lodged a formal complaint that solar panels and their key components imported from China were entering the European market at prices below market value. According to EU ProSun’s President Milan Nitzschke, who was also the Vice President of German solar panel firm SolarWorld: “China’s government has financed the domestic solar industry to the tune of 200 billion euros in the last few years. That’s how ‘dumping’ prices, or prices below the manufacturing costs, are achieved” (Deutsche Welle 2013).3 EU ProSun felt that highly innovative EU companies faced immediate bankruptcy threats because of unfair competition from Chinese exporters. The most important dates and events related to the issue identification stage are given in Table 3.1."
"The Commission is legally obliged to open an investigation when it receives a valid complaint from an EU industry, which provides evidence that exporting producers from one or more countries are dumping a particular product into the European market and injuring the EU industry. As the collective output represented over 25% of EU production, and the producers opposing the complaint did not represent more EU production than companies supporting the complaint, it met the legal requirements for initiating an investigation under EU anti-dumping regulations."
"EU ProSun brought sufficient elements showing possible price dumping by the Chinese solar manufacturers on the EU market, the injury suffered by the EU solar industry, and a possible causal link between the dumped imports and the injury suffered by the EU industry. Thus, the Commission found sufficient prima facie evidence to warrant the opening of an investigation. Consequently, on September 6, 2012, it launched a notice of initiation of an anti-dumping proceeding concerning Chinese solar imports. This was within the limit of 45 days after the receipt of the complaint. This is the term that EU law requires to decide whether to initiate an investigation or not. It was a clear, standard procedure with the only discretion for DG Trade being what to consider as prima facie. Per a senior EU official, it was a “clear case” here (Interview senior EU official, August 11, 2017). The Commission’s TDI department automatically launching an anti-dumping procedure was very poorly perceived by the Chinese side, which regarded it as a direct public attack on China. Per a European official: “With other partners, anti-dumping disputes do not go to the political level, they live their own life in the trade defence investigation part of the relationship. With China, it’s different. They see it as attacks against China” (Brugier 2017: 208)."
"Moreover, in fall 2012, the Commission launched an anti-subsidy investigation on solar imports from China after a complaint lodged by EU ProSun. Here, the EU is also legally obliged to open an investigation if it receives a valid complaint from an EU industry that provides evidence that a product exported from one or more third countries is subsidized and causes injury to the EU industry. As EU ProSun brought sufficient elements demonstrating the existence of possible subsidization by the Government of China, the injury suffered by the EU industry, and a possible causal link between the subsidized imports and the injury suffered by the EU industry, the Commission found that there was sufficient prima facie evidence to warrant the opening of an investigation."
"It also is essential to discuss the methodology used by the Commission to calculate. First, it is based on the facts available. Second, as it involved a pre-December 2016 case, China could be given so-called non-market economy treatment, because China does not have MES. The Commission uses the analog country method in these cases. This method intends to allow investigators to model production costs in the investigated country as if that country operated on market economy conditions. However, this frequently leads to a high price as a benchmark. It is challenging to find a country to make an exact comparison. This methodology already applies to the prima facie evidence. The industry includes in its complaint what a suitable proxy country would be. The reason for this is that they have extensive knowledge of the global market. This meant that, in the case of China, one can virtually always find dumping and subsidies. An industry association representative went as far as saying, “there basically is no methodology. If you are not a country with MES, you are guilty, more or less. This is deliberately done for China; the MES clause is a China clause” (Interview senior industry association representative, January 30, 2018). Be that as it may, in this case, the margins were that high that one could indeed speak of dumping. It was “so crystal clear there was both dumping and subsidies, so there were no doubts that the legal requirements were met” (Interview senior EU official, August 19, 2019).4"
"Aside from the above, one should not forget Commissioner De Gucht’s intent on taking a tougher stance on China. After the Option case’s closure, “EU ProSun on a silver platter offered De Gucht a chance to attack China’s strategic sector” (Interview senior industry association representative, January 30, 2018)."
"I now turn to examine how well my three candidate theories explain what happened concerning issue identification."
"In 2012, EU ProSun lodged formal complaints on dumping and subsidies of Chinese solar. As the complainant showed prima facie evidence, DG Trade was formally obliged to initiate an anti-dumping investigation. Because China is a non-MES country, it is relatively easy to find dumping and subsidies. Be that as it may, based on the merits of the case, Chinese firms were dumping on the EU market. Also, Trade Commissioner De Gucht had a complicated relationship with China. He played a personal role in the process of launching and implementing the measures. EU law and procedures require the Commission to come with provisional measures after nine months. The member states can express their opinion on these measures via a non-binding vote. In this case, a majority of member states opposed them. Merkel stated Germany preferred a negotiated solution, which was critical for this case because now De Gucht had no other choice than going for a negotiated agreement. There had been a lack of support from the member states for this case from the very beginning. Everything has happened per EU law and procedures but reluctantly. Eventually, a mixture of products to target and the introduction of the MIP won the support of the member states. Interest groups like EU ProSun are empowered, but because of other issues, they do not have the full force in shaping trade defense policy."
"The Commissioner played a personal role in the process of launching and implementing the measures. To some degree, the BPM decision-making hypothesis is correct because De Gucht wanted to broker political deals and bargain with China. This approach was driven by the perception that there was a need to invent new strategies to get a good outcome for Europe. What was critical for this case’s outcome was that Merkel changed her position and favored a negotiated solution. In combination with the binding voting procedures for the definitive measures, this meant that there was no majority support for De Gucht’s move. We also saw “where you stand depends on where you sit” regarding DG Trade. One cannot speak of implementation concerns in the implementation stage, such as delays, divergences from actual policy decisions, or deliberate poor implementation from the bureaucrats’ side. The Commission has to follow EU law with regard to the procedures."
"Neorealism does not illuminate the issue identification stage. However, it is critical in the decision-making stage. Merkel changing her position and calling for a negotiated solution was crucial. De Gucht’s proposed measures would not have survived the final and binding vote in the Council. Given traditional national interests, countries have to assert themselves to defend their economic interests, which Germany demonstrated in this solar case. Due to the lack of member state support, the Commission services had been fighting an uphill battle from day one. Thus, also in the implementation stage, it was visible in the background."
"Institutions matter, and EU law and procedures contribute to a better understanding of all three stages. It was the Commission’s legal requirement to act because the EU industry lodged valid complaints. Noteworthy are the voting procedures, the clear timetable of events, and the methodology used to measure dumping and subsidies. In China’s case, because of its non-MES virtually always dumping (and subsidies) could be found. The procedures shape a position where there is some power for the member states with the definitive measures, and eventually, Germany stood up for its economic interests. The Commission has to monitor the implementation because it concerns law enforcement. Everything happened per EU law and procedures but reluctantly."
"Global warming and climate change have been critical global issues in recent years. The evaluation of environmental and operational efficiency would be an important first step towards sustainable development. Renewable energies are playing an increasingly important role in the energy sector. Following energy transition policies, oil and gas companies are gradually transforming into energy companies. First, this article measures the operational and environmental efficiency of 45 U.S. oil and gas companies over the period 2000–2018. Second, this research aims to assess the effect of renewable energies on the two types of efficiency. Two methods are used in this research: the true fixed- model applied for measuring the efficiency scores and evaluate the inefficiency determinants, and the system generalised method of moments approach to verify the effect of energy and environmental policy on both the types of efficiencies and to test the robustness of our results. The results reveal that the overall average operational efficiency (desirable output) of the U.S. oil and gas companies is 76% for a period of 19 years, while the overall average level of CO2 emissions efficiency (undesirable output) of the oil and gas companies is 79%. The results highlight that U.S. oil and gas companies have begun to transition to low CO2 emission in recent years. Furthermore, the biofuel, hydroelectric power, wind power and solar energy contribute to promote the environmental efficiency of oil and gas companies.Energy Economics and protecting the environment are essential issues in a modern society that aspires to sustainable development. In order to achieve sustainable development, nations have sought to cooperate to reduce CO2 emissions by adopting protocols and agreements, namely the Kyoto Protocol in 1997 and the Paris Agreement in 2015. Thus, an energy transition is necessary for environmental protection and climate change. However, oil production must be reduced in accordance with the current development model. In order to fulfil the Paris Agreement, only 13% of the world's proven reserves of crude oil must be exploited (Atris & Goto, 2019). Besides, although the energy structure in the world is undergoing important changes and the renewable energy status is increasing, oil and gas still represent half of the energy market. The United States is among the world's largest producers of oil and gas and the second largest contributor to energy-related CO2 emissions."
"This paper examines the environmental and operational efficiencies and evaluated the inefficiencies determinants for the desirable (operational revenue) and undesirable (CO2 emission) outputs of 45 U.S. oil and gas companies during the period 2000–2018 and discuss policy implications for energies transition, and reveal effect of different renewables energies. Two methods are used in this research, the TFE model is applied as the main method to calculate the efficiency scores and evaluate the determinants of inefficiency, while the system GMM applied to test the robustness of our result particularly to verify the effect of energy and environmental policy on the operational and environmental efficiency of oil and gas companies."
"The empirical results of this study reveal that the overall average operational efficiency (desirable output) of the U.S. oil and gas companies is 76% for a period of 19 years (2000–2018), which means that without changing the level of inputs, the oil and gas companies had a margin to increase their efficiency by 24%. Furthermore, the overall average level of CO2 emissions efficiency (undesirable output) of the oil and gas companies is 79% for a period of 19 years, which means that with this level of inputs, the oil and gas companies have controlled their CO2 emissions by 21%. Otherwise, the overall average environmental efficiency level of U.S. oil and gas companies is 21% for a period of 19 years. The results affirm that the annual average scores of environmental and operational efficiencies have the same tendency during the study period. However, the gap between the operational efficiency level and the CO2 emissions level are greater when the annual average scores of operational efficiencies exceed 75% or when its curve is ascending."
"The empirical findings reveal that the total production of renewable energy and the total production of biomass energy contribute to reduce the operational efficiency of oil and gas companies and contribute to improve the environmental efficiency of oil and gas companies. However, biofuel production, hydroelectric power production, wind power and solar energy production contribute to destroying the operational efficiency of oil and gas companies and contribute to promote the environmental efficiency. The above studies indicate that environmental regulations or the energy transition affect the efficiencies of companies in the high-carbon industry."
"Our empirical results highlight that U.S. oil and gas companies have begun a transition to low CO2 emission in recent years. Since 2015, date of the Paris agreement, the gap between operational efficiency trend and CO2 emission efficiency trend begin to decrease or disappear, this reflected in the decline of operational efficiency which leads to a decrease in CO2 emissions and improvement of environmental efficiency following an energy transition policy adopted by U.S. oil and gas companies towards renewable energies. Climate change and emissions have not been a priority for the Trump administration, especially, since 2014, where oil and gas companies recorded a decrease in operational efficiency, this made Trump administrations quit the Paris Agreement in 2017. Furthermore, the environmental and operational efficiencies are influenced by environmental policy and governmental regulations."
"Like any other study, this research also has some opportunities for improvement. First, this study has investigated only the U.S. oil and gas companies. The efficiency of the oil and gas companies has not been studied in the countries that have recently expanded their influence in the petroleum industry. Saudi Arabia, China and Russia, which are excluded from this study, are very important in the global petroleum industry as producing countries. Furthermore, this study needs to reorganise the proposed TFE model by a comparative study based on parametric (stochastic) and non-parametric (DEA) approach. This issue will be discussed in future research as an extension of this study."
""
"With a busy first half in the books, China, the world's biggest solar market, could easily install 40,000 MW of new capacity this year, according to JA Solar Holdings Co. Ltd. CFO Hexu Zhao, 16% more than the country added in 2016. That projection runs counter to an estimate provided to the U.S. International Trade Commission by bankrupt panel maker Suniva Inc., which asserted that the Chinese market would contract in 2017. Suniva is asking Washington to impose tariffs, known as safeguards, on imported crystalline silicon solar cells and modules, arguing, in part, that Chinese producers have continued feeding new capacity into an oversupplied market despite expectations of declining demand at home."
"China, which added approximately 35,000 MW of new solar capacity through July as developers rushed to beat a drop in subsidies, should see annual installations in the range of 35,000 MW to 40,000 MW in 2018 and 2019, Hexu Zhao said Aug. 22 on an earnings conference call. The country installed approximately 34,500 MW last year, Reuters reported, citing data from China's National Energy Agency."
"""[We] are expecting ... bigger growth in [the] Chinese market than other markets,"" Jung Pyo Seo, CFO of South Korean solar equipment manufacturer Hanwha Q CELLS Co. Ltd., said on an Aug. 10 earnings call."
"Importantly for the global solar market, the growth likely will not be smooth. JA Solar President Jian Xie said the company, which is based in China and produces solar cells and modules, plans to deal with a second-half slowdown in the Chinese market by sending more shipments abroad."
"Cool-down in the fall"
"That could coincide with cooling activity in the U.S. in the fourth quarter as the risks and uncertainties surrounding the Suniva trade case set up a November deadline for foreign manufacturers to ship equipment to the country, Zhao said."
"For now, Hanwha Q CELLS said it is focusing on the U.S. market as demand and prices rise amid a buying rush fueled by fears of steep tariffs on imported solar equipment in the future. The uncertainty roiling the market ""will only continue to build"" until the U.S. International Trade Commission recommends a course of action to President Donald Trump, a Hanwha Q CELLS executive said on a conference call with analysts."
"Suniva and its co-petitioner, SolarWorld Americas Inc., want the International Trade Commission to recommend that Trump set tariffs and minimum prices on imported solar equipment. The companies say they are the victims of an oversupplied global market that has crippled America's solar manufacturing industry. Without relief, they claim, solar cell and panel manufacturing could disappear entirely from the U.S."
"The International Trade Commission is expected to decide by Sept. 22 whether domestic cell and panel makers have been threatened with or suffered serious injury due to rising imports. If it determines they have, the commission will have until Nov. 13 to deliver its recommendations to Trump."
"Market analyst GTM Research expects global solar demand to exceed 80,000 MW in 2017, the highest level ever, with China accounting for 39% of the market. The firm anticipates global demand will increase by between 6% and 8% a year through 2019. JA Solar expects global demand to reach approximately 90,000 MW next year, with up to 40,000 MW of that coming from China and about 13,000 MW from the U.S. The U.S. installed approximately 14,760 MW of new solar photovoltaic capacity in 2016, according to the Solar Energy Industries Association, a trade group."
"The rise of trade protectionism in solar photovoltaics is puzzling as solar firms across major markets show a high level of cooperation through global supply chains, buying inputs from foreign suppliers, selling inputs to foreign customers, engaging in foreign direct investment or securing foreign investment (Nahm, 2017, Meckling and Hughes, 2017). A large cross-section of Chinese and US solar firms thus benefit from open trade in the sector, as do firms in Europe, Japan, and elsewhere.We proposed that in the US solar PV case, a protectionist advocacy coalition of a small group of manufacturers and key political representatives leveraged the institutional opportunities provided by US trade law. The US-China solar dispute is thus the outcome of competition between protectionist and free trade coalitions of firms and policymakers within a given institutional setting. The structure of US trade law supported the influence of the protectionist alliance. The free trade advocacy coalition, representing the majority of US solar firms, lost the battle over solar trade policy. Our coalition-centered explanation contrasts with private interest theory and theories of bureaucratic politics.The economic implications of the rise of green protectionism, as well as the implications for the competitiveness of renewable energy, remain uncertain. Data suggests, for example, that the profitability of upstream polysilicon producers and downstream developers and installers was harmed by the trade dispute, while some manufacturers benefitted from it. At the beginning of the trade dispute, the US had three polysilicon producers: Hemlock Semiconductor, REC Silicon and MEMC (since 2013 SunEdison). In January 2014, the Chinese government imposed tariffs on polysilicon imports from the US as a retaliatory measure for the US tariffs on Chinese module imports 2013 (Ma, 2013). The tariffs effectively shut out US polysilicon producers from the Chinese market, the largest sales market for polysilicon. US producers subsequently made workers redundant, and closed facilities (Wesoff, 2015, Hotakainen, 2016). Between Q3 2014 and Q3 2015, US polysilicon production decreased by 35% (Solar Foundation, 2015).Meanwhile, some US module manufacturers were possibly helped by the tariffs. SolarWorld increased jobs by 200–900 full-time employees in 2015 (Wesoff, 2014). Suniva opened a 200-MW factory in Michigan, while SolarCity is entering manufacturing with a 2 GW plant in New York, although analysts are skeptical about the extent to which these expansions of module manufacturing capacity were driven by the tariffs (Wesoff, 2015). A second set of manufacturers that might have benefitted are those producing thin-film modules, a competing technology to polysilicon modules (Mehta, 2014). In the aftermath of the 2014 tariff, spot prices for thin-film modules increased more than 5% within a month (Clover, 2014).As regards the competitiveness of renewable energy, GTM Research estimates that the prices of modules shipped from China increased by a mean of 14%, with increases ranging between 7% and 20% depending on the purchasing strategy of firms (Munsell, 2014). The increase in the cost of solar PV in the US compared to other jurisdictions, as a result of the 2014 tariff, may have thus at least temporarily slowed the move toward grid parity (GTM Research, 2014a).8 The trade case occurred, however, in the context of rapidly declining system costs: between 2008 and 2012, the price of solar PV modules dropped by 80% (International Energy Agency, 2015b, 173). Solar PV deployment continued to increase significantly in the US, despite the imposition of tariffs (Barbose and Naïm, 2016, 9).These cross-cutting economic and environmental implications of tariffs demonstrate the ‘green dilemma’ that policymakers face in employing trade policy in renewable energy industries. The trade-off lies between protecting parts of manufacturing through tariffs, on the one hand, and supporting renewable energy firms that benefit from open trade while also lowering the cost of renewable energy technologies to mitigate climate change, on the other. Our analysis suggests the scope to carefully manage these trade-offs is limited. The institutional features of US trade law, combined with the incentives for firms and policymakers, suggest that protectionist policies and international conflict are likely to be a durable feature of renewable energy trade between the US and third parties "
"Although our paper concentrates on US energy exports, for completeness, here we briefly discuss the effects of the trade war on energy imports. The US imports a number of goods that have implications for the price and disposition of energy, some of which have been targeted by import tariffs during the Trump administration.7 These include, for example, solar modules and steel for pipelines. When steel tariffs were levied, a number of pipeline developers filed for, and subsequently received, tariff exemptions. In the case of solar modules, there are three different tariff schemes on exported solar modules to the US. Few Chinese-made modules have been imported to the US since the last round of tariffs in 2018. The PV module price in the US has been higher than the global average due to legacy tariff policies even though the US module price has been decreasing over time. To secure business with the US, Chinese module manufacturers either moved their facilities to tax-free locations outside of China (such as Southeast Asian countries with relative low production costs) or absorbed some of the tariff costs. Thus, tariffs imply that low-cost suppliers from outside China enjoy a competitive advantage relative to domestic suppliers. This advantage will grow as Section 201 tariff declines by 5% each year."
"In general, one would expect imports to be negatively impacted by the imposition of tariffs. However, the extent to which they are impacted will depend on the price elasticity of demand for the affected commodity, the elasticity of substitution (or readily available alternative sources of supply), the extent to which the supplier of the affected commodity adjusts their prices to absorb the impact of the tariff, and the degree to which demand for the affected commodity is being stimulated by other factors (such as income growth or offsetting domestic policy incentives)."
"The data below is depicted in $/day to normalize differences in the number of days per month. Fig. 10 illustrates significant detail regarding the value of US imports from January 2016 through September 2019. Any impacts felt in the energy sector are relatively small in comparison to broader impacts on overall trade, as energy commodities—especially individual energy and energy-related commodities targeted by tariffs—are a relatively small part of the overall imports. We focus on monthly data since January 2016. This enables a better sense of how the US-China trade dispute has impacted energy-related trade, especially since the beginning of 2018."
"According to the Harmonized Tariff Schedule Codes, we see a definitive uptick in the value of imports into the US since the Trump administration began (Fig. 10, Panel 1). The dutiable value of imports8 increased by 238 million $/day from January 2016 to January 2017. Subsequently, the dutiable value of imports increased by 206 million $/day from January 2017 to January 2018, and 394 million $/day from January 2018 to January 2019, and has totaled over 503 million $/day since Trump took office through September 2019. Increased economic growth in the US plays a role here, as higher incomes translate to higher imports. But the introduction of tariffs in 2018 seemed to have slowed the momentum on imports overall.9 The value of total energy and energy-related imports has declined since mid-2018 (Fig. 10, Panel 2), which is largely the result of declines in the value of imports of crude oil, natural gas, and petroleum products to the US. This, in turn, is the result of continued increases in the domestic production of these commodities, which are resulting in a growth in exports."
"Strikingly, even with tariffs on imports of solar panels and equipment, the value of imports in that category has generally increased since January 2016 (Fig. 10, Panel 3)."
"The solar photovoltaic industry has been specifically targeted for tariffs by the Trump administration. Hence, the increase in the value of US imports of ‘Solar panels, components, LEDs (8541)’ depicted in Fig. 10 might be unexpected. It likely reflects a host of other domestic policies—including direct and indirect subsidies, such as a 30% investment tax credit that is slated to fall in value after 2019, as well as mandates—that have stimulated demands for those items. Indeed, domestic incentives for the installation of solar panels (many of which are local) and continued declines in cost (not pictured) are likely serving to more than offset the impact of tariffs. As seen in the [12] Monthly Solar Photovoltaic Module Shipments Report, October 2019, data on module shipments remains robust and continues to grow (Fig. 11) after a decline in early 2018."
"The growth of imports of photovoltaic modules indicated in Fig. 11 has been accompanied by a shift in the source of imports. As indicated in Fig. 12, the value of imports of solar panels and related equipment from China has fallen since the tariffs were imposed. Since the middle of 2018, US photovoltaic module imports have been sourced increasingly from Southeast Asian countries such as Malaysia and Vietnam (Fig. 12). In fact, from the beginning of 2018 through September 2019, the share of imports (by value) from Malaysia increased from 19.7% to 35.5% and the share of imports (by value) from Vietnam increased from 8.4% to 23.8%, all while the share of imports (by value) from China declined from 10.8% to 2.7%. Moreover, this occurred as the total value of US imports increased by 16.7%.10"
"The imposition of tariffs on imports from a specific trade partner should, all else equal, result in a “reshuffling of the deck” of imports rather than a massive decline in imports, provided there are opportunities for low-cost switching. Hence, the realized price impact of a bilateral tariff is not necessarily the tariff itself; rather, it is the change in price to the substituted commodity. In this way, the domestic welfare impacts are mitigated, but not completely avoided. Moreover, it highlights the manner in which the impacts of bilateral trade policies can be overstated, especially when they do not fully account for import-source substitution opportunities."
"China and the United States have high levels of installed capacity and investment in renewable energy technologies, including in the solar photovoltaic (PV) industry (REN21, 2016). Companies in both countries have invested billions of dollars into the development and deployment of solar PV, and the industry is an increasingly important employer (Schreurs, 2012, Deutch and Steinfeld, 2013). Globally, the importance of solar PV is expected to grow. The New Policies Scenario of the International Energy Agency, for example, suggests solar PV could draw USD 2 trillion of investment globally between 2015 and 2040, second only to wind power among all forms of electricity generation (International Energy Agency, 2015a, 320).Historically, the US and Chinese governments cooperated in renewable energy development. The US-China Renewable Energy Partnership built on a history of bilateral energy cooperation (Wan and Craig, 2013). The US-Clean Energy Research Center also managed intellectual property rights in collaborative renewable energy research and development (Lewis, 2014a). Collaboration in renewable energy extends to industry. Notably, solar firms in the US and the EU are linked with Chinese firms through global supply chains (Nahm, 2017). The emergence of global supply chains has enabled solar PV companies to specialize in specific stages of manufacturing, and to scale up global solar PV production capacity (Nahm and Steinfeld, 2014).The protracted and major solar PV trade dispute that emerged between China and the United States in 2011, when the US government imposed anti-subsidy and countervailing duties against a number of Chinese solar module and cell manufacturers, thus stood in contrast with governmental and private sector cooperation. The dispute is also representative of a broader shift towards the use of trade remedies in renewable energy (Lewis, 2014b).2 In the solar PV sector alone, for example, nine major bilateral and multilateral trade cases were brought forward between 2011 and 2015 (Center for Economic Policy Research, 2016).We examine what led the US government to pursue trade remedies against Chinese producers, despite the links between many Chinese and US solar firms, and a history of bilateral governmental cooperation. The outcome is particularly puzzling because the majority of US solar firms opposed tariffs. We propose that the decision to implement, and then expand, trade remedies in the solar PV sector can best be explained by the incentives of domestic manufacturers and members of congress, and the distributional effects of the institutions governing US trade disputes. We describe how a coalition of a small number of domestic manufacturers, and congressional members, successfully utilized US trade law to their advantage, sidelining a broader free trade coalition representing the majority of US solar photovoltaic firms. This outcome was enabled, we propose, by the fact that US law enables aggrieved companies to seek trade remedies with the relative ease by using domestic law, regardless of the economic impact potentially imposed (Wu and Salzman, 2014)."
"In explaining this outcome we employ a coalitional model of policy-making, drawing on standard concepts from two sets of public policy theories: Actor-Based Institutionalism (ACI), and the Advocacy Coalition Framework (ACF) (Scharpf, 1997, Sabatier, 1988). Our framework incorporating the incentives of both companies and policymakers offers a more complete explanation, we propose, than alternative models of public policy formation. One possible alternative model, for example, is drawn from private interest theories of regulation, which proposes that “regulation is acquired by…industry and is designed and operated primarily for its benefit” (Stigler, 1971, 3). Yet in the case presented here the solar PV industry was divided over the merits of applying trade remedies, with differences reflecting the expected effects of remedies because of varying participation in global supply chains for solar PV. In aggregate, however, data show industry opponents were more numerous than firms supporting the imposition of trade remedy measures (Meckling and Hughes, 2017).A second possible model focuses on theories of bureaucratic performance, specifically that bureaucratic agencies pursue organizational missions assigned to them (Dixit, 2002). It is plausible, for example, the Department of Commerce (DoC) may have been attempting to enhance its performative, procedural, or technical reputation by investigating alleged dumping and anticompetitive subsidy provision by the Chinese government (Carpenter, 2012). A focus on the mission of the DoC may help to explain why the US government pursued measures that harmed many US firms operating in the sector. It does, however, not explain why the final scope of the second ruling extended beyond that initially petitioned for by SolarWorld, the company claiming injury.The paper contributes to research on the relationship between trade and climate policy, an increasingly important area of research (Weber and Peters, 2009; Holzer and Cottier, 2015). Recent studies focus on the rise of trade disputes over industrial policy for renewable energy industries (Lewis, 2014a, Wu and Salzman, 2014). Such renewable energy trade protectionism is controversial. On the one hand, tariffs could possibly support innovative domestic module manufacturing capacities (Zheng and Kammen, 2014). On the other hand, they harm large segments of the solar industry, and have the potential to increase the costs of key technologies to mitigate climate change. The latter also could reduce the competitiveness of solar compared to fossil-fuel based electricity generation. Collectively, political representatives thus face a ‘green dilemma’ between protecting parts of manufacturing through tariffs while potentially increasing the costs of key renewable energy technologies, and supporting others firms of the industry that benefit from open trade.We can infer from the explanation offered here that international economic cooperation is unlikely to limit the application of trade remedies in renewable industries when two conditions are met. First, firms and policymakers have incentives to seek protection. This is the case when firms are not deeply integrated internationally, face import competition, and contribute economically within important constituencies. Second, trade institutions continue to enable remedies to be applied without taking into consideration the broad economic effects of such measures. The domestic politics of renewable energy trade thus implies that conflict is likely to be an enduring feature of renewable energy policy, so long as these conditions exist. This limits the scope for policy to carefully manage the ‘green dilemma’ of the politics of renewable energy trade.The remainder of this article unfolds as follows. First, we show how the globalization of the production of solar PV shifted over the past decade, resulting in the competitive dynamics we observe today. Second, we explain the evolution of the US-China case, demonstrating how a protectionist advocacy coalition shaped the outcome. In a third step, we explore the implication for policymaking at the intersection of global trade and renewable energy.The solar industry makes up the second-largest share of non-hydro renewable electricity generation globally. Installed capacity increased from 5.1 gigawatts (GW) in 2005 to 227 GW in 2015. Market growth initially centered on Germany, however China was responsible for 30% of total capacity additions in 2015 (REN21, 2016).The rise in global installed capacity masks important changes in the location and organization of solar PV production. Solar PV production was initially linked to firms diversifying from the oil and consumer electronics industries, such as Sharp, Kyocera, and Siemens. Solar PV manufacturing thus initially occurred within dedicated business units located within horizontally diversified firms (Jones and Bouamane, 2012).Industry growth saw the emergence of companies specializing in the production of polysilicon, and cell and module manufacturing. In addition, the entrance of Chinese manufacturers into solar panel manufacturing transformed the distribution of production globally (Gallagher and Zhang, 2016). Chinese firms’ annual PV module production increased from 1.34 to 25.6 GW between 2007 and 2013, and Chinese manufacturers captured 60% of the global module market by 2012 (European Photovoltaic Industry Association 2013). Module production in Germany, Japan, and the US continued to grow: from 747 MW (MW) to 1.7 GW in Germany, from 713 MW to 2.4 GW in Japan, and from 353 MW to 943 MW in the United States. Nevertheless, their relative shares of global module production fell from 18.5% to 4.2% (Germany), 17.7 to 6.1% (Japan), and 8.8 to 2.4% (United States), respectively (GTM Research, 2014b). Together, the emergence of vertically specialized suppliers, and expansion of production to China, also led to the rise of complex global supply chains characterized by an increase in cross-border trade in solar goods. A large number of the PV modules produced in China were manufactured for export, even as domestic capacity rapidly increased (Deutch and Steinfeld, 2013, 7).The rise of Chinese manufacturing helped lower the costs of solar PV systems. Politically, however, it is associated with a series of trade disputes. In the United States two trade cases—in 2011-12 and 2013-14 respectively—led to the imposition of unilateral tariffs against a number of module manufacturers based in China. In 2012 the US government set preliminary unilateral tariffs on solar cells and modules following anti-dumping and anti-subsidy investigations of between 18.3% and 249.9%. Countervailing duties were set between 14.78% and 15.97%. The ruling left the possibility open that Chinese manufacturers import modules assembled in China with cells from Taiwan. That led to a second case, and in May 2014 the DoC expanded the scope of antidumping and countervailing duties, incorporating both Chinese and Taiwan-manufactured cells and modules, from 26.71% to 165% in the case of China, to between 11.45% and 27.55% for Taiwan (Department of Commerce, 2014)."
"In this paper, we examined the stock market performance of Chinese firms in the solar panel industry in response to a series of policy announcements related to an antidumping investigation in the European market and industrial policy announcements by the Chinese government. We first documented that announcements of trade policy restrictions in Europe were associated with negative abnormal returns for most Chinese solar panel producers. However, our analysis documents considerable heterogeneity in the magnitude and, in some cases, the sign of abnormal returns. Additionally, we showed that domestic policy announcements by the Chinese government tended to induce positive abnormal returns for Chinese solar panel manufacturers.In exploring the sources of cross-sectional heterogeneity in returns, we found, consistent with the model of firms engaged in international trade, that larger, more export-oriented firms experienced larger stock market losses in the wake of European trade restriction announcements. We further show that European trade policy has a larger negative effect on Chinese private sector firms relative to state owned enterprises. Finally, we use a two stage least squares estimation technique to show that firms listed on US markets are more responsive to news events than those listed in China and Hong Kong.In considering our results, we note that we have identified empirical puzzles. First, the market returns of China’s state owned enterprises appear to be largely unresponsive to relevant news events. It is not clear why. We speculate that this lack of responsiveness might be due to investors’ perceptions that these firms are sheltered from adverse market forces by an unofficial but implied government guarantee (similar to that which propped up FANNIE MAE in the US). If correct, this line of reasoning suggests that one underlying cause of the resource mis-allocation problem in China is the belief in implicit government guarantees.Second, we observe that firms listed in the United States are more responsive to news events than those listed in China and Hong Kong, even after controlling for observable characteristics and instrumenting for the decision to list in a foreign market. Many possible explanations exist; for example, this could be due to differences in the sophistication of investors, the functioning of the stock markets, or unaccounted-for differences in the firms in our sample. We suggest that this question warrants further research as it relates back to the deeper question of resource mis-allocation and the mechanisms necessary to improve efficiency.Finally, our analysis points to the unexpected outcome of Europe’s antidumping policy in solar panels. The intellectual origins of antidumping policy and the contemporary popular commentary surrounding it suggest that it is intended to promote a fair competitive environment for firms. However, our results highlight that publicly-listed Chinese private sector firms experienced the largest losses under Europe’s import restrictions. Weirdly, the state owned enterprises that possibly benefit from implicit government guarantees experienced little or no adverse impact. Although EU antidumping policy is intended to foster fair competition, it seems that the net effect of policy changes in the solar panel market (European restrictions on the importation of Chinese solar panels and any official or unofficial policies the Chinese might imposed in response) tilted the playing field against the Chinese private sector in favor of state owned enterprises."
"This final section will seek to highlight the implications of these cases for theorizing about GPNs and the institutional structures that frame them. In terms of the key questions set out the first research question was in relation to the key actors, their arguments and how they reflect their position in the GPN. The analysis presented here indicates that a firm's position in a GPN, rather than their nationality, can dictate their interests. In this case, different actors in the same country had quite different arguments. EU-based producers of solar panels clearly had an interest in protection and argued that theirs was a strategic industry. However, many EU-owned and -operated companies wished to maintain the status quo, either because they relied on low-cost Chinese panels to be competitive, or because they exported intermediate goods to China and did not want to suffer collateral damage from trade tensions. Their arguments were more pragmatic and focused on jobs and value added.Thus, we had a rather unusual situation where EU companies from within the sector, and even from unrelated sectors like wine , were lobbying simultaneously with Chinese companies against trade protection. Their position within global GPNs was such that their interests merged with those of Chinese manufacturers, rather than EU-based PV producers. Such trans-national interest groups are a relatively new feature of international political economy. Their importance in this case underlines the point made by that the conventional idea that only import-competing companies can overcome the challenges of collective action is increasingly undermined by contrary evidence. This change is intimately linked to the spread of GPNs.The second research question was related to trade impacts and what they tell us about how changes in trade policy impact on network structures? Trade figures indicate that choices within the PV GPN were heavily impacted by trade regulation, although the impacts varied depending on the market structures and the nature of the regulation. The choice by the US authorities to impose ADDs on Chinese exports of PV cells had major impacts on sourcing strategies for that market, including a reorientation of sourcing to other suppliers. This is a classic example of the trade diversion effect, well known in international economics but less well integrated into studies of GPNs. In the EU, the case seems to have accelerated an existing trend towards reductions in imports from China – in other words, trade destruction. Unlike in the US case, these falls were not compensated for by imports from other sources. Thus, the two markets reacted rather differently to the AD investigations. This seems likely to be partly because of different market size and market economics, but also because of differences in the nature of the final regulations imposed and the extent to which they covered the whole production chain.The third question related to the implications for GPN/GVC research. The evidence from this case indicates that choices about production and sourcing can be strongly affected by state regulations, and that power relations beyond the value chain can be as important to outcomes, as those within it. GPNs do adjust in reaction to emerging institutional constraints. This underlines a key point often made in the GPN literature that analysis needs to look beyond the chain, to actors outside it, which may frame interactions As the impact on the US PV market has shown, the imposition of new protectionist measures can provide opportunities for companies in unaffected countries, which position themselves as alternative sources. In effect, these measures provide greater market access for producers in unaffected countries, compared to named suppliers. This provides the former with opportunities to integrate the chain, which are similar to that provided by preferential market access Thus, in certain circumstances, restrictive regulations can encourage trade diversion, spreading the production network wider than would be the case in a context where choices are made on the basis of pure economics. GVC researchers have identified such a dynamic in the clothing industry under the quota system  However, as the EU figures in this case show, trade diversion is not inevitable and some trade measures can reduce trade. Much depends on the measure taken and the market context This case, together with the extensive work in international economics on the impact of trade restrictions on trade flows, underlines that more work needs to be done within the GVC/GPN literature to better take account of how such institutional factors can orient companies’ choices. In the solar panel industry, there is strong evidence that AD cases, whatever their outcome, do influence sourcing. Yet, relatively little effort has gone into conceptualizing how the institutional context impacts on locational choice. With a few notable exceptions analysis of trade regulations is not extensive in GVC/GPN studies. In the case of trade policy, I do not hold that it is always be a major factor influencing company choices in all GPNs. Rather my key point is that GVC/GPNs researchers should explicitly include the trade policy context in their studies, as an integral element of the socio-institutional context.Whether trade policy impacts on GPNs depends on several factors. One would expect impacts in sectors which have historically been subject to distortive trade policies and continue to be highly regulated – agriculture is a case in point  Lesser impacts would be expected in sectors which have now largely been liberalized, such as clothing, although in contexts where relatively high tariffs persist, policy can still influence trade  Many sectors have historically relatively low tariffs and few trade restrictions in key markets and thus trade regimes are unlikely to have major impacts. Electronics, where factor costs and flexibility are key to lead firm choices and tariffs are low or zero, is a good example Building on the evidence in this case, as well as on the propositions made in we can conclude that there are several characteristics of a GPN which suggest that trade policy is likely be a factor in leads firms’ sourcing decisions. In the presence of one, or several of the following characteristics, the trade policy context deserves to be systematically incorporated into GPN/GVC analyses:High MFN tariffs.Differentials in the tariff applied between key sources, through preferential access, or trade defence, as in this case.High levels of sector-dependent employment in the importing market, especially in vulnerable regions of the country/region.High perceived strategic importance of the sector for wider societal objectives in the importing market (e.g. high-quality employment, leading-edge technology, etc.).The final two propositions are added, as history shows that labour-intensive sectors are particularly vulnerable to trade defence actions, as well as other trade-distorting tools like quotas while the solar case illustrates that sensitivities are also high in technology-based sectors. Although analysis is restricted here to trade policy, it is by no means the only regulatory tool which can impact on GPNs. Other regulations, like product and labour standards, also call for further study, if we are to better understand how power relations outside the chain impact on actors within itThe final question posed was what the outcome of the case can tell us about the broader issue of EU--China trade relations in the post-financial crisis context? It is clear to me, and to those interviewed about the case, that its evolution and outcome reflect the recent shift in power relations in the global economy. Observers, and the press generally, attributed the relatively favourable outcome in the case to pressure from the Chinese authorities  The EU Commission was considered to have been put in a difficult position by the fact that a majority of member states did not back ADDs This reticence was often attributed to Chinese pressure and direct retaliation Prosun's representative was unambiguous in his judgment: ‘China, through political and economic muscle and dividing and ruling Europe, has succeeded in dictating terms’ have recently highlighted that the rise of emerging markets for consumer goods seems likely to be accompanied by a shift in corporate and geopolitical power. In the solar panel case, we clearly see this effect. In terms of corporate power, the Chinese solar panel industry succeeded very effectively in mobilizing support amongst EU import- and export-dependent companies with similar interests, overcoming, in the process, the inherent difficulties with such collective action. In terms of geopolitical power, the capacity of the Chinese government to retaliate against EU exports of wine and polysilicon was effective in mobilizing actors in these sectors against the duties This case suggests that as the Chinese domestic market grows, access to that market can be leveraged to achieve more favourable outcomes in negotiations with partner countries. This leverage was, even a decade ago, considered unlikely to be effectiveThis rapid shift in market power has implications for wider public and private negotiations on the global governance structures which impact on GPNs, including product standards and trade regimes. As rising powers, like China, become more active in defending their interests in international negotiations, the ‘rules of the game’ which regulate GPNs can be expected to change "
"The US switched its China and Taiwan anti-dumping duties to uniform tariffs on all imports of solar panels in January 2018. This research uses an Equilibrium Displacement Model (EDM) to determine the relative effects of these two tariffs on domestic consumer and producer welfare, employment, government revenue, and environmental costs. The results indicate that uniform tariffs are more effective than the specific-country tariffs because of higher welfare for domestic manufacturers and higher government revenue. However, the uniform tariffs hurt American consumers, employees, and the environment more than the other because of higher domestic price and larger domestic demand reduction. Therefore, if a policy aims to create more jobs and have less effect on consumers and the environment, a specific-country tariff might be preferable. However, uniform tariffs are better if the administration intends to support domestic manufacturers and increase government revenue."
